IS  ‘‘FREE  TRADE’’  WORKING? 

S.  HRG.  110–1203 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, 

TRADE, AND TOURISM 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

APRIL  18,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

79–549 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  INTERSTATE  COMMERCE,  TRADE,  AND  TOURISM 

BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 

JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 18, 2007  ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Cantwell 
..............................................................................
Statement of Senator DeMint  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Brown, Hon. Sherrod, U.S. Senator from Ohio  .....................................................
Gresser,  Edward,  Director,  Trade  and  Global  Markets  Project,  Progressive 
Policy Institute  .....................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hindery, Jr., Leo, Managing Director, InterMedia Partners  ...............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Johnston, John, Partner, Modern Metal Cutting, LLC  ........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Wallach, Lori, Director, Global Trade Watch Division, Public Citizen,  ..............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Wenk,  Christopher,  Senior  Director,  International  Policy,  U.S.  Chamber  of 
.............................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Commerce 

Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Maria  Cantwell  to  Leo 
..........................................................................................................

Hindery, Jr. 

APPENDIX 

Page 
1 
3 
4 
1 

3 

40 
43 
6 
9 
27 
29 
12 
15 

33 
35 

67 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

IS  ‘‘FREE  TRADE’’  WORKING? 

WEDNESDAY,  APRIL  18,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, TRADE, AND 
TOURISM, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met  at  10:23  a.m.,  in  room  SR–253,  Russell 
Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Byron  L.  Dorgan,  Chairman  of  the 
Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator  DORGAN.  We  will  call  the  hearing  to  order.  This  is  a 
hearing  of  the  Commerce  Committee,  the  Interstate  Commerce, 
Trade,  and  Tourism  Subcommittee.  We  regret  the  delay.  We’ve 
been voting in the Senate and have just completed our second vote. 
I believe Senator DeMint will be along shortly and some other col-
leagues as well. But we apologize for the delay. 

We  thank  the  witnesses  for  being  here.  I’d  like  to  make  a  very 
brief  statement  about  the  reason  we  are  holding  this  hearing.  The 
title  of  the  hearing  is,  ‘‘Is  ‘Free  Trade’  Working?’’  We  will  be  con-
fronting some trade decisions in the coming months. The President 
has  requested  that  we  extend  ‘‘Fast  Track,’’  which  has  been  re-
named Trade Promotion Authority. In the normal scheme of things 
in  this  town,  when  one  title  doesn’t  work  very  well,  you  normally 
re-title it and so what is the old Fast Track has now become Trade 
Promotion Authority. 

It  is  still  the  same  straightjacket  that  is  requested  of  Congress 
that  trade  agreements  be  entered  into,  negotiated  in  most  cases, 
outside of public view and then brought back to the Congress, and 
the  Congress  will  have  agreed  to  put  itself  in  a  straightjacket  and 
not  be  able  to  offer  any  amendments,  and  it  would  be  considered 
under  expedited  considerations,  expedited  procedures—that  is, 
Trade Promotion Authority. 

The  President  will  request  we  extend  that.  There  are  a  number 
of  trade  agreements  that  have  been  negotiated  and  are  ready  for 
consideration  by  the  United  States  Congress.  I  noted  earlier  this 
month  that  the  trade  agreement  with  South  Korea  was,  according 
to one publication, completed just under the deadline, whatever the 
deadline  was,  as  soft  or  hard  as  the  deadline  might  have  been  for 
completion  of  that  to  be  considered  under  the  current  Trade  Pro-
motion Authority. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

2 

The term, ‘‘free trade,’’ has been branded in recent years. In fact, 
books have been written about it. The most recent significant book 
perhaps, which was a ‘‘truanting book for free trade,’’ was that the 
world  is  flat.  The  world  of  course,  is  not  flat  and  trade  is  not  free. 
But  the  issue  of  whether  the  free  trade  policies  are  working  is 
an  important  issue  because  we  operate  under  so-called  free  trade 
policies. We’ve negotiated free trade agreements, a number of them 
in  recent  years.  As  we  have  watched  these  free  trade  agreements 
be  implemented,  we  have  seen  a  dramatic  increase  in  our  trade 
deficit.  Our  trade  deficit  has  exploded  to  about  $830  billion  a  year 
for  our  merchandise  trade  deficit  last  year,  the  highest  in  human 
history.  It,  in  my  judgment,  ought  to  suggest  that  there  is  some-
thing wrong with our trade strategy. 

I  know  that  those  in  this  room  who  are  interested  in  trade  have 
studied  David  Ricardo  and  his  theory  of  comparative  advantage. 
The  doctrine  of  comparative  advantage  is  one  that  suggests  that 
there are natural reasons you would want to do that which is most 
efficient  for  you.  The  typical  story  is  to  describe  the  Portugal  and 
England circumstance of raising sheep and shearing them for wool 
and  raising  grapes  and  crushing  them  for  wine,  and  exchanging 
then  wool  for  wine  because  each  state  does  the  other  more  effi-
ciently. 

However,  today’s  free  trade  agreements  and  particularly  the 
large  deficits  that  have  accrued  from  these  free  trade  agreements 
have  nothing  at  all  to  do  with  the  doctrine  of  comparative  advan-
tage.  We  have  seen  substantial  American  jobs  depart  this  country. 
In  fact,  we  have  a  pernicious  tax  break  that  says  if  you  leave  the 
country,  if  you  shut  your  plant,  fire  your  workers,  get  out  of  here, 
move  it  to  China  or  India  or  Sri  Lanka  or  Bangladesh,  we’ll  actu-
ally give you a tax break. 

So  we’ve  seen  the  flight  of  American  jobs,  particularly  in  the 
manufacturing  industry  but  also  in  some  other  industries  as  well 
and in addition to that, we have people who now estimate there are 
40  to  50  million  outsource-able  American  jobs.  Not  all  of  them,  of 
course, will be outsourced but even those that remain will be under 
pressure,  downward  pressure,  with  respect  to  wages  and  benefits. 
The  description  the  other  day  of  Circuit  City  deciding  to  lay  off 
3,400  workers,  not  because  they  weren’t  good  workers  but  because 
they  wanted  to  hire  less  expensive  workers,  is,  I  think,  a  descrip-
tion  of  that,  the  downward  pressure  on  wages  in  this  country  as 
a  result  of  how  some  describe  ‘‘free  trade,’’  in  the  global  economy. 
Let me be clear. I support trade, believe in trade and believe we 
ought  to  be  engaged  in  plenty  of  trade.  I  insist  it  be  fair  trade.  I 
believe that so-called free trade is not working and I’m going to be 
asking  questions  about  that  today.  I  know  members  of  this  panel 
will have different views of it but I think that whatever one’s view, 
I  would  expect  most  of  us  would  believe  that  the  issue  of  trade  is 
very, very important. 

It  is,  in  fact,  a  global  economy.  I  couldn’t  change  it  if  I  wanted 
to. The question is not that. The question is, what are the rules for 
trade  in  the  global  economy  and  are  the  rules  for  trade  rules  that 
are  beneficial  to  this  country’s  long-term  economic  viability?  I  sub-
mit  the  answer  under  current  circumstances  would  be  no  and 
change is necessary. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

3 

Let  me  call  on  my  colleagues  for  any  brief  opening  statements 

that they wish to make. Senator Cantwell? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  thanks  for 
holding this important hearing and I thank the witnesses for being 
here to testify. Given that we just had a vote scheduled and consid-
ering  the  time  of  this  hearing  and  an  obligation  that  I  also  have 
in  another  committee,  I’m  going  to  submit  my  statement  for  the 
record,  but  I  want  to  say  that  the  Washington  State  trade  experi-
ence  is  a  very  unique  trade  experience  and  we’ve  had  some  suc-
cesses  and  obviously  some  challenges.  Certainly  I’m  going  to  be 
working with my colleagues here and on the Finance Committee on 
the Trade Adjustment Authority, making sure that we beef up that 
area  of  what  the  United  States  needs  to  do  to  be  investing  in  a 
well-skilled workforce. 

But I thank the Chairman for his—— 
Senator  DORGAN.  Senator  Cantwell,  thank  you  very  much.  Sen-

ator Brown? 

STATEMENT OF HON. SHERROD BROWN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OHIO 

Senator  BROWN.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  and  although  I  don’t 
sit  on  either  this  Subcommittee  or  full  Committee,  I  appreciate 
your  invitation  to  join  you  for  a  few  minutes.  I  particularly  thank 
the  panel  for  being  here  and  thank  you  all  for  your  leadership  on 
all kinds of trade issues, especially what you’ve done for American 
manufacturing and emphasizing the importance of that. 

Some  years  ago,  maybe  5  years  ago,  Mr.  Johnston  from  Akron, 
Ohio,  invited  me—it  was  in  my  Congressional  District  in  those 
days,  to  come  and  speak  to  the  Akron  Machine  Shop  Operators,  a 
trade  association  of—they  were  an  association  of  some  several 
dozen  manufacturers,  machine  shop  manufacturers  in  Summit 
County.  I’ll  never  forget—there  were  probably  60  or  70  people  at 
this lunch. 

Perhaps  the  companies  ranged  from  as  few  as  five  people  to  one 
that was over 100, I believe, but only one. Most of them were fam-
ily  owned,  most  of  them  non-union,  small  manufacturers  and  a 
gentleman walked up to me right before the lunch and with a blue 
grocery  bag,  a  plastic  grocery  bag  full  of  flyers,  probably  this 
many—a stack of this many—put them on the table in front of me 
and  said,  I  get  this  many  flyers  every  month  from  all  over  the 
country,  going  out  of  business  sales,  cannibalizing  their  industrial 
equipment  and  their  inventory  or  their  production  capacity.  They 
were  not  just  Ohio  companies,  they  were  companies  everywhere 
and  it  really—to  me,  that  moment  really  showed  the  threat  to  our 
manufacturing  base  in  this  country  and  how  important  it  is  that 
we  have  a  trade  policy  and  a  tax  policy  that  works  for  American 
businesses, especially small manufacturers and for workers and for 
our communities, and that we have a manufacturing policy as part 
of that, whether it’s a Manufacturing Extension Partnership or the 
other things that we need to do. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

4 

A couple of years ago, Mr. Chairman—and you led the opposition 
to this, to the Central American Free Trade Agreement in the Sen-
ate—in the House, as many remember, we put a coalition together 
of  small  manufacturers  and  laborers  and  environmentalists  and  a 
lot  of  people  representing  religious  organizations,  both  in  Central 
America and in the United States and people active in agriculture, 
farmers  and  it  was  a  coalition  of  people  really  representing—rep-
resenting  America,  people  who  know  that  this  trade  policy  is  not 
working. 

When  I  was  elected  to  Congress  in  1992,  to  the  House,  we  had 
a  trade  deficit  in  the  United  States  of  $38  billion,  a  trade  deficit 
with  China,  barely  double  digits  and  a  trade  surplus  with  Mexico. 
Today,  that  $38  billion  trade  deficit  has  reached,  whether  you 
count  services,  700,  800-plus  billion  dollars  and  our  trade  deficit 
with  China  has  increased  about  20-fold  since  those  days.  And  we 
obviously  have  a  big  trade  deficit  with  Mexico  now  and  it’s  clear 
when  you  look  at  the  aggregate  trade  deficit  over  these  15  years, 
it’s in excess of $4 trillion. 

In some sense—this isn’t the whole story but in some sense that 
means $4 trillion of wealth has left our country and we as a nation 
need to come up with a real manufacturing policy, a real trade pol-
icy that is going to change directions. I think the work that Senator 
Dorgan  has  done  for  years  in  the  Senate  and  that  he  is  holding 
hearings  with  some  of  the  best  minds  in  trade  policy  on  all  sides, 
I think will be very helpful today. 

I  apologize,  I  have  a  mark-up  on  Food  and  Drug  Administration 
issues  in  the  HELP  Committee  so  I  won’t  be  here  for  the  whole 
time  but  I  will  read  all  your  testimony  and  continue  the  conversa-
tion  with  all  of  you  who  have  been  so  helpful  in  formulating  the 
real direction we should take in trade policy in our country. I thank 
you all for being here. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Senator  Brown,  thank  you  very  much.  The 
Ranking  Member,  Senator  DeMint  is  here.  Senator  DeMint,  thank 
you. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JIM DEMINT, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH CAROLINA 

Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I want to thank the 
whole  panel  for  helping  us  look  into  this  very  important  issue  for 
the country and I appreciate Senator Brown’s comment but I think 
as  all  of  us  know,  the  trade  deficit  is  not  a  debt  and  I  think  we 
are many times misleading the American people as to what a trade 
deficit  is.  Those  of  us  who  had  to  work  with  balance  sheets  for 
many  years  know  that  if  you  spend  $100  to  buy  an  asset  that  in 
this country, is worth more than $100, you have actually increased 
your wealth. 

As we look at our trade deficit, while we may be paying for many 
things  from  all  over  the  world,  we  are  receiving  something  very 
real in return. Many of things that we receive in turn are raw ma-
terials,  parts  for  equipment  that  are  manufactured  in  this  country 
and then often, exported all over the world. I think if we fail to con-
nect  the  dots  on  everything  that  is  happening  with  trade  around 
the world, we really miss that point. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

5 

Certainly  there  are  many  ways  that  we  can  improve  trade  and 
we do need to recognize that our whole economy is now interwoven 
in  the  international  markets  and  any  talk  that  we  somehow  need 
to stop that or try to manage it on some kind of global scale is not 
realistic and not productive for us here in Congress. 

Over 31 million jobs in this country depend on trade and it’s the 
fastest  growing  sector  of  our  economy.  I  know  in  South  Carolina, 
we’ve  become  one  of  the  most  international  states  in  the  country, 
buying  from  all  over  the  world  and  selling  all  over  the  world.  We 
have the American headquarters for BMW and Michelin. 

Every  time  we  try  to  do  something  protectionist  related,  such  as 
put  a  tariff  on  steel,  I  hear  from  manufacturers  all  over  our  state 
that  they  can  no  longer  compete  in  the  global  market  if  it  costs 
them  more  to  buy  steel  in  the  United  States  than  it  would  if  they 
were  producing  somewhere  else.  So  there  is  an  effect  sometimes 
that  we  don’t  intend  in  Congress  when  we’re  trying  to  protect  an 
industry, when in fact, we make our country much less competitive. 
I hope we can focus some of our comments not just on the nega-
tive  aspects  of  trade  because  certainly  there  are  ways  we  can  im-
prove  it  and  we  need  to  discuss  it.  But  one  of  our  biggest  chal-
lenges  as  a  nation  is  we  are  doing  things  here  in  Washington  and 
particularly  in  Congress  that  make  it  more  and  more  difficult  for 
our  companies  to  compete  globally.  So  if  we  don’t  sell  more  over-
seas  to  the  95  percent  of  the  world  that  lives  outside  of  America, 
then we will have a trade deficit with other countries. 

When  you  have  the  second  highest  corporate  tax  rate  in  the 
world,  you  create  a  problem  for  our  manufacturers  and  when  you 
have  one  of  the  most  complex  and  onerous  regulatory  systems  in 
the world, it makes us less competitive. And when we have a litiga-
tion system that’s the worst in the world, creating more liability for 
manufacturers  and  producers  in  this  country  than  any  other  place 
in the world, we have to realize, if we’re willing to look, that other 
countries are starting to get it. 

Even  Europe,  who  we  look  at  as  being  antiquated,  continue  to 
lower their corporate tax rate and more and more American wealth 
is staying overseas Senator; Microsoft keeps their money in Ireland 
instead  of  bringing  it  home  for  research  and  development  and  jobs 
because they lowered their corporate tax rate to around 12 percent 
or I think below that. 

So  let’s  talk  about  how  to  make  America  more  competitive,  how 
to take the cost of government off our manufacturers. Then I think 
we’ll  solve  a  problem  if  we  feel  it  is,  that  we  buy  more  from  other 
countries than they buy from us. 

But  I  appreciate,  Mr.  Chairman,  you  having  these  hearings  be-
cause  irrespective  of  our  opinions,  we  know  we  can  improve  this 
trade  situation.  We  know  we  can  level  the  playing  field  more  for 
our companies here and expand wealth in this country so I look for-
ward to hearing from these panelists. Thank you. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Well,  Senator  DeMint,  we  are  going  to  have  a 
lot  to  talk  about,  you  and  I.  It  will  be  an  interesting  Congress  for 
us to discuss trade. Let me call on the panel and then we will have 
this  opportunity  through  questions  as  well,  to  evaluate  some  of 
your  comments  and  the  comments  of  other  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

6 

We have Mr. Leo Hindery who is joining us today and I want to 
call  on  Mr.  Hindery  first.  Leo  Hindery  is  a  successful  business  ex-
ecutive  for  many,  many  years,  a  NASCAR  driver,  an  author  who 
has  written  a  book.  It  takes  a  CEO  that  deals  a  lot  with  the  issue 
of  trade  and  Leo  Hindery  was  one  of  the  first  people  I  thought  of 
when  I  thought  of  asking  some  witnesses  to  come  to  talk  about 
trade  and  I’m  very  pleased  you  have  been  willing  to  travel  to 
Washington, D.C. 

Mr.  Hindery,  we  will,  for  all  the  witnesses,  include  your  entire 
statement  as  a  part  of  the  permanent  record  and  we  would  say  to 
all  of  the  witnesses,  including  yourself,  you’re  welcome  to  summa-
rize as you wish. Why don’t you proceed? 

STATEMENT OF LEO HINDERY, JR., MANAGING DIRECTOR, 

INTERMEDIA PARTNERS 

Mr.  HINDERY.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  Senators,  and 
thank  you  for  this  privilege.  Briefly,  I  am,  as  the  Senator  com-
mented,  the  Managing  Director  of  InterMedia  Partners.  I  pre-
viously  served  as  the  Chief  Executive  of  both  TCI  and  AT&T 
Broadband and I had the privilege of chairing recently the Horizon 
Project,  which  was  an  initiative  by  a  group  of  11  chief  executives 
and  policy  specialists  that  attempted  to  produce  a  report  to  Con-
gress  on  what  we  believe  needs  to  be  done  to  protect  America’s 
prosperity in this era of globalization. 

My  own  concerns,  Senators,  about  our  trade  policies  manifest 
themselves,  Senator  Dorgan,  in  the  Nation’s  record  and  still  grow-
ing trade deficit that you spoke of, in the disappearance of valuable 
chunks of our economy due to what I believe are callous offshoring 
of  American  jobs  with  many,  many  millions  more  to  follow  and  in 
the  adverse  national  security  implications  of  certain  of  our  trade 
practices. 

As has been commented, the United States is now the only major 
net  consumer  in  the  global  economy  with  a  current  account  deficit 
in  2006  of  $857  billion,  a  staggering  61⁄2 percent  of  our  GDP  and 
I  would  point  out  that  this  huge  deficit  does  not  include  an  esti-
mated  $200  billion  of  taxable  foreign  subsidiary  earnings  being 
masked each year by misallocations and obfuscating accounting. 

As  has  been  commented,  more  than  five  million  American  jobs 
have been lost to offshoring in just the past 6 years. Three million 
are  manufacturing  but  notably,  two  million  are  service  and  IT  re-
lated.  Looking  ahead,  a  conservative  estimate  is  that  14  million  of 
the roughly 141 million civilian, non-self employed jobs in the coun-
try today will be offshored in the next 10 years, seven million more 
manufacturing  jobs,  3.3  million  more  service  jobs  and  3.4  million 
more  IT  jobs.  Various  esteemed  individuals,  including  the  former 
Vice Chairman of the Federal Reserve, Alan Blinder, suggests that 
my estimates are very, very conservative. 

But  in  the  process  of  exporting  these  high  tech  manufacturing 
jobs,  the  United  States  is  also  indirectly  exporting,  in  my  opinion, 
important aspects of its national security. 

We  currently  have  a  $50  billion  annual  trade  deficit  with  China 
alone, for what are called Advanced Technology products and from 
a U.S. national security perspective, DRAM, SRAM and ROM chip 
manufacturing is now grossly over-reliant on China, on Taiwan and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

South  Korea.  Many  of  these  items  are  essential,  absolutely  essen-
tial to our high-tech weaponry and national defense. 

7 

For  free  trade  to  be  fair  trade,  Senators,  it  must,  in  my  opinion, 
be  rules-based  and  then  these  rules  must  be  followed.  But  right 
now,  many  major  U.S.  trading  partners  are  breaking  the  rules 
through  massive,  massive  currency,  tax  and  capital  subsidies,  and 
through  what  I  believe  are  unfair  labor  and  environmental  prac-
tices. 

For  each  of  the  past  22  years,  pursuant  to  what  was  called  the 
Trade Act of 1974, the Office of the U.S. Trade Representative has 
submitted  an  annual  report  to  Congress,  surveying  the  significant 
trade barriers to U.S. exports. According to the USTR, there are 10 
categories of trade barriers, ranging from tariffs to bribery. 

But I would point out notably that no where in this survey of for-
eign  barriers  to  our  exports,  Senators,  is  there  any  serious  treat-
ment of non-ILO labor practices, of nonexistent or diminished envi-
ronmental  standards,  or  especially  of  subsidies  and  currency  ma-
nipulation.  If  the  USTR’s  report  in  2007,  which  is  called  the  NTE, 
which  was  just  delivered  to  Congress,  is  overlooking  the  most  ad-
verse trade barriers, then it should come as no surprise that we as 
a nation, in my opinion, are getting absolutely killed in our trading 
with China, with India and Japan. 

Let  me  give,  if  I  might,  just  two  cases  in  point.  The  Semicon-
ductor  Industry  Association  has  recently  calculated  that  the  com-
bined  tax  and  capital  subsidization  of  China’s  high  tech  industries 
is now so extreme that only 10 percent of the overall cost difference 
vis-a`-vis  American  manufacturers  is  labor-cost  based.  Ninety  per-
cent, Senators, is tax and capital grants based. 

In turn, despite Treasury Secretary Paulson’s contention on Feb-
ruary  10th  that  the  Japanese  yen’s  value  is  set  based  on  under-
lying fundamentals, your colleagues, Senators Levin and Stabenow 
and  Congressmen  Dingle  and  Levin  have  concluded  that  in  fact, 
the government of Japan’s artificial depressing of the yen has now 
resulted  in  an  effective  subsidy  to  Japanese  auto  manufacturers  of 
roughly $8,000 per car. 

To  personalize  further  how  foreign  subsidies  and  illegal  trade 
practices  are  crushing  American  workers,  I  would  like  to  briefly 
discuss  Intel  and  Citigroup,  both  of  which  are  leaders  in  their  re-
spective  fields.  Intel’s  announcement  on  February  12  of  its  new, 
programmable  teraflop  superchip  was  rightly  hailed  as  a  success 
for  American  innovation.  But  this  euphoria  turned  into  just  more 
pink slips for American high tech workers when a month and a day 
later,  on  March  13,  Intel  announced  that  it  will  now  build  in 
China, a massive, $21⁄2 billion chip fabrication shop, propped up by 
an announced $1 billion subsidy from the Chinese government and 
by many other subsidies that neither Intel nor the Chinese wanted 
to announce. 

Then  there  is  Citigroup,  which  confirmed  last  week  that  at  the 
same time it is eliminating 7,000 American jobs, even more notably 
in  my  opinion,  it  is  offshoring—offshoring  an  additional  9,500 
American  jobs  primarily  to  India,  where  it  already  has  22,000  em-
ployees  working  in  highly  skilled  areas  like  research,  investment 
banking and credit analysis. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

8 

The  bank  announced  these  relocations  and  cuts  with  absolutely 
no expressed remorse for the American workers affected and it cer-
tainly did not discuss the extensive subsidies. Again, the extensive 
subsidies  it  is  receiving  from  the  Indian  government  as  induce-
ments for offshoring another 9,500 jobs. 

Greatly informing all of my comments today, Senators, is the re-
ality, as has been pointed out and as Senator Sherrod Brown men-
tioned  a  moment  ago,  that  the  U.S.  goods  trade  deficit  with  China 
alone  is  now  a  staggering  $233  billion.  In  2006,  we  did  export  $55 
billion  of  goods  to  the  Chinese  but  they  turned  around  and  ex-
ported  $288  billion  to  us.  This  ongoing  imbalance  in  trade  with 
China has left that country, China alone, with foreign exchange re-
serves  of  an  unprecedented  $1.2  trillion,  up  37  percent  in  just  the 
last year. They are by now the far largest source of funding for our 
deficits. 

But as I’ve commented, China’s real trade advantage results not 
from  its  criminally  low  wages  but  it  comes  from  tax  breaks  and 
from  subsidies,  including  currency  manipulations,  grants,  low  cost 
loans given to companies that have no intention and sometimes not 
even the obligation to pay them back. And to these benefits, China 
adds  tariffs,  it  adds  standards  abuses,  intellectual  property  theft, 
policies  favoring  domestic  production,  and  market  access  highly 
conditioned on local production or intellectual property transfers. 

In  recent  days,  we  should  take  some  comfort,  but  modest  only, 
that  the  Executive  Branch  has  finally  began  to  wake  up  to  some 
of the specific trade problems with China and to initiate some long 
overdue responses. 

But  as  we  go  forward,  this  Administration  working  closely  with 
this Congress must, in my opinion, take additional steps to ensure 
that our trade agreements with all countries, all countries, are fair 
and  vigorously  enforced,  that  high  valued  added  jobs  in  the  U.S. 
grow  and  that  there  continue  to  be  substantial  investments  in 
worker skills. 

With  respect,  Senators,  I  recommend  therefore  that  this  Sub-
committee  consider  four  actions.  Congress  should  require  that  the 
annual NTE survey by the USTR include as defined trade barriers 
to  U.S.  exports,  subsidies,  currency  manipulation,  non-ILO  labor 
practices and weak or nonexistent environmental standards. 

You should in turn, charge the USTR with prosecuting all mean-
ingful illegal violations. And expanding on a proposal made already 
by  Senator  Stabenow,  any  U.S.  company,  in  my  opinion,  should  be 
permitted to petition for tariffs on imports from countries that ma-
terially  benefit  from  these  subsidies,  keep  their  currencies  de-
pressed  or  do  not  have  ILO  labor  and  minimum  environmental 
standards. 

Finally,  I  could  not  agree  more  strongly  that  there  should  be  no 
renewal by this Congress of Fast Track TPA without requiring that 
all future trade agreements approved under TPA incorporate labor 
and environmental standards. 

Trade  agreements,  as  has  been  commented  on,  are  only  as  good 
as  the  resources  brought  to  bear  to  enforce  them.  Yet  we  know 
sadly that in the last 6 years, the U.S. has filed an average of only 
three  WTO  cases  a  year  versus  an  average  of  11  per  year  during 
the  Clinton  Administration.  I  believe  Congress  should  transfer  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

9 

sponsibility  for  evaluating  and  prosecuting  trade  agreement  viola-
tions  from  the  Office  of  the  USTR  to  a  new  division  in  Justice, 
headed  by  an  Assistant  Attorney  General  for  trade  enforcement. 
Congress  should  also  insist  on  parity  enforcement  against  and 
among  all  trade  agreement  requirements,  whether  commercial  or 
otherwise. 

Senators,  as  already  proposed  by  Senators  Dorgan  and  Clinton, 
Congress should, in my opinion, go forward on an actionable limit, 
expressed as a percent of GDP, on both our yearly trade deficit and 
our  accumulated  trade  debt.  When  any  such  limit  is  exceeded,  the 
Executive Branch must immediately initiate actions with Congress 
to bring the deficit back in line. 

And  finally,  to  stop  the  criminal  export  of  important  aspects  of 
our national security, Congress should enact legislation quickly re-
quiring  that  manufacturing  activities  which  have  national  security 
implications  and  are  proposed  to  be  offshore  be  subject  first  to  a 
national security impact statement. 

In addition to these four issues and recommendations, which are 
under  the  purview  of  this  Subcommittee,  I  would  hope  that  the 
Senate  Finance  Committee  would  consider,  in  a  revenue  neutral 
fashion,  correlating  the  corporate  tax  rate  of  the  Nation’s  larger 
manufacturing  and  technology  service  companies  with  the  average 
value  added  of  their  U.S.  employees.  The  corporate  tax  rate  for 
these companies would be reduced on a sliding scale, based on their 
value-added standing relative to the median of the particular busi-
ness sector in which they operate. 

Since  most  of  the  value  that  a  corporation—any  corporation— 
adds  to  its  product  and  services  reflects  the  wages  and  benefits  it 
pays its employees, this simple corporate income tax change would 
be a significant financial incentive for a corporation to boost its av-
erage  wage  to  non-executive  employees  through  productivity  gains 
and by investing in their skills and in capital equipment. 

Finally,  Senators,  I  believe  that  the  Congress  should  undertake 
to eliminate tax deferrals on foreign profits. You should in turn re-
form the foreign subsidiary tax allocation rules to prevent corpora-
tions  from  reducing  their  U.S.  taxable  earnings  by  misallocating 
expenses such as interest, R&D and overhead, both of which great-
ly exacerbate the offshoring of jobs and the trade deficit. 

Only  by  fully  understanding  how  globalization  and  current  U.S. 
trade  policies  are  affecting  America’s  economic  well-being  can  we 
craft future policies that will advance the welfare of all Americans. 
Hopefully,  Senators,  my  recommendations  will  help  you  in  this 
task in ways that preserve the principles of a vibrant middle class, 
economic  growth  and  mobility,  and  economic  and  social  justice. 
Thank you for this privilege. It means a great deal. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Hindery follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LEO HINDERY, JR., MANAGING DIRECTOR, 

INTERMEDIA PARTNERS 

I  am  Leo  Hindery,  Managing  Director  of  InterMedia  Partners.  I  have  previously 
served  as  the  CEO  of  TCI  and  AT&T  Broadband.  Recently,  I  chaired  The  Horizon 
Project, a group of eleven CEOs and policy specialists that produced a report to Con-
gress  on  what  we  believe  needs  to  be  done  to  protect  America’s  prosperity  in  this 
era of globalization. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

10 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and Senators, for convening this important hearing on 
current  U.S.  trade  policies.  My  own  concerns  about  these  policies  manifest  them-
selves in the Nation’s record—and still growing—trade deficit, in the disappearance 
of valuable chunks of our economy due to the callous offshoring of millions of Amer-
ican jobs with many millions more certain to follow, and in the adverse national se-
curity implications of certain of our trade practices. 

The  United  States  is  now  the  only  major  net  consumer  in  the  global  economy, 
with a current account deficit in 2006 of $857 billon, which is a staggering 6.5 per-
cent  of  GDP.  And  this  huge  deficit  does  not  include  the  estimated  $200  billion  of 
taxable  foreign  subsidiary  earnings  being  masked  each  year  by  misallocations  and 
obfuscating accounting. 

More than five million American jobs have been lost to offshoring in just the past 
6 years: three million manufacturing, and two million service and IT-related. Look-
ing  ahead,  more  than  14  million  of  the  roughly  141  million  civilian  non-self  em-
ployed jobs in America today will be offshored over the next 10 years, including 7.0 
million more manufacturing jobs, 3.3 million more service jobs and 3.4 million more 
IT  jobs.  And  these  are  very  conservative  estimates  according  to  Alan  Blinder,  Vice 
Chairman of the Federal Reserve during the Clinton Administration. 

And in the process of exporting high-tech manufacturing jobs, the U.S. is also in-
directly  exporting  important  aspects  of  its  national  security.  The  United  States  has 
a $50 billion annual trade deficit with China alone for ‘‘Advanced Technology Prod-
ucts’’,  and  from  a  U.S.  national  security  perspective  DRAM,  SRAM  and  ROM  chip 
manufacturing  is  now  grossly  over-reliant  on  China,  Taiwan  and  South  Korea. 
Many  of  these  items  are  essential  to  our  high-tech  weaponry  and  national  defense. 
For  free  trade  to  be  fair  trade,  Senators,  it  must  be  rules-based,  and  these  rules 
must be followed. But right now many major U.S. trading partners are breaking the 
rules through massive currency, tax and capital subsidies and through unfair labor 
and environmental practices. 

For  each  of  the  past  22  years,  pursuant  to  the  Trade  Act  of  1974,  the  Office  of 
the  U.S.  Trade  Representative  has  submitted  an  annual  report  to  Congress  sur-
veying  significant  trade  barriers  to  U.S.  exports.  According  to  the  USTR,  there  are 
ten categories of trade barriers ranging from tariffs to bribery. 

But  nowhere  in  this  survey  of  foreign  barriers  to  U.S.  exports,  Senators,  is  there 
any serious treatment of non-ILO labor practices, of nonexistent or de minimis envi-
ronmental standards, or, especially, of subsidies and currency manipulation. 

If  the  USTR’S  report  in  2007,  which  is  called  the  NTE,  is  overlooking  the  most 
adverse  trade  barriers,  then  it  should  come  as  no  surprise  that  we  as  a  nation  are 
getting absolutely killed in our trading with China, India and Japan. 

Two cases in point: 
The  Semiconductor  Industry  Association  has  recently  calculated  that  the  com-
bined  tax  and  capital  subsidization  of  China’s  high-tech  industries  is  now  so  ex-
treme  that  only  about  10  percent  of  the  overall  cost  difference  vis-a`-vis  American 
manufacturers  is  labor  cost-based  and  that  90  percent  is  tax  and  capital  grants- 
based. 

In turn, despite Treasury Secretary Paulson’s contention on February 10 that ‘‘the 
Japanese yen’s value is set . . . based on underlying fundamentals’’, Senators Levin 
and  Stabenow  and  Congressmen  Dingell  and  Levin  have  concluded  that  in  fact  the 
Japanese  government  is  artificially  depressing  the  yen  to  such  a  degree  that  Japa-
nese automakers are realizing an effective subsidy of roughly $8,000 per car. 

To personalize further how foreign subsidies and illegal trade practices are crush-
ing  American  workers,  I  would  like  to  briefly  discuss  Intel  and  Citigroup,  each  of 
which is a leader in its respective field. 

Intel’s announcement on February 12 of its new programmable teraflop superchip 
was  rightly  hailed  as  a  success  for  American  innovation.  But  this  euphoria  turned 
into  just  more  pink  slips  for  American  high-tech  manufacturing  workers  when  a 
month  and  a  day  later,  on  March  13,  Intel  announced  that  it  will  now  build  in 
China a massive $2.5 billion chip fabrication shop, propped up by an announced $1 
billion subsidy from the Chinese government and by many other subsidies that Intel 
and China did not want to announce. 

And  then  there  is  Citigroup,  which  confirmed  last  week  that  at  the  same  time  it 
is  eliminating  7,000  American  jobs,  it  is,  even  more  notably  in  my  opinion, 
offshoring  an  additional  9,500  American  jobs  primarily  to  India,  where  it  already 
has  22,000  employees  working  in  highly  skilled  areas  like  research,  investment 
banking  and  credit  analysis.  The  bank  announced  these  relocations  and  cuts  with 
absolutely no expressed remorse for the American workers affected, and it certainly 
did  not  discuss  the  extensive  subsidies  it  is  receiving  from  the  Indian  government 
as inducements for offshoring another 10,000 jobs. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

11 

Greatly  informing  all  of  my  comments  today  is  the  reality  that  the  U.S.  goods 
trade  deficit  with  China  alone  is  now  a  staggering  $232.5  billion.  In  2006  we  ex-
ported $55.2 billion of goods to the Chinese, but they in turn exported $287.8 billion 
of  goods  to  us.  This  ongoing  imbalance  in  trade  with  China  has  left  that  country 
with foreign exchange reserves of an unprecedented $1.2 trillion, up 37 percent just 
since this time last year. China is now, by far, the largest source of funding for U.S. 
Government deficits. 

As I have commented, China’s real trade advantage results not from its criminally 
low  wages,  but  from  tax  breaks  and  from  subsidies,  including  currency  manipula-
tion, grants and low-cost loans given to companies that have no intention and some-
times  not  even  an  obligation  to  pay  them  back.  And  to  these  benefits  China  adds 
tariffs, standards abuses, intellectual property thefts, policies favoring domestic pro-
duction,  and  market  access  conditioned  on  local  production  or  intellectual  property 
transfers. 

In  recent  days,  the  Executive  Branch  has,  finally,  begun  to  wake  up  to  some  of 
the specific trade problems with China and to initiate some long overdue responses. 
But as we go forward, the Adminsitration, working closely with Congress, must take 
additional steps to ensure that our trade agreements with all countries are fair and 
vigorously enforced, that high value-added jobs in the U.S. grow, and that there con-
tinue to be substantial investments in worker skills. 

To these ends, I recommend that this Subcommittee consider four actions: 

1.  Take  actions  against  illegal  and  unfair  trade  practices.  Congress  should  re-
quire  that  the  annual  NTE  survey  by  the  USTR  include,  as  defined  trade  bar-
riers to U.S. exports: subsidies; currency manipulation; non-ILO labor practices; 
and  weak  or  nonexistent  environmental  standards.  In  turn,  the  USTR  should 
be  specifically  charged  with  prosecuting  all  meaningful  illegal  violations,  and, 
expanding on a proposal already made by Senator Stabenow, any U.S. company 
should be permitted to petition for tariffs on imports from countries that materi-
ally benefit from such subsidies, keep their currencies depressed, or do not have 
ILO  labor  and  minimum  environmental  standards.  Finally,  there  should  be  no 
renewal  by  Congress  of  fast-track  Trade  Promotion  Authority,  or  TPA,  without 
requiring  that  all  future  trade  agreements  approved  under  TPA  incorporate 
such labor and environmental standards. 
2. Strengthen trade agreements enforcement. Trade agreements are only as good 
as  the  resources  brought  to  bear  to  enforce  them,  but  in  the  last  6  years  the 
U.S.  has  filed  an  average  of  only  three  WTO  cases  a  year,  versus  an  average 
of  eleven  per  year  during  the  Clinton  administration.  In  response,  Congress 
should  transfer  responsibility  for  evaluating  and  prosecuting  trade  agreements 
violations  from  the  office  of  the  USTR  to  a  new  Division  at  Justice  headed  by 
an Assistant Attorney General for Trade Enforcement. Congress should also in-
sist on ‘‘parity of enforcement’’ among all trade agreement requirements, wheth-
er commercial or otherwise. 
3.  Cap  on  the  Nation’s  trade  deficit.  As  already  proposed  by  Senators  Clinton 
and  Dorgan,  Congress  should  enact  limits,  expressed  as  percents  of  GDP,  on 
both  the  yearly  trade  deficit  and  the  accumulated  trade  debt.  When  any  such 
limit is exceeded, the Executive Branch must then immediately initiate actions 
to bring the deficit back in line. 
4.  National  security  protection  legislation.  To  stop  the  export  of  important  as-
pects  of  our  national  security,  Congress  should  enact  legislation  requiring  that 
manufacturing activities which have national security implications and are pro-
posed to be off-shored by subject first to a ‘‘national security impact statement’’. 
In addition to these four trade-related recommendations which are under the pur-
view  of  this  Subcommittee,  I  recommend  that  the  Senate  Finance  Committee  con-
sider, in a revenue neutral fashion, correlating the corporate tax rate on the profits 
of the Nation’s larger manufacturing and technology services companies with the av-
erage  value-added  of  their  U.S.  employees.  The  corporate  tax  rate  for  these  compa-
nies  would  be  reduced  on  a  sliding  scale  based  on  their  value-added  standing  rel-
ative to the median of the particular business sector in which they operate. 

Since  most  of  the  value  that  such  a  corporation  adds  to  its  products  and  services 
reflects  the  wages  and  benefits  it  pays  its  employees,  this  corporate  income  tax 
change would be a significant financial incentive for a corporation to boost its aver-
age  wage  to  non-executive  employees  through  productivity  gains  and  by  investing 
in worker skills and capital equipment. 

As  a  final  recommendation,  Congress  should  also  undertake  to  eliminate  tax  de-
ferrals  on  foreign  profits,  and  to  reform  foreign  subsidiary  tax  allocation  rules  to 
prevent corporations from reducing their U.S. taxable earnings by misallocating ex-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

penses  such  as  interest,  R&D  and  overhead,  both  of  which  greatly  exacerbate  the 
offshoring of jobs and the trade deficit. 

12 

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

How  well  the  Executive  Branch  and  Congress  respond  to  the  significant  chal-
lenges  confronting  the  American  economy  will  substantially  determine  whether  our 
Nation  continues  to  be  the  preeminent  economic  power  in  the  world,  or  whether  it 
will  experience  declining  political  influence  and  economic  leadership.  Only  by  fully 
understanding how globalization and current U.S. trade policies are affecting Amer-
ica’s  economic  well-being  can  we  craft  future  policies  that  will  advance  the  welfare 
of  all  Americans.  Hopefully,  Senators,  my  recommendations  will  help  you  in  this 
task, in ways that preserve the principles of a vibrant middle class, economic growth 
and mobility, innovation, and economic and social justice. 

Thank you for this opportunity. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Hindery,  thank  you  very  much  for  being 
here  and  thank  you  for  your  statement.  Next,  we’ll  hear  from  Lori 
Wallach,  the  Director  of  Public  Citizen’s  Global  Trade  Watch,  a 
nonprofit  organization  to  promote  government  and  corporate  ac-
countability in the globalization and trade arena. Ms. Wallach is a 
lawyer,  has  written  a  number  of  books  and  articles  on  trade,  in-
cluding  Who’s  Trade  Organization,  a  comprehensive  guide  to  the 
WTO. Ms. Wallach, you may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF LORI WALLACH, DIRECTOR, GLOBAL TRADE 

WATCH DIVISION, PUBLIC CITIZEN 

Ms.  WALLACH.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  members  of  the 
Committee. Public Citizen has spent 15 years documenting the out-
comes of our current trade regime and I appreciate the opportunity 
to share some of our findings. 

In  considering  where  we  are  now,  it’s  important  to  focus  on  the 
fact  that  we  have  now  one  model  of  trade  and  its  delivery  mecha-
nisms—agreements  like  NAFTA  and  WTO.  There  is  nothing  inevi-
table about these rules or these outcomes, nor is this free trade. It 
is  one  system  of  managed  trade  and  this  model  is  an  enormous 
break from the past, for instance, of GATT. 

Now,  15  years  later,  the  data  is  in.  This  experiment  failed  even 
the most modest do no further harm test and as the data provided 
and my full testimony shows, we desperately need new rules to set 
up our trade and globalization regime. 

The  American  public  has  lived  this  experience  so  it’s  not  sur-
prising  that  over  the  last  5  years,  public  opinion  about  the  out-
comes of this system has shifted dramatically. As the University of 
Maryland  has  tracked  in  a  stage  poll  over  the  last  7  years,  those 
Americans who think our current system is a net loss for them and 
for  the  country  is  now  up  to  all  four  of  the  five  quintiles,  up  to 
$120,000 in income and this shift in opinion, based on the lived ex-
perience  of  the  current  system’s  failure  was  demonstrated  in  our 
election,  where  scores  of  Members  of  Congress,  who  voted  for  the 
current system were defeated by those running, calling for change. 
I’m  going  to  summarize  my  findings  briefly  but  I  have  13  pages 
of  testimony  with  several  hundred  footnotes  to  the  government 
sources  and  there  are  full  reports  on  many  of  these  findings  that 
can be found on our website, which is TradeWatch.org. 

First, the U.S. economic outcomes. This model has failed the U.S. 
national  economy  and  the  majority  of  its  participants—workers, 
firms  and  farmers.  First  the  trade  deficit.  Leo  Hindery  has  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

13 

viewed the numbers but to put it in context, before Fast Track was 
established,  first  in  1974  and  the  series  of  agreements  it  enabled, 
the U.S. had balanced trade and rising living standards. In fact, in 
nearly every year after World War II until Fast Track was passed, 
we  had  a  trade  surplus.  In  every  year  since  Fast  Track  and  the 
agreements  such  as  NAFTA  and  its  clones  and  WTO  enabled  by 
Fast Track, we’ve had a trade deficit but for one year. 

The  size  of  the  deficit  we  have  now  is  not  only  horrifying  but  it 
is  widely  considered  unsustainable,  exposing  our  country  and  the 
global economy to shock and crisis. Now, this is not inevitable. This 
is  a  result  of  bad  policy  and  one  can  demonstrate  this  by  digging 
into the actual trade flows. 

As  Senator  Brown  mentioned,  as  we  have  had  free  trade  agree-
ments  with  different  countries,  we’ve  shifted  from  surpluses  in 
trade  with  these  countries  to  deficits  systematically.  We  now  have 
a  deficit  with  all  of  our  important  free  trade  agreement  partners 
and  with  the  group  as  a  whole.  And  in  fact,  ironically,  U.S.  export 
growth  to  those  countries  with  whom  we  have  free  trade  agree-
ments  is  less  than  to  the  non-free  trade  agreement  countries.  U.S. 
exports  to  our  free  trade  agreement  partners  is  a  22  percent 
growth. To our non-FTA partners, it is 25 percent. 

So  we  have  agreements,  specific  agreements  with  specific  out-
comes  that  are  causing  these  problems  and  alarmingly,  under  the 
WTO and NAFTA, the U.S. is poised to become a net food importer. 
We  now  import  and  export  the  same  commodities.  Under  WTO 
rules, we are required to import minimally 5 percent of every com-
modity  line,  even  if  we’re  exporting  them.  We  now  are  a  net  im-
porter  of  most  of  the  products  we  eat.  We  export  things  that  ani-
mals eat. 

Now  what  has  been  the  effect  on  jobs  and  wages  for  American 
workers? Trade theory says that the total number of jobs is not af-
fected  by  trade  policy  but  rather  the  quality,  the  type  and  the 
wages  for  those  jobs.  These  trade  agreements  explicitly  have  in-
vestment rules that incentivize companies to relocate. You get pref-
erential  treatment,  better  than  U.S.  law,  if  you  relocate,  which  is 
why  we  saw  companies  leaving  under  NAFTA  to  Canada,  where 
wages were higher. 

This  is  resulting  in  a  labor  arbitrage  where  there  is  no  floor.  In 
fact,  Department  of  Labor  studies  have  documented  that  since 
NAFTA and WTO, there has been a 60 percent increase in threats 
to  bust  unions  by  relocating  jobs,  and  relocation  has  doubled  after 
successful union organizing. 

What’s  the  result?  U.S.  worker  productivity  doubled  during  the 
Fast  Track  era.  The  average  U.S.  worker’s  annual  wages  have  in-
creased  a  nickel—.28  percent,  one-quarter  of  one  percent  raise, 
double in productivity and that kind of a raise. 

How  has  this  happened?  We’ve  seen  one  in  six  of  every  U.S. 
manufacturing job leave the country. Leo Hindery mentioned what 
that’s  done  to  our  tax  base.  Does  that  support  our  hospitals,  our 
schools,  our  essential  services?  And  think  of  what  it  has  done  to 
our national security. We can’t make the things that are critical to 
our  infrastructure  and  security  anymore  in  this  country.  We  wait 
for the imports. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

14 

But in addition, what’s happened to people, real people? The De-
partment of Labor shows when a worker loses a manufacturing job 
and  then  gets  a  service  job,  their  average  loss  in  wages  is  from 
$40,000  to  $32,000.  And  this  offshoring  of  jobs  is  moving  up  the 
skills  ladder.  Leo  Hindery  mentions  the  Blinder  Study,  which 
shows  that  for  25  to  42  million  high  tech  jobs,  they’re  extremely 
susceptible to offshoring. We’ve lost one million such high tech and 
service  sector  jobs  in  engineering,  IT,  and  accounting  since  2001, 
most that pay better than median wages. 

Now,  Senator  DeMint  mentioned  the  trade  theory,  which  is  that 
we all benefit when there are more imports because prices go down 
and everyone benefits from lower prices versus the people who are 
losing income because their job is gone. Those are a minority so ev-
eryone  gains  on  the  import  side  and  some  people  are  hurt  on  the 
loss of job side. 

But  when  you  actually  plug  the  data  now  into  theory,  the  gain 
in cheaper prices on the import side is now outweighed by the loss 
to  U.S.  workers  in  wages.  Empirically,  if  you  look  at  the  Depart-
ment of Labor data, to the fact that we now have, for workers who 
make  $25,000  a  year,  a  net  loss  of  $3,000  annually.  This  accounts 
for  a  net  loss  in  wages  under  this  model,  for  the  70  percent  of  the 
American workforce that doesn’t have a college degree. These rules 
are  a  net  loss  for  the  majority  even  accounting  for  the  theory  of 
free trade. 

Now,  in  this  period,  we’ve  also  seen  30,000  farms  close,  shut-
tered.  We’re  becoming  a  net  food  importer  and  we’ve  seen  numer-
ous U.S. farms go under. 

Who is winning? We hear a mantra that somehow this is helping 
defeat  poverty  in  poor  countries.  The  data  show  the  opposite.  The 
poor  countries  who  have  adopted  the  same  model  have  lower 
growth rates and are increasing in poverty and hunger. Tomorrow, 
there  will  be  a  letter  to  Congress  delivered  by  over  300  major  na-
tional unions, federations, and civil society groups from developing 
countries  beseeching  Congress  not  to  provide  President  Bush  more 
Fast Track to lock in the Doha Round WTO escalation, which they 
see  as  incredibly  threatening  and  likely  to  increase  poverty  in  the 
developing world. 

So  the  outcomes  economically  have  been  a  loser  for  the  U.S.,  a 
loser  for  developing  countries  and  then  there  is  the  loss  to  democ-
racy. 

To conclude, I want to review an issue that’s not often discussed, 
how  these  trade  agreements  are  used  to  undermine  domestic  poli-
cies.  WTO  and  NAFTA  require  countries  to  conform  all  their  do-
mestic  laws  to  the  rules  of  the  agreements  and  the  agreements 
have  900  pages  of  non-trade  rules.  The  U.S.  has  been  the  number 
one target of WTO challenges. We are the number one recipient of 
WTO attacks. The U.S. has lost 86 percent of all the attacks on our 
laws. 

It’s even worse when you take into account the attacks and their 
anti-dumping  and  countervailing  duty  laws.  There  have  only  been 
49 cases total in the WTO. We’ve been the target of 33 and we lost 
31.  The  array  of  U.S.  laws  is  astonishing  that  have  been  success-
fully  challenged  in  the  U.S.  Tax  laws,  gambling  bans,  environ-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

15 

mental laws and then there is NAFTA, which has similar rules but 
stronger. 

The U.S. now is subject to seven major NAFTA challenges. There 
are $28 billion in claims pending. One case is just $300 million and 
it  has  cost  over  $3  million  just  to  successfully  defend  one  of  these 
cases, the bottom line of this economic and democracy failure. 

Number  one,  there  are  short  term  steps  Congress  can  take  to 
ameliorate the immediate damage. First, for offshoring of high tech 
and service jobs, the U.S. ought to adopt the same policies that Eu-
rope has, which is that laws—areas of the U.S. economy subject to 
privacy  laws,  the  offshored  work  in  banking  or  health  records— 
there  should  be  a  protection  to  make  sure  consumer  privacy  is  not 
undermined  and  the  work  can’t  go  to  countries  that  don’t  provide 
at  least  minimally  the  same  level  of  consumer  privacy  protection. 
This  is  what  Europe  has  in  their  system  and  it’s  called  the  Safe 
Harbor  System.  As  a  result,  a  lot  of  work  does  not  get  offshored. 
It stays in the country. 

Number  two,  as  Leo  Hindery  mentioned,  there  are  a  variety  of 
national  security  screens  that  can  be  put  into  place  as  far  as  the 
offshoring of work. 

Number  three,  we  should  strengthen  our  Buy  American  anti- 
offshoring  rules,  which  currently,  the  Procurement  Agreement 
Rules  in  trade  agreements  undermine  and  I  agree  with  what  Leo 
Hindery said about tax deferrals. 

In  the  broader  sense,  the  answer  is  no  more  of  the  same.  This 
policy  has  taken  our  country  to  the  edge  of  a  cliff.  The  first  thing 
we  need  to  do  is  hit  the  emergency  brake  and  then  turn  around. 
Therefore,  I  agree,  no  more  Fast  Track.  We  need  to  replace  that 
mechanism  and  in  the  future,  we  need  a  new  system  for  negoti-
ating  trade  agreements  that  includes  binding  rules  about  what 
must and must not be in trade agreements so we set a new course. 
Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Wallach follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LORI WALLACH, DIRECTOR, GLOBAL TRADE WATCH 

DIVISION, PUBLIC CITIZEN 

Mr.  Chairman,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  on  behalf  of  Public  Citizen’s 
200,000  members,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  share  our  research  on  the  out-
comes  of  current  U.S.  trade  policy.  Public  Citizen  is  a  nonprofit  research,  lobbying 
and litigation group based in Washington, D.C. Founded in 1971, Public Citizen ac-
cepts  no  government  or  corporate  funds.  Public  Citizen’s  Global  Trade  Watch  divi-
sion  focuses  on  how  the  current  globalization  model  and  its  implementing  mecha-
nisms,  including  the  World  Trade  Organization  (WTO)  and  the  North  American 
Free  Trade  Agreement  (NAFTA),  affect  Public  Citizen’s  goals  of  promoting  democ-
racy, economic and social justice, health and safety, and a healthy environment. 

First, I would like to recognize the leadership of Subcommittee Chairman, Senator 
Byron  Dorgan,  who  has  tirelessly  worked  to  focus  attention  on  the  failings  of  our 
current  trade  regime  and  the  need  for  change.  Chairman  Dorgan  has  methodically 
tracked  the  outcome  of  the  current  policies  and  plays  a  vital  role  in  insisting  that 
if these results are not acceptable, then the model can and must be changed. 

Unfortunately  for  all  of  us  living  with  the  results,  the  data  supporting  the  need 
for a new direction in trade policy are extremely compelling. I pray that this hearing 
helps  spur  the  needed  changes.  Since  the  Fast  Track  system  devised  by  President 
Nixon was passed in 1974, the agreements it enabled have undermined the interests 
of  most  American  workers,  firms  and  farmers.  Economic  damage  has  been  but  one 
outcome. The principle and practice of democracy also has been a casualty. This tes-
timony first focuses on economic outcomes and then describes domestic policies that 
have been undermined via trade pacts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

16 

This  is  avoidable  damage.  A  bad  process—Fast  Track—has  enabled  bad  policy, 
which  in  turn  has  had  terrible  results.  There  is  nothing  inevitable  about  the  nega-
tive outcomes my testimony describes. A new policy can achieve better results. Mini-
mally,  we  must  avoid  expanding  the  current  failed  policy,  for  instance  via  a  Doha 
Round  WTO  escalation  or  via  more  NAFTA-model  ‘‘free  trade  agreements’’  (FTAs). 
The summary of the damage thus far? Before Fast Track we had balanced trade 
and  rising  living  standards;  since  then  the  U.S.  trade  deficit  has  exploded  as 
imports  surged,  and  now  we  have  a  deficit  equal  to  6  percent  of  our  GDP.  A 
deficit of this magnitude is widely agreed to be unsustainable, exposing the U.S. 
and  global  economy  to  risk  of  crisis,  shock  and  instability.  The  average  Amer-
ican  worker  is  only  making  a  nickel  more  per  hour  in  inflation-adjusted  terms 
than in 1973, despite impressive productivity gains, while income inequality has 
jumped to levels not seen since the Robber Baron era. During the NAFTA–WTO 
era, we have lost three million U.S. manufacturing jobs, one of every six in that 
sector,  devastating  local  tax  bases  on  which  our  schools  and  hospital  rely  and 
undermining our ability to produce the basic goods essential for our national se-
curity and infrastructure. And now, we are even becoming a net food importer! 
How  have  we  gotten  into  this  mess?  The  U.S.  Constitution  gives  Congress  exclu-
sive  authority  to  ‘‘regulate  commerce  with  foreign  nations’’  (Article  I–8.)  The  Fed-
eralist  Papers  discuss  why  this  structure—and  the  inherent  checks  and  balances  it 
established—was vital based on the experience of living under a regime where trade 
policy  was  determined  by  the  executive—the  king  in  the  case  of  the  American  colo-
nies. The goal was to ensure that U.S. trade policy was set by the branch of govern-
ment  closest  to  the  people  so  as  to  preclude  the  ability  of  the  President  to  favor 
friends  of  allied  foreign  governments  rather  than  considering  the  national  interest. 
Fast Track delegates away to the Executive Branch Congress’ constitutional author-
ity to control the contents of U.S. trade agreements, as well as numerous other im-
portant  powers.  Happily,  another  Boston  Tea  Party  or  a  revolution  are  not  needed 
to  rectify  the  concentration  of  trade  authority  in  the  hands  of  the  executive,  as  it 
is within the power of Congress to do so. 

We need a new mechanism for negotiating trade agreements that puts a steering 
wheel—and when necessary, brakes—on our trade negotiators so that Congress and 
the public are back in the driver’s seat. Only by replacing the unbalanced, outdated 
Fast  Track  trade  authority  delegation  system  can  we  chart  a  new  course  on  trade 
that can harness trade’s benefits for the majority. 

For  those  members  of  the  Commerce  Committee  not  in  office  in  1993  when 
NAFTA  was  considered,  I  respectfully  urge  you  to  review  the  floor  debate  during 
which the Commerce Committee’s Vice Chair, Senator Ted Stevens, wisely inquired 
whether the limits imposed by Fast Track on the Senate are even permissible under 
the  Constitution.  Senator  Stevens  noted  that  an  Article  I–7  clause  1 1 provides  the 
Senate a right to amend revenue measures. Trade agreements, by merit of their set-
ting tariff levels, are revenue measures. Fast Track eliminates the Senate’s constitu-
tional right to amend. This is a point worth consider in thinking about what system 
should  replace  the  Fast  Track  delegation  mechanism.  The  conclusion  of  this  testi-
mony addresses this issue in more detail. 

Fast  Track  must  be  replaced.  Fast  Track  enabled  trade  agreements  are  dev-
astating the U.S. middle class while increasing poverty and instability overseas. The 
following  data  summarizes  the  outcomes  of  our  current  policy.  This  is  not  specula-
tion about what could occur or projections based on various assumptions. Following 
are  the  actual  outcomes,  replete  with  footnotes  and  details  thanks  to  Global  Trade 
Watch’s research director, Todd Tucker. 
1.  The  Results  of  Current  U.S.  Trade  Policy:  Wages  Stagnate  as  Trade 

Deficits Soar, Displacing Good U.S. Jobs 

The  average  American  worker  is  only  making  a  nickel  more  per  hour  in  inflation- 
adjusted  terms  than  in  1973,  the  year  before  Fast  Track  was  first  passed.  In  1973, 
the  average  American  worker  made  $16.06  hourly  in  today’s  dollars.  That  same 
worker  only  makes  $16.11  today,  despite  U.S.  workers’  average  productivity  nearly 
doubling  since  1973.  Better  trade  policy  can  do  better  for  America’s  workers  than 
this pathetic 0.28 percent raise. Were it not for trade agreements that pit American 
workers in a race-to-the-bottom with poverty-wage workers worldwide, U.S. workers 
would  see  wages  increase  in  a  way  that  more  closely  tracks  productivity  increases. 
Trade  pacts  that  require  companies  to  respect  workers’  rights  to  organize  a  union 
would  empower  workers  in  developing  countries  to  fight  to  raise  their  wages  also. 
Special  protections  included  in  ‘‘free  trade’’  agreements  for  certain  sectors,  such  as 
Big  Pharma,  increase  consumer  prices.  As  bad  trade  deals  push  down  our  wages, 
these  deals  also  include  provisions  that  directly  jack  up  consumer  prices.  Special 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

17 

protections  for  Big  Pharma  included  in  WTO  and  NAFTA  required  the  United 
States  to  provide  them  longer  monopoly  patent  protections.  Did  the  U.S.  Congress 
really  intend  to  extend  U.S.  drug  patent  terms  from  the  pre-WTO  and  pre-NAFTA 
17-year  terms  to  the  WTO  and  NAFTA-required  20-year  terms?  And,  what  is  such 
protectionism  doing  in  a  ‘‘free  trade’’  agreement?  The  University  of  Minnesota’s 
School  of  Pharmacy  found  that  the  WTO  and  NAFTA  windfall  patent  extensions 
cost U.S. consumers at least $6 billion in higher drug prices and increased Medicare 
and  Medicaid  costs  nearly  $1.5  billion  just  for  drugs  then  under  patent.2 The  Uni-
versity  of  Minnesota  study  only  covers  medicines  that  were  under  patent  in  1994, 
so the total cost to us is much higher.3 

How our trade policy is suppressing American wage levels. Trade’s downward pres-
sure  on  our  wages  comes  from  both  the  import  of  cheaper  goods  made  by  poorly- 
paid  workers  abroad  (displacing  goods  made  by  better-paid  U.S.  workers)  and 
threats during wage bargaining by employers that they will move overseas. The re-
sult  is  growing  inequality  among  Americans,  with  workers  losing  while  the  richest 
few enjoy massive gains. The pro-Fast Track Peterson Institute for International Ec-
onomics estimates that as much as 39 percent of the observed growth in U.S. wage 
inequality  is  attributable  to  trade  trends.4 Most  proponents  of  the  NAFTA–WTO 
status  quo  trade  model  acknowledge  this  connection.  But  they  argue  that  even  so, 
U.S. workers win when imports produced by low-paid workers overseas increase be-
cause  it  means  cheaper  stuff  for  all  of  us.  However,  in  fact  when  the  actual  data 
is plugged into the trade theory, the reality is quite different. 

Now  for  the  vast  majority  of  Americans,  the  gains  in  lower  prices  from  trade  are 
being  outweighed  by  wage  losses—meaning  net  losses  for  most.  When  the  non-par-
tisan Center for Economic and Policy Research applied the actual data to the trade 
theory,  they  discovered  that  when  you  compare  the  lower  prices  of  cheaper  goods 
to  the  income  lost  from  low-wage  competition  under  our  current  policy,  the  trade- 
related losses in wages hitting the vast majority of American workers outweigh the 
gains in cheaper priced goods from trade. U.S. workers without college degrees (over 
70 percent of us) lost an amount equal to 12.2 percent of their wages, so for a work-
er  earning  $25,000  a  year,  the  loss  would  be  more  than  $3,000  per  year! 5 Talk 
about unfair trade. We need new trade agreements and policies that guarantee that 
the gains from trade outweigh the losses for most Americans. 

Before  Fast  Track  we  had  balanced  trade;  since  it  was  instituted,  the  U.S.  trade 
deficit  has  exploded  as  imports  surged.  The  pre-Fast  Track  period  was  one  of  bal-
anced  trade  for  the  United  States  and  rising  living  standards  for  most  Americans. 
In  fact,  in  1973,  the  United  States  had  a  slight  trade  surplus,  as  it  had  in  nearly 
every  year  since  World  War  II.  But  in  every  year  since  Fast  Track  was  first  imple-
mented, the United States has run a trade deficit. And since Fast Track got us into 
NAFTA and the WTO, the U.S. trade deficit surged from under $100 billion to near-
ly $800 billion—that is 6 percent of national income! This huge trade deficit is wide-
ly agreed to be unsustainable, meaning unless we implement policies to shrink that 
deficit, the U.S. and global economies are exposed to risk of crisis, shock and insta-
bility. 

Imports  into  the  United  States  from  the  countries  with  whom  the  United  States 
has  FTAs  are  growing  considerably  faster  than  exports  from  the  United  States, 
meaning our FTAs are actually increasing the U.S. trade deficit. USTR has claimed 
that U.S. exports to countries with which we have FTAs beat non-FTA exports, how-
ever to come up with the data they use to support this claim, they conveniently ex-
clude  the  three  FTA  nations  with  which  we  have  the  biggest  deficits:  Mexico,  Can-
ada  and  Israel.  When  you  put  these  nations  back  into  the  calculation,  the  U.S.  an-
nual  export  growth  rate  2001–2006  to  our  FTA  partners  is  22.67  percent—below 
U.S. exports to non-FTA nations and to the world as a whole. In fact, the Bush Ad-
ministration itself knows well that U.S. FTAs lead to growth in bilateral trade defi-
cits.  In  an  October  2006  speech  to  a  Korean  audience,  Deputy  USTR  Karan  Bhatia 
said that it was a myth that ‘‘The U.S. will get the bulk of the benefits of the FTA. 
If  history  is  any  judge,  it  may  well  not  turn  out  to  be  true  that  the  U.S.  will  get 
the bulk of the benefits, if measured by increased exports. From Chile to Singapore 
to  Mexico,  the  history  of  our  FTAs  is  that  bilateral  trade  surpluses  of  our  trading 
partners go up’’ [italics added].6 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

18 

The  United  States  has  large  and  growing  trade  deficits  with  all  of  its  major  FTA 
partners and with the group of FTA nations as a whole. And in the cases of Mexico 
and Jordan, we went from small surpluses to large deficits. There are no tricks here: 
all  13  FTA  nations  are  presented  in  order  of  accession.  Since  USTR  didn’t  adjust 
for inflation, we didn’t either. USTR included several FTA nations that haven’t had 
a  full  calendar  year  of  FTA  treatment  (and  others  like  CAFTA  nations  whose  U.S. 
exports  temporarily  crashed  due  to  the  Administration’s  embarrassing  textile  rules 
of  origin  mix-up):  we  give  the  administration  benefit  of  the  doubt  and  compare  the 
full  year-to-year  trade  balance.  As  you  can  see,  the  small  surpluses  we  now  (and 
perhaps temporarily) enjoy with the tiny CAFTA markets do not outweigh the large 
and growing deficits with our more important FTA partners. Numbers in italic and 
in parentheses represent deficits. 

Table 1.—U.S. FTAs = Large and Growing Trade Deficits 

Country 

Israel* 

Canada 

Mexico 

Jordan 

Chile 

Singapore 

Australia 

Morocco 

CAFTA–DR: 

El Salvador 

Guatemala 

Honduras 

Nicaragua 

Date of Entry Trade 

Balance 

2006 Trade Balance 

$ Change from Entry 

to Present 

($651,386,137) 

($11,062,816,493) 

($10,411,430,356) 

($13,010,182,276) 

($104,807,513,391) 

($91,797,331,115) 

$530,787,754 

($82,493,273,675) 

($83,024,061,429) 

$110,019,449 

($797,938,097) 

($907,957,546) 

($1,771,368,610) 

($3,330,114,125) 

($1,558,745,515) 

$3,001,393,110 

$4,161,051,450 

$1,159,658,340 

$7,278,102,445 

$8,592,539,836 

$1,314,437,391 

$49,296,037 

$322,704,253 

$273,408,216 

Entry 
Date 

1985 

1989 

1994 

2001 

2004 

2004 

2005 

2006 

2006 

($203,985,314) 

$240,060,256 

$444,045,570 

($457,372,341) 

$195,816,702 

$653,189,043 

($603,278,117) 

($163,867,841) 

$439,410,276 

($592,042,526) 

($820,712,923) 

($228,670,397) 

Bahrain 

2006 

($119,873,998) 

($161,641,962) 

($41,767,964) 

Total FTA Deficit 

..................................

($190,125,706,010) 

Source:  U.S.  International  Trade  Commission  numbers.  (*Measured  since  1989  due  to  data  availability;  2006  FTAs’  deficit  growth 

measured  2006  relative  to  2005.) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
L
L
A
W
8
1
4

19 

Now the United States is even poised to become a net food importer! Unbelievably, 
due  to  this  import  surge,  the  United  States  is  even  becoming  a  net  food  importer. 
While  U.S.  farmers  were  told  by  NAFTA–WTO  supporters  that  they  would  be 
‘‘breadbasket  to  the  world,’’  nearly  300,000  family  farms  have  been  shuttered  since 
the pacts went into effect.7 Now we’re importing massive amounts of the grains and 
feeds  we  also  export,  and  running  a  deficit  in  most  categories  of  foods  that  wind 
up on our dinner table, including fruits, vegetables and more.8 We can reverse this 
mess, and we must to avoid major economic damage. 

Over  3  million  American  manufacturing  jobs—1  out  of  every  6—lost.  The  U.S. 
manufacturing sector has long been a source of innovation, productivity, growth and 
good jobs.9 But by the end of 2006, the United States had only 14 million manufac-
turing  jobs  left—nearly  3  million  fewer  than  before  NAFTA  and  the  WTO.10 The 
U.S. Labor Department has a list of nearly 1.7 million U.S. workers that have spe-
cifically lost their job to trade during the NAFTA–WTO era—and that is under just 
one  narrow  program  that  excludes  many  of  the  trade  pacts’  victims.11 Further,  the 
non-partisan  Economic  Policy  Institute  estimates  that  as  many  as  7  million  addi-
tional  manufacturing  jobs  could  have  been  supported  in  the  U.S.  economy  were  it 
not  for  this  massive  trade  deficit  caused  by  our  bad  trade  policy.12 The  good  news 
is that this outcome is neither random nor inevitable: bad policy led to bad results. 
We can change our trade policymaking process and get good agreements that create 
good  jobs—and  rebuild  our  now-dwindling  ability  to  manufacture  the  products  on 
which our Nation’s very security and well-being rely. 

Devastation of America’s manufacturing base is eroding the tax base that supports 
our  schools  and  hospitals.  The  erosion  of  our  manufacturing  base  during  the  Fast 
Track era means fewer firms and fewer well-paid workers to contribute to local tax 
bases.  Research  has  shown  that  the  broader  the  manufacturing  base,  the  wider  is 
the  local  tax  base  and  offering  of  social  services.13 With  the  loss  of  manufacturing, 
fiscal  resources  that  could  be  used  for  social  services  declined,14 while  welfare  en-
rollments increased.15 This has resulted in the virtual collapse of some local govern-
ments.16 These  ‘‘trade’’  pacts  also  undermine  our  access  to  essential  services  by  re-
quiring  that  many  services  be  privatized  and/or  deregulated  so  that  public  services 
are  transformed  into  new  for-profit  commodities  that  only  those  who  can  afford  to 
purchase can obtain.17 

The  off-shoring  of  American  jobs  is  moving  rapidly  up  the  income  and  skills  lad-
der.  Economy.Com  estimates  that  nearly  one  million  U.S.  jobs  have  been  ‘‘off- 
shored’’ since early 2001 alone, with 1 in 6 of those in Information Technology, engi-
neering,  financial  services  and  other  business  services.18 Progressive  Policy  Insti-
tute,  a  pro-NAFTA–WTO  think  tank,  found  that  12  million  information-based  U.S. 
jobs—54 percent paying better than the median wage—are highly susceptible to off- 
shoring.19 Independent  academic  studies  put  the  number  of  jobs  susceptible  to  off- 
shoring  much  higher.  Alan  Blinder,  a  former  Fed  vice-chair,  Princeton  economics 
professor, and NAFTA–WTO supporter, says that 28 to 42 million service sector jobs 
(or  about  2  to  3  times  the  total  number  of  current  U.S.  manufacturing  jobs)  could 
be  off-shored  in  the  foreseeable  future.20 Yet,  if  we  were  to  implement  policies  to 
forbid  off-shoring  of  certain  types  of  jobs  to  nations  that  do  not  provide  adequate 
privacy  protections  for  confidential  health  and  financial  data  for  example,  we  could 
have a much lower rate of job off-shoring. Europe already has this policy in place.21 
Bad trade policy downgrades quality of U.S. jobs available. Trade affects the types 
and  quality  of  jobs  available—and  our  wage  levels—not  the  number  of  total  jobs. 
We lost millions of manufacturing jobs during NAFTA and WTO, but overall unem-
ployment has been fairly stable as new service sector jobs were created. Proponents 
of the NAFTA–WTO status quo often raise this point to claim that recent trade poli-
cies  have  not  hurt  most  American  workers.  But,  what  they  do  not  mention  is  that 
the quality of jobs available to the majority of U.S. workers—and the wages we can 
earn—have all been degraded by our trade policy. For instance, the average worker 
displaced  during  this  period  from  manufacturing  went  from  earning  $40,154  to 
$32,123  when  re-employed.22 The  loss  of  workers’  bargaining  power  caused  by  so 
many off-shored U.S. jobs—first in manufacturing, now in services too—means stag-
nant  wages  for  all  of  us.  Under  NAFTA  and  WTO  we  are  forced  to  compete  in  the 
same  labor  market  as  poor  countries’  less-than-$1  per  day  workers  in  a  perpetual 
race-to-the-bottom. 
2.  The  Results  of  Current  U.S.  Trade  Policy:  Increased  Income  Inequality 

in the U.S. and Worldwide 

The  inequality  between  rich  and  poor  in  America  has  jumped  to  levels  not  seen 
since  the  Robber  Baron  era.  The  richest  10  percent  of  Americans  are  taking  nearly 
half  of  the  economic  pie,  while  an  even  more  elite  group—the  top  1  percent  of  the 
income  distribution—is  taking  nearly  a  sixth  of  the  pie.  Rich  Americans’  share  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

20 

national income was stable for the first several decades after World War II but shot 
up  40  percent  for  the  richest  10  percent  and  124  percent  for  the  richest  1  percent 
between 1973 and 2005—the Fast Track era.23 Nearly all economists agree that our 
trade  policy  has  partially  driven  this  widening  inequality.  We  must  replace  the 
trade  policies  causing  this  rift.  Reversing  this  trend  is  vital  to  the  health  of  Amer-
ican democracy. 

How could American workers’ productivity double, but wages stay flat? Trade pol-
icy  shifts  during  the  Fast  Track  era  also  have  had  a  direct  impact  on  American 
workers’  ability  to  bargain  for  higher  wages.  In  the  past,  American  workers  rep-
resented  by  unions  were  able  to  share  in  the  economic  gains  generated  by  produc-
tivity  increases—by  bargaining  for  their  fair  share.  But  since  the  Fast  Track-en-
abled NAFTA and WTO went into effect, as many as 62 percent of U.S. union drives 
face  employer  threats  to  relocate  abroad,  according  to  U.S.  government-commis-
sioned  studies.  And  indeed,  the  factory  shut-down  rate  following  successful  union 
certifications tripled since NAFTA went into effect.24 Meanwhile, these deals forbid 
Federal  and  state  governments  from  requiring  that  U.S.  workers  perform  the  jobs 
created  by  the  outsourcing  of  government  work.  Such  ‘‘anti-off-shoring’’  policies—as 
well  as  prevailing  wage  laws  designed  to  ensure  goods  wages  for  construction 
work—are subject to challenge in foreign tribunals for violating the pacts’ rules. The 
Fast  Track-hatched  trade  agreements’  attack  on  America’s  working  families’  ability 
to  lift  themselves  up  has  led  increasing  numbers  to  turn  against  any  active  expan-
sion  of  international  trade.25 We  need  a  new  way  to  make  U.S.  trade  agreements 
that guarantees working families’ get a fair shake. 

The worldwide gulf between rich and poor has also widened since Fast Track. Re-
member all the hype about how these trade agreements would reduce poverty in the 
developing  countries?  We  still  hear  this  line  today.  Yet,  the  reality  is  that  the  cor-
porate  globalization  era  policies  enabled  by  Fast  Track  have  increased  income  in-
equality between developed and developing countries. Income inequality has also in-
creased  between  rich  and  poor  within  many  nations  under  this  retrograde  trade 
model.  In  1960,  the  20  richest  nations  earned  per  capita  incomes  16  times  greater 
than  non-oil  producing,  less  developed  countries.  By  1999,  the  richest  countries 
earned  incomes  35  times  higher,  signifying  a  doubling  of  the  income  inequality.26 
According  to  one  United  Nations  study,  the  richest  1  percent  of  the  world’s  popu-
lation  receives  as  much  as  the  poorest  57  percent.27 According  to  another  U.N. 
study, ‘‘in almost all developing countries that have undertaken rapid trade liberal-
ization, wage inequality has increased, most often in the context of declining indus-
trial  employment  of  unskilled  workers  and  large  absolute  falls  in  their  real  wages, 
on the order of 20–30 percent in Latin American countries.’’ 28 The gap is worsening 
over  time,  but  a  trade  policy  designed  to  benefit  the  majority  can  turn  this  trend 
around. 
3. Fast Track’s Legacy: Stagnant Growth, Poverty and Hunger in Poor Countries 

Progress on growth and social development in poor countries slows during the Fast 
Track era. Increasing economic growth rates mean a faster expanding economic pie. 
With  more  pie  to  go  around,  the  middle  class  and  the  poor  have  an  opportunity  to 
gain without having to ‘‘take’’ from the rich—often a violent and disruptive process. 
But  the  growth  rates  of  developing  nations  slowed  dramatically  in  the  Fast  Track 
period.  For  low-  and  middle-income  nations,  per  capita  growth  between  1980  and 
2000  fell  to  half  that  experienced  between  1960  and  1980!  The  slowdown  in  Latin 
America  was  particularly  harmful.  There,  income  per  person  grew  by  75  percent  in 
the  1960–1980  period,  before  the  International  Monetary  Fund  (IMF)  began  impos-
ing  the  same  package  of  economic,  investment,  and  trade  policies  found  in  NAFTA 
and the WTO. Since adopting the policies, per capita income growth in Latin Amer-
ica  plunged  to  6  percent  in  the  1980–2000  period.  Even  when  taking  into  account 
the longer 1980–2005 period, there is no single 25-year window in the history of the 
continent  that  was  worse  in  terms  of  rate  of  income  gains.  In  other  world  regions, 
growth  also  slowed  dramatically,  while  in  Sub-Saharan  Africa,  income  per  person 
actually  shrank  15  percent  after  the  nations  adopted  the  policy  package  also  re-
quired  under  the  WTO  and  NAFTA! 29 Improvement  measured  by  human  indica-
tors—in  particular  life  expectancy,  child  mortality,  and  schooling  outcomes—also 
slowed  for  nearly  all  countries  in  the  Fast  Track  period  as  compared  with  1960– 
1980.30 In  numerous  Latin  American  countries,  people  have  risen  up  at  the  ballot 
box  to  elect  new  governments  that  reject  these  failed  policies  and  who  are  imple-
menting better alternatives—providing a hopeful example to the world. 

Poverty,  hunger  and  displacement  on  the  rise.  The  share  of  the  population  living 
on less than $2 a day in Latin America and the Caribbean rose following the imple-
mentation  of  NAFTA–WTO-style  policies.  And  the  share  of  people  living  on  less 
than $1 a day (the World Bank’s definition of extreme poverty) in the world’s poor-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

21 

est  regions,  including  Sub-Saharan  Africa  and  the  Middle  East,  has  increased  dur-
ing  the  same  period,31 as  the  IMF  and  World  Bank  and  then  WTO  imposed  this 
model. According to the Food and Agriculture Organization, global efforts toward re-
ducing  hunger  have  ‘‘stalled  completely  worldwide’’  during  the  WTO  era.32 During 
the  Fast  Track  era,  as  nations  have  begun  adopting  NAFTA–WTO  style  policies— 
from  Mexico 33 to  China 34 and  beyond—the  displaced  rural  poor  have  had  little 
choice  but  to  immigrate  to  wealthy  countries  or  join  swelling  urban  workforces 
where the oversupply of labor suppresses wages, exacerbating the politically and so-
cially  destabilizing  crisis  of  chronic  under-  and  unemployment  in  the  developing 
world’s  cities.  After  NAFTA,  Mexican  immigration  to  the  United  States  jumped  60 
percent  after  over  a  million  campesinos  lost  their  livelihoods  to  NAFTA-style  poli-
cies.35 Desperation and social instability is growing among many poor nations’ vast 
rural populations. According to the Indian government, thousands of farmers bank-
rupted by trade policies commit suicide every year, leaving their children and fami-
lies without alternate means of support.36 Both American workers and farmers and 
our  counterparts  in  poor  countries  are  all  suffering  under  the  current  trade  and 
globalization  system—united,  they  represent  a  global  majority  for  a  change  of 
course. 

Developing  countries  that  did  not  adopt  the  package  fared  better.  In  sharp  con-
trast,  nations  that  chose  their  own  economic  mechanisms  and  policies  through 
which to integrate into the world economy had more economic success. For instance, 
China,  India,  Malaysia,  Vietnam,  Chile,  and  Argentina  since  2002,  have  had  some 
of  the  highest  growth  rates  in  the  developing  world  over  the  past  two  decades—de-
spite  largely  ignoring  the  directives  of  the  WTO,  IMF  or  World  Bank.37 It  is  often 
claimed  that  the  successful  growth  record  of  countries  like  Chile  was  based  on  the 
pursuit  of  NAFTA–WTO-like  policies.  Nothing  could  be  farther  from  the  truth: 
Chile’s sustained rapid economic growth was based on the liberal use of export pro-
motion policies and subsidies that are now considered WTO-illegal.38 It is only now 
that  many  of  these  countries  are  bringing  their  policies  down  to  the  WTO’s  anti- 
development strictures that their economies are beginning to unravel. 
4.  Important  Domestic  Policies  Have  Been  Undermined  by 

‘‘Trade’’ 

Agreements 

Many  people  are  surprised  when  they  first  learn  that  actual  trade  between  coun-
tries  is  only  one  element  of  the  policies  established  and  enforced  by  NAFTA  and  the 
WTO, which also require that countries alter wide swaths of domestic non-trade pol-
icy or face sanctions. NAFTA and the WTO are dramatically different from all other 
trade  agreements  that  preceded  them.  Traditionally,  trade  agreements  focused  on 
tariffs,  quotas  and  border  customs  inspections.  NAFTA  and  the  WTO  exploded  the 
boundaries of what was included in trade pacts, establishing over 800 pages of non- 
tariff policies to which signatory countries must conform their domestic laws. Those 
new  agreements  set  constraints  on  signatory  countries’  domestic  food  safety  stand-
ards,  environmental  and  product  safety  rules,  service-sector  regulation,  investment 
and  development  policy,  intellectual  property  standards,  government  procurement 
rules,  tax  policy  and  more.  A  key  WTO  and  NAFTA  provision  specifically  requires 
each  signatory  country  to  ensure  the  conformity  of  all  of  its  laws,  regulations  and 
administrative procedures to the agreements’ terms.39 Other WTO and NAFTA sig-
natory  nations—and  foreign  investors  through  NAFTA  and  its  various  extensions 
such  as  the  Central  America  Free  Trade  Agreement  (CAFTA)  and  other  bilateral 
FTAs—can challenge U.S. national or local policies before an international tribunal 
for failure to comply with the agreements’ terms. Nations whose policies are judged 
not  to  conform  to  the  agreements’  rules  are  ordered  to  eliminate  them  or  face  per-
manent trade sanctions. 

One  commenter  called  NAFTA  a  ‘‘hunting  license’’  for  those  seeking  to  challenge 
state laws in the name of ‘‘free trade.’’ 40 Unfortunately, the evidence has borne this 
out,  as  a  range  of  non-trade  issues  reserved  for  state  and  local  governments—such 
as  local  prevailing  wage  laws  and  other  procurement  policies;  state  and  local  ‘‘Buy 
America’’  procurement  policies;  low-cost  healthcare  programs;  higher  education  pol-
icy;  and  state  funding  for  public  services,  the  environment,  and  even  local  librar-
ies—are  now  under  current  NAFTA  or  WTO  jurisdiction,  or  are  being  targeted  for 
such  by  trade  negotiators  around  the  globe.  The  U.S.  State  Department,  lobbying 
about  how  a  state  law  might  violate  WTO,  pressured  Maryland  state  legislators  to 
drop  a  procurement  policy  aimed  at  promoting  human  rights  in  Nigeria.  California 
Governor  Schwarzenegger  vetoed  a  California  law  requiring  a  portion  of  highway 
pavement to use recycled tires because this would violate trade agreement procure-
ment rules. 

The United States is the country which has faced the largest number of WTO chal-
lenges  to  its  laws,  and  has  lost  86  percent  of  such  cases.  The  diversity  of  U.S.  laws 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

22 

that  have  been  successfully  challenged  using  WTO  or  NAFTA  is  stunning.  The 
United  States  has  been  ordered  by  a  NAFTA  tribunal  to  open  its  road  to  Mexico- 
domiciled  trucks  regardless  of  whether  the  vehicles  or  drivers  meet  U.S.  safety 
standards. Under the WTO, U.S. tax, environmental, anti-dumping, safeguard, pro-
curement  and  gambling  policies  have  all  been  challenged.  The  United  States  has 
been the number one target of challenges at the WTO, where domestic laws are al-
most  always  ruled  against  in  tribunal  hearings.  The  United  States’  record  at  the 
WTO  is  also  unique  in  that  its  win  record  for  cases  it  has  brought  against  other 
countries  at  WTO  is  lower  than  the  average  win  rate,  as  you  can  see  in  this  table. 

U.S. WTO Disputes 

United States as 

Complainant 

United States as 

Respondent 

All Disputes (including U.S. 

and non-U.S. cases) 

Complainant Win 

Respondent Win 

24 

5 

43 

7 

114 

15 

% Cases Won By Complainant 

82.8% 

86.0% 

88.4% 

The United States has lost an array of WTO attacks against domestic public inter-
est  laws,  a  pattern  which  extends  to  successful  WTO  attacks  on  other  nations’  envi-
ronmental,  food  safety  and  other  public  interest  laws.  The  United  States  weakened 
gasoline cleanliness standards after a successful WTO assault on Clean Air Act reg-
ulations  by  several  countries.  Even  though  the  United  States  signed  a  global  envi-
ronmental treaty called the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Spe-
cies,  American  rules  requiring  shrimp  fishers  not  to  kill  sea  turtles  were  diluted 
after  a  WTO  challenge  to  U.S.  Endangered  Species  Act  regulations  enforcing  the 
treaty. The U.S. Marine Mammal Protection Act was weakened after Mexico threat-
ened  WTO  action  to  enforce  an  outstanding  ruling  against  the  law  under  the  Gen-
eral  Agreement  on  Tariffs  and  Trade  (GATT).  Now  the  dolphin-safe  label  no  longer 
means that tuna caught with dolphin-deadly encirclement nets is banned from U.S. 
stores,  but  that  tuna  can  bear  the  dolphin-safe  label  as  long  as  no  dolphin  death 
was observed! These are only a few of the negative results of 9 years of WTO imple-
mentation. 

Non-Trade Public Interest Laws Challenged at WTO 

All Public 

Interest Disputes 

Public Interest Disputes— 

U.S. as Complainant 

Public Interest Disputes— 

U.S. as Respondent 

Complainant Win 

Respondent Win 

16 

3 

7 

2 

% Cases Won By Complainant 

84.2% 

77.8% 

5 

0 

100% 

Domestic laws having nothing to do with trade have been successfully attacked, in-
cluding  the  U.S.  ban  on  Internet  gambling.  A  WTO  enforcement  panel  just  ruled 
that  the  U.S.  Government  failed  to  comply  with  a  2005  final  WTO  order  to  change 
certain laws related to the U.S. ban on Internet gambling. The WTO Internet gam-
bling  ruling  implicates  large  swaths  of  state  and  Federal  gambling  law  unrelated 
to online gaming as potential trade barriers, and a follow-on WTO challenge already 
has been threatened by the European Union. The ruling clears the way for Antigua, 
which  challenged  the  ban,  to  demand  compensation  from  the  United  States,  and  if 
an agreeable deal cannot be struck, to impose trade sanctions. To exact compliance, 
Antigua  could  suspend  benefits  it  extends  to  the  United  States  under  other  WTO 
agreements.  Antigua  could,  for  instance,  suspend  its  observance  of  copyright  and 
patent protections required by the WTO to a degree deemed equivalent to Antigua’s 
commercial  losses  from  its  Internet  gambling  operations  being  excluded  from  the 
U.S.  market.  One  of  the  most  significant  consequences  of  the  WTO’s  2005  ruling  is 
that  an  array  of  common  state  gambling  regulations  such  as  gambling  bans,  state 
lotteries  or  exclusive  Indian  gaming  rights,  which  have  the  unintended  effect  of 
keeping  out  private  European  lotteries  and  casinos,  were  implicated  as  trade  viola-
tions  and  placed  in  jeopardy  of  future  challenges.  In  2005,  29  state  attorneys  gen-
eral wrote the Bush Administration seeking withdrawal of the gambling sector from 
WTO jurisdiction. The WTO GATS agreement allows nations to ‘‘take back’’ service 
sectors from WTO jurisdiction, but only after compensating trading partners for lost 
business opportunities. The Bush Administration has refused to do so. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

23 

There  have  been  35  WTO  attacks  on  U.S.  anti-dumping,  countervailing  duty,  and 

safeguard (AD–CVD) law and the United States lost 33 of these cases. 

Anti-Dumping/Countervailing Duty/Safeguards Disputes 

United States as 

Complainant 

United States as 

Respondent 

All AD/CVD/SG cases (any 

country as Respondent) 

Complainant Win 

Respondent Win 

2 

0 

33 

4 

49 

6 

% Cases Won By Complainant 

100% 

89.2% 

89.1% 

Multi-million  dollar  cases  against  the  United  States  are  pending  under  NAFTA’s 
‘‘Chapter 11’’ foreign investor protection enforcement system, while the cost of success-
fully  defending  just  one  NAFTA  Chapter  11  attack  on  U.S.  law  cost  $3  million.  Ca-
nadian  cattle  producers  are  using  NAFTA  to  demand  $300  million  in  compensation 
from  U.S.  taxpayer  funds,  claiming  that  the  Canadian  cattle  import  ban  instituted 
after  mad  cow  disease  was  found  in  Canada  violates  their  NAFTA  rights.  A  Cana-
dian  tobacco  company  is  using  the  private  NAFTA  tribunals  to  attack  the  U.S.  to-
bacco  settlements.  A  California  regulation  requiring  the  backfilling  of  open-pit 
mines has been challenged by a Canadian mining enterprise, which plans to develop 
a  giant  open-pit  cyanide  gold  mine  in  Imperial  Valley,  California,  and  which  owns 
and  operates  similar  mines  around  the  world.  These  are  among  the  48  cases  or 
claims  filed  thus  far  by  corporate  interests  and  investors  under  NAFTA’s  ‘‘Chapter 
11’’  investor  provisions,  which  grant  foreign  interests  more  expansive  legal  rights 
and  privileges  than  those  enjoyed  by  U.S.  citizens  or  corporations.  With  only  14  of 
the 48 cases finalized, some $36 million in taxpayer funds have been granted to five 
corporations  that  have  succeeded  with  their  claims.  These  cases  include  successful 
attacks  on  a  government’s  use  of  zoning  laws  and  operating  permits  to  regulate  a 
toxic  waste  dump  closed  for  contamination  problems,  the  ban  on  cross-border  PCB 
trade, the ban of a toxic chemical and logging regulations. An additional $28 billion 
has  been  claimed  from  investors  in  all  three  NAFTA  nations.  The  U.S.  Govern-
ment’s  legal  costs  for  the  defense  of  just  one  recent  case  topped  $3  million.  Seven 
cases against the United States are currently in active arbitration. 

Imports  of  food  into  the  United  States  have  soared  under  the  WTO  and  NAFTA 
while inspection has declined and ‘‘equivalence’’ rules requires us to accept food that 
does not meet our standards. The WTO and NAFTA have resulted in a dramatic in-
crease of dangerous food being imported into the United States.41 The rules of these 
agreements have also greatly restricted the United States’ ability to protect the pub-
lic  from  unsafe  food.  Imported  food  is  more  than  three  times  more  likely  to  be  con-
taminated  with  illegal  pesticide  residues  than  U.S.-grown  food,  according  to  new 
analysis  of  FDA  data.  Meanwhile  U.S.  food  imports  have  skyrocketed,  U.S.  inspec-
tions of imported food have declined significantly.42 Imports of Mexican crops docu-
mented by the U.S. Government to be at a high risk of pesticide contamination have 
dramatically  increased  under  NAFTA,  while  inspection  has  decreased.  Approxi-
mately  74  U.S.  import  inspectors  are  responsible  for  inspecting  nearly  2.4  billion 
pounds of imported meat and poultry. Food-borne illness is on the rise globally and 
in  the  United  States  due  in  part  to  the  ‘‘globalization’’  of  the  food  supply.  NAFTA 
and  WTO  require  the  United  States  to  accept  imports  of  food  meeting  ‘‘equivalent’’ 
but  no  U.S.  safety  standards.  For  instance,  the  Uruguay  Round  Agreements  Act 
made  statutory  changes  to  the  Federal  Meat  Inspections  Act  and  the  Poultry  Prod-
ucts Inspection Act that in 1995 resulted in a minor, seemingly insignificant change 
to  the  U.S.  meat  and  poultry  regulations,  when  the  words  ‘‘equal  to’’  were  replaced 
with  the  word  ‘‘equivalent’’—a  statutory  change  in  the  trade  implementing  legisla-
tion  that  was  then  used  to  change  the  regulations  applying  to  imported  meat.43 
Under the trade agreement-required new rules, more than 40 nations’ meat inspec-
tion systems have been declared equivalent and imports are now allowed and obtain 
USDA  labels,  even  though  some  of  this  imported  food  is  inspected  by  company  em-
ployees, not independent government inspectors as required under U.S. law.44 
Conclusion: Replace the Past Track With a Good Process to Change Course 

from Our Failed Status Quo Trade Policies 

Fast Track was designed 30 years ago as a way to deal with traditional tariff and 
quota-focused  trade  deals.  Today’s  ‘‘trade’’  agreements  affect  a  broad  range  of  do-
mestic  non-trade  issues  like  local  prevailing  wage  laws,  Buy-America  procurement 
policy,  anti-offshoring  measures,  food  safety,  land  use  and  zoning,  the  environment 
and even local tax laws. Congress, state officials and the public need a new modern 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

24 

procedure  for  developing  U.S.  trade  policy  that  is  appropriate  to  the  reality  of  21st 
century globalization agreements. 

Fast Track’s structural design ensures Congress cannot hold Executive Branch ne-
gotiators accountable to meet the negotiating objectives Congress sets in Fast Track 
legislation.  Thus,  simply  adding  new  negotiating  objectives  to  the  existing  Fast 
Track structure, for instance regarding labor and environmental issues, will not re-
sult  in  trade  agreements  that  reflect  Congress’  goals  and  objectives.  In  fact,  the 
1988  Fast  Track  used  to  negotiate  and  pass  NAFTA  and  WTO  explicitly  required 
that  labor  rights  be  included  in  U.S.  trade  agreements.  President  George  Herbert 
Walker  Bush  and  his  negotiators  simply  ignored  these  objectives,  while  satisfying 
the  negotiating  objectives  desired  by  their  business  supporters.  Under  Fast  Track, 
the Bush Administration was empowered to sign such agreements despite failing to 
meet Congress’ labor rights objectives and submit them for a no-amendments, expe-
dited  vote.  Members  of  Congress  were  thus  forced  into  a  position  of  having  to  vote 
against  these  entire  agreements,  having  no  earlier  recourse  to  ensure  the  agree-
ments met the objectives necessary to make them supportable. 

This  is  because  Fast  Track  ensures  that  Congress’  role  is  performed  too  late  to 
do any good: Congress only gets a ‘‘yes’’ or ‘‘no’’ vote on a trade agreement after it’s 
been  signed  and  ‘‘entered  into.’’  That  vote  also  OKs  hundreds  of  changes  to  wide 
swaths  of  U.S.  non-trade  law  to  conform  our  policies  to  what  the  ‘‘trade’’  deals  re-
quire.  By  eliminating  Congress’  right  to  approve  an  agreement’s  contents  before  it 
is signed, Fast Track also allows outrageous provisions to be ‘‘super glued’’ onto ac-
tual  trade  provisions.  Did  the  U.S.  Congress  really  intend  to  extend  U.S.  drug  pat-
ent terms from the pre-WTO 17-year terms to the WTO-required 20-year terms? Be-
cause  under  Fast  Track,  Congress  never  had  the  ability  to  review,  much  less  vote 
on  the  WTO  text  before  it  was  signed,  this  and  numerous  other  outrageous  non- 
trade policy changes were bundled in with legitimate trade provisions. 

Federalism is also flattened by Fast Track. In a form of international pre-emption, 
state  officials  also  must  conform  our  local  laws  to  hundreds  of  pages  of  non-trade 
domestic policy restrictions in these ‘‘trade’’ pacts, yet state officials do not even get 
Congress’  cursory  role.  Fast  Track  is  how  we  got  stuck  with  NAFTA,  WTO  and 
other race-to-the-bottom deals. 

Fast  Track  trashes  the  ‘‘checks  and  balances’’  that  are  essential  to  our  democ-
racy—handcuffing  Congress,  state  officials  and  the  public  so  we  cannot  hold  U.S. 
negotiators  accountable  during  trade  negotiations  while  corporate  lobbyists  call  the 
shots. In one lump sum, Fast Track: 

launch negotiations. 

• Delegates  away  Congress’  ability  to  veto  the  choice  of  countries  with  which  to 
• Delegates  away  Congress’  constitutional  authority  to  set  the  substantive  rules 
for  international  commerce.  Congress  lists  ‘‘negotiating  objectives,’’  but  these 
are  not  mandatory  or  enforceable  and  Executive  Branch  negotiators  regularly 
ignore  them.  In  fact,  the  1988  Fast  Track  used  for  NAFTA  and  WTO  explicitly 
required that labor rights be included in U.S. trade agreements. 
• Fast Track permits the Executive Branch to sign trade agreements before Con-
gress  votes  on  them,  locking  down  the  text  and  creating  a  false  sense  of  crisis 
regarding congressional wishes to change provisions of a signed agreement. 
• Fast  Track  empowers  the  Executive  Branch  to  write  legislation  (Congress’  con-
stitutional  role),  circumvent  normal  congressional  committee  review,  suspend 
Senate  cloture  and  other  procedures,  and  have  guaranteed  ‘‘privileged’’  House 
and  Senate  floor  votes  90  days  after  the  president  usurps  one  more  congres-
sional role by submitting legislation (Congress’ role). 
• Fast  Track  rules  forbids  all  amendments  and  permits  only  20  hours  of  debate 

on the signed deal and conforming changes to U.S. law. 

All  of  these  authorities  are  transferred  to  the  Executive  Branch  conditioned  only 
on the requirement the Executive Branch gives Congress 90-day notice of its intent 
to  start  negotiations  with  a  country  and  then  another  90-day  notice  before  it  signs 
a completed agreement. Congress has no recourse to revoke its delegation of author-
ity  if  the  Executive  Branch  ignores  the  negotiating  objectives  Congress  lists  in  its 
Fast Track statutes. The closed rule, expedited procedures for consideration can only 
be revoked for failure to go through specific notices and formal consultations, while 
failure to listen is not actionable. 

Fast  Track  must  be  replaced  so  that  we  can  steer  a  new  course  on  trade  policy. 
Critical  to  such  a  new  system  is  restoring  Congress’  ability  to  control  the  contents 
of  U.S.  trade  agreements,  as  well  as  empowering  Congress  to  decide  with  which 
countries  it  is  in  our  national  interest  to  negotiate  new  agreements.  Because  the 
Constitution grants the Executive Branch the exclusive authority to negotiate on be-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

25 

half  of  the  United  States  with  foreign  sovereigns,  a  system  of  cooperation  between 
the  Congress  and  Executive  Branch  is  needed.  However,  in  contrast  to  Fast  Track, 
which  by  its  very  structural  design  sidelines  Congress,  a  new  trade  negotiating 
mechanism must provide early and regular opportunities for Congress to hold nego-
tiators accountable to the substantive objectives Congress sets. 

This is needed to ensure future pacts contain terms beneficial to most Americans. 
With a new forward-looking trade negotiating process, we can ensure U.S. trade ex-
pansion  policy  meets  the  needs  of  America’s  working  families,  farmers  and  small 
businesses. 
Endnotes 

1 Article  1–7-clause  1:  ‘‘All  bills  for  raising  Revenues  shall  originate  in  the  House 
of  Representatives,  but  the  Senate  may  propose  or  concur  with  Amendments  as  on 
other Bills.’’ 

2 Stephen  W.  Schondelmeyer,  ‘‘Economic  Impact  of  GATT  Patent  Extension  on 
Currently  Marketed  Drugs,’’  PRIME  Institute,  College  of  Pharmacy,  University  of 
Minnesota, March 1995, at Table 1. 

3 Stephen  W.  Schondelmeyer,  ‘‘The  Extension  of  GATT  Patent  Extension  on  Cur-
rently Marketed Drugs,’’ PRIME Institute, University of Minnesota, March 1995, at 
6–7. 

4 William  Cline,  Trade  and  Income  Distribution,  (Washington,  D.C.:  Peterson  In-

stitute for International Economics, 1997). 

5 Dean Baker and Mark Weisbrot, ‘‘Will New Trade Gains Make Us Rich?’’ Center 

for Economic and Policy Research (CEPR) Paper, October 2001. 

6 Remarks  by  Ambassador  Karan  Bhatia,  Deputy  U.S.  Trade  Representative  at 
Yonsei  University,  Oct.  24,  2006.  Available  at  http://seoul.usembassy.gov/ 
embact102406.html. 

7 From  numbers  for  the  USDA’s  ‘‘limited  resources,’’  ‘‘farming  occupation—lower 
sales,’’ and ‘‘farming occupation—higher sales’’ farm typology categories. See USDA’s 
Economic  Research  Service’s  ‘‘Farm  Business  and  Household  Survey  Data:  Cus-
tomized  Data  Summaries  for  Agricultural  Resource  Management  Survey,’’  for  num-
bers  after  1996,  and  ‘‘Farm  structure:  historic  data  on  farm  operator  household  in-
come’’ data tables for numbers prior to 1996. 

8 Foreign  Agricultural  Trade  of  the  United  States,  available  at  http:// 

www.ers.usda.gov/Data/FATUS/. 

Forum, 15(2), Summer 2006. 

9 Bob  Baugh  and  Joel  Yudken,  ‘‘Is  Deindustrialization  Inevitable?’’  New  Labor 

10 L.  Josh  Bivens,  ‘‘Trade  Deficits  and  Manufacturing  Job  Loss:  Correlation  and 

Causality,’’ Economic Policy Institute Briefing Paper 171, March 14, 2006. 

11 Department  of  Labor  Trade  Adjustment  Assistance  certifications,  at  http:// 

www.citizen.org/trade/forms/taalinfo.cfm. 

12 Lawrence  Mishel,  Jared  Bernstein,  and  Sylvia  Allegretto,  State  of  Working 
America 2006–2007, (Washington, D.C.: Economic Policy Institute, 2006), Table 3.30 
at 175. 

13 Henri Capron and Olivier Debande, ‘‘The Role of the Manufacturing Base in the 
Development  of  Private  and  Public  Services,’’  Regional  Studies,  Vol.  31:7,  October 
1997,  at  681.  For  an  overview  of  these  issues,  see  Adam  Hersh  and  Christian 
Weller,  ‘‘Does  Manufacturing  Matter?’’  Challenge,  vol.  46,  no.  2,  March–April  2003. 
14 Corliss  Lentz,  ‘‘Why  Some  Communities  Pay  More  Than  Others?  The  Example 
of  Illinois  Teachers,’’  Public  Administration  Review,  58:2,  March–April  1998.  This 
study  shows  that  high  levels  of  manufacturing  employment  are  associated  with 
higher starting salaries for public school educators. 

15 David  Brady  and  Michael  Wallace,  ‘‘Deindustrialization  and  Poverty:  Manufac-
turing  Decline  and  AFDC  Recipiency  in  Lake  County,  Indiana,  1964–93,’’  Socio-
logical Forum, Vol. 16, Number 2, 2001. 

16 Robert  Forrant,  ‘‘Greater  Springfield  Deindustrialization:  Staggering  Job  Loss, 
A  Shrinking  Revenue  Base,  and  Grinding  Decline,’’  University  of  Massachusetts- 
Lowell Working Paper, April 2005. 

17 See http://www.citizen.org/trade/subFederal/services/ for more detail. 
18 Marla Dickerson, ‘‘‘Off-shoring’ Trend Casting a Wider Net,’’ Los Angeles Times, 

Jan. 4, 2004. 

March–April 2006. 

19 Robert D. Atkinson, ‘‘Understanding the Offshore Challenge,’’ Progressive Policy 

Institute Policy Report, May 24, 2004. 

20 Alan S. Blinder, ‘‘Off-shoring: The Next Industrial Revolution?’’ Foreign Affairs, 

21 Lori Wallach, Fiona Wright and Chris Slevin, ‘‘Addressing the Regulatory Vacu-
um: Policy Considerations Regarding Public and Private Sector Service Job Off-shor-
ing,’’ Public Citizen’s Global Trade Watch, June 2004. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

26 

22 Lael  Brainard,  Robert  E.  Litan,  and  Nicholas  Warren,  ‘‘Insuring  America’s 
Workers  in  a  New  Era  of  Off-shoring,’’  Brookings  Institution  Policy  Brief  No.  143, 
July 2005, at 2. 

23 Thomas Piketty and Emmanuel Saez, ‘‘The Evolution of Top Incomes: A Histor-
ical  and  International  Perspective,’’  National  Bureau  of  Economic  Research  Paper 
11955, January 2006; numbers updated through 2005 in a March 2007 extract. 

24 Kate  Bronfenbrenner,  ‘‘The  Effects  of  Plant  Closing  or  Threat  of  Plant  Closing 
on  the  Right  of  Workers  to  Organize,’’  North  American  Commission  for  Labor  Co-
operation Report, 1997. 

25 Peronet  Despeignes,  ‘‘Poll:  Enthusiasm  for  free  trade  fades;  Dip  sharpest  for 

$100K set; loss of jobs cited,’’ USA Today, Feb. 24, 2004. 

26 UNCTAD, Least Developed Countries Report, 2002, at 17. 
27 U.N.  Development  Program,  ‘‘Human  Development  Report:  Millennium  Devel-

opment Goals: A compact among nations to end human poverty,’’ 2003, at 39. 

28 United Nations Conference on Trade and Development (UNCTAD), Least Devel-

oped Countries Report, 1998, at 3. 

29 Mark Weisbrot, Robert Naiman and Joyce Kim, ‘‘The Emperor Has No Growth: 
Declining  Economic  Growth  Rates  in  the  Era  of  Globalization,’’  CEPR  Paper,  No-
vember 2000. 

30 Mark Weisbrot, Dean Baker and David Rosnick, ‘‘Scorecard on Development: 25 

Years of Diminished Progress,’’ CEPR Paper, September 2006. 

31 Shaohua  Chen  and  Martin  Ravaillon,  ‘‘How  Have  the  World’s  Poorest  Fared 
since  the  Early  1980s?’’  World  Bank  Research  Observer,  Vol.  19,  Number  2,  2004, 
at 152–3. 

32 Food and Agriculture Organization, ‘‘The State of Food Insecurity in the World,’’ 

United Nations Report, 2005, at 6. 

Policy Institute, September 2006. 

33 Carlos  Salas,  ‘‘Between  Unemployment  and  Insecurity  in  Mexico,’’  Economic 

34 ‘‘Chinese farmers face bleak future,’’ BBC News, Dec. 14, 2000. 
35 Jeffrey S. Passel and Roberto Suro, ‘‘Rise, Peak and Decline: Trends in U.S. Im-
migration  1992–2004,’’  September  2005,  Pew  Hispanic  Center,  at  39;  George  J. 
Borjas and Lawrence J. Katz, ‘‘The Evolution of the Mexican-Born Workforce in the 
United  States,’’  March  2006;  World  Bank  data;  John  Audley,  Sandra  Polaski, 
Demetrios  G.  Papademetriou,  and  Scott  Vaughan,  ‘‘NAFTA’s  Promise  and  Reality: 
Lessons  from  Mexico  for  the  Hemisphere,’’  Carnegie  Endowment  for  International 
Peace Report, November 2003. 

36 Somini  Sengupta,  ‘‘On  India’s  Farms,  a  plague  of  suicide,’’  New  York  Times, 
Sept. 19, 2006; Anders Riel Mu¨ ller and Raj Patel, ‘‘Shining India? Economic Liberal-
ization  and  Rural  Poverty  in  the  1990s,’’  Food  First  Policy  Brief  No.  10,  May  2004. 
37 Mark Weisbrot, Dean Baker and David Rosnick, ‘‘Scorecard on Development: 25 

Years of Diminished Progress,’’ CEPR Paper, September 2006. 

38 Todd  Tucker,  ‘‘The  Uses  of  Chile:  How  Politics  Trumped  Truth  in  the  Neo-Lib-
eral  Revision  of  Chile’s  Development,’’  Public  Citizen’s  Global  Trade  Watch,  Sep-
tember 2006. 

39 See e.g., Agreement Establishing the WTO, Article XVI–4. 
40 Michelle Sager, One Voice or Many? Federalism and International Trade, (New 

York: LFB Scholarly Publishing LLC, 2002), at 94. 

41 U.S.  Department  of  Agriculture,  Foreign  Agricultural  Service  import  statistics. 
42 ‘‘Much  Is  Being  Done  To  Protect  Agriculture  From  A  Terrorist  Attack,  But  Im-
portant  Challenges  Remain,’’  Government  Accountability  Office,  GAO  05–214, 
March 2005. 

43 60 Fed. Reg. 38667, Jul. 28, 1995. 
44 ‘‘The  WTO  Comes  to  Dinner:  U.S.  Implementation  of  Trade  Rules  Bypasses 

Food, Safety Requirements,’’ Public Citizen, July 2003. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Ms.  Wallach,  thank  you  very  much  for  your 
testimony. Next we will hear from John Johnston, who is a Found-
ing  Partner  at  Modern  Metal  Cutting,  an  Akron,  Ohio  company 
that offers precision cutting and machining of steel products. He is 
also a Member of the U.S. Business and Industry Council, an orga-
nization  that  advocates  for  fair  trade  policies.  Mr.  Johnston,  wel-
come.  Thank  you  for  traveling  to  this  hearing.  You  may  proceed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

27 

STATEMENT OF JOHN JOHNSTON, PARTNER, 

MODERN METAL CUTTING, LLC 

Mr.  JOHNSTON.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  members  of 
the  Committee  and  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  the 
vital  question,  is  free  trade  working?  The  short  answer  is  no  and 
I’ll explain why in a minute. 

My  name  is  John  Johnston  and  I’ve  been  involved  in  manufac-
turing  in  Ohio  for  16  years.  My  company,  Modern  Metal  Cutting, 
offers  precision  cutting  and  machining  of  tubes  and  other  special 
shapes. I am active in several regional and national manufacturing 
organizations,  including  an  Akron  organization  of  small  companies 
that do precision metalworking. 

I  also  sit  on  an  organization,  NEOCAM  and  from  that  vantage 
point,  I  can  tell  you  that  Northeast  Ohio  has  been  hit  especially 
hard  over  the  last  two  decades.  Anyone  who  takes  the  short  ride 
into downtown Cleveland from the airport and sees the abandoned 
factories  knows  something  has  gone  wrong  and  in  the  rest  of  the 
industrial heartland of our country as well. 

I’ve been committed to strengthening manufacturing in my home 
region  and  state  and  in  the  Nation  at  large  all  my  adult  life,  but 
it  seems  to  me  that  domestic  manufacturers  face  a  stacked  deck. 
We  face  predatory  foreign  competition  that  U.S.  trade  policy  has 
failed  to  address  in  a  meaningful  way.  As  a  consequence,  a  major 
overhaul of U.S. trade policy is needed. 

Has free trade worked for Ohio and for Ohio manufacturing? For 
me, the answer is clearly no. From 1997 to 2004, goods production 
in our manufacturing-heavy state dropped nearly 9 percent in real 
terms,  the  worst  absolute  performance  in  the  country  and  the 
fourth  worst  in  percentage  terms.  Between  1997  and  2006,  Ohio 
lost more than 22 percent of its total manufacturing jobs and near-
ly  25  percent  of  its  jobs  in  durable  goods  industries.  Wages  in  the 
state’s  goods  producing  sector  fell  15.7  percent  from  1997  through 
2005, the worst performance in America. 

Why  do  I  blame  ineffective  U.S.  trade  policies  for  these  prob-
lems?  When  I  look  at  the  recent  trade  performance  of  some  of  the 
manufacturing  sectors  that  are  among  Ohio’s  largest,  it  is  difficult 
to ignore the very strong connection. 

For  example,  between  1997  and  2006,  the  U.S.  trade  deficit  for 
durable  goods  industries  increased  by  nearly  260  percent  and 
transportation  equipment  grew  by  nearly  155  percent  and  fab-
ricated  metals,  where  I  work,  grew  by  a  factor  of  10.  In  non-elec-
trical machinery, America ran a surplus of $14.4 billion in 1997. By 
last year, that had turned into a deficit of just less than $12 billion. 
The  U.S.  Business  and  Industry  Council  calculates  that  in  the 
past 10 years, 96 percent of our Nation’s key manufacturing sectors 
lost shares of their own home U.S. market. In dozens of cases, im-
ports now control more than half of the U.S. market and among the 
biggest  losers  are  high  tech  sectors  such  as  aircraft  engines  and 
parts  as  well  as  machine  tools  of  any  kind,  also  in  power  genera-
tion equipment. These sectors represent the heart of any industrial 
economy  in  the  21st  century  and  their  loss  points  to  some  of  the 
key problems caused by our misguided trade policies. 

As  a  businessman,  I  can’t  help  but  be  worried  by  these  trends. 
With  our  mammoth  trade  deficit,  the  United  States  is  buying  far 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

28 

more  from  the  rest  of  the  world  than  what  we  are  selling;  and  I 
have  a  hard  time  believing  the  rest  of  the  world  is  going  to  con-
tinue to fund this over-consumption. 

I  also  keep  hearing  and  reading  that  I  shouldn’t  be  concerned 
about  the  loss  of  U.S.  manufacturing  jobs  because  it’s  a  sign  of 
soaring  productivity.  Frankly,  I  don’t  see  any  correlation  between 
productivity  gains  and  loss  of  factories  and  jobs.  Some  of  our  best- 
run companies are now going to disappear. 

So  how  exactly  has  trade  policy  contributed  to  these  problems? 
Two points—the first being, foreign governments intervene in trade 
flows all the time in different ways and for their own benefit. They 
erect  tariff  and  non-tariff  barriers  to  protect  their  own  industries. 
They heavily subsidize producers on their home soil, including with 
value-added tax rebates on exports. They manipulate the exchange 
rates  of  their  currency.  They  steal  intellectual  property  and  they 
dump  products  into  our  market  below  the  cost  of  what  it  is  to 
produce it in their own market. 

These  trade  practices  represent  the  way  business  is  done  all 
around  the  world  with  one  exception—the  United  States.  And  yet, 
U.S.  trade  policy,  for  far  too  long,  has  aimed  at  opening  our  home 
market  to  exactly  these  types  of  producers  even  as  they  cheat 
against us in all the ways I’ve just described to you. 

Second, our trade deals keep picking the wrong target countries. 
We  sign  trade  agreements  with  developing  counties  that  simply 
cannot  afford  our  exports.  Bilateral  trade  agreements  with  small, 
impoverished  economies,  do  very  little  to  enhance  U.S.  manufac-
turing exports. If the main purpose of U.S. trade policy is to create 
more business for domestic companies and enhance the standard of 
living  of  the  employees,  then  our  aim  has  been  completely  cock-
eyed. 

It’s  gratifying  to  see  the  new  and  innovative  approach  that  the 
110th  Congress  is  taking  on  trade  policy.  I  am  very  pleased,  Mr. 
Chairman,  that  you  have  introduced  legislation  to  bring  our  im-
ports  and  exports  into  line  with  an  auction  quota  system.  Enhanc-
ing  workers’  rights  and  environmental  protection  around  the  globe 
are  all  worthy  objectives  for  trade  policy  though  it  is  important 
that  the  Congress  hold  firm  to  its  principles  in  any  negotiation  on 
these issues with the Bush Administration. 

These  are  all  worthy  goals  and  yet  they  are  not  sufficient  to  aid 
domestic  manufacturers  and  other  producers  that  create  jobs  and 
wealth and to accomplish that, there must be trade flows that must 
change dramatically and significantly and now. 

Here  is  what  I  believe  is  really  needed.  First,  a  moratorium  on 
the  signing  of  any  new  trade  agreements  until  major  pro-domestic 
producer  and  worker  trade  strategies  are  identified  and  put  in 
place.  Congress  might  consider  appointing  a  broad-based  national 
commission to carry out this mission. 

Second,  Congress  should  reject  new  Fast  Track  authority  until 
we have in place trade policies that stop the erosion of our national 
industrial base. 

Third,  we  need  specific  legislation  such  as  the  Ryan-Hunter  cur-
rency  manipulation  bill.  And  further,  a  border  equalization  tax  to 
address the unfair advantage caused by the rebate of VAT taxes in 
over 150 of our trading partners. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

29 

Institute  major  legislation  to  begin  to  reduce  the  trade  deficit. 
The approach could be an import quota, an auction system, as rec-
ommended  by  Chairman  Dorgan  or  it  could  be  a  trade  balancing 
temporary  import  surcharge  as  proposed  by  Representative  Mike 
Michaud.  These  approaches,  both  of  which  could  be  designed  to  be 
consistent  with  WTO  rules,  would  rapidly  get  the  trade  deficit 
under control. In addition, they would save the world trade system 
as a whole, which is dangerously out of balance today. 

I’ve  listed  more  detailed  recommendations  in  my  written  testi-
mony  but  these  would  be  an  important  start.  Their  passage  would 
go  a  long  way  toward  allowing  domestic  businesses  a  chance  to 
compete on a fair and equal basis with our foreign counterparts. 

I  thank  you  for  the  consideration  of  my  views.  I  look  forward  to 

answering any questions that you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Johnston follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN JOHNSTON, PARTNER, 

MODERN METAL CUTTING, LLC 

Good morning, Mr. Chairman, and Members of the Committee, and thank you for 
the opportunity to testify on the vital question ‘‘Is ‘Free Trade’ Working?’’ The short 
answer is ‘‘no’’ and I’ll explain why in a minute. 

My  name  is  John  Johnston,  and  I  have  been  involved  in  manufacturing  in  Ohio 
for  16  years.  Two  years  ago,  I  helped  to  found  a  new  metal  services  venture  called 
Modern Metal Cutting, which offers our customers precision cutting and machining 
of tubes and other metal shapes. 

I  have  also  been  active  in  several  regional  and  national  manufacturing  organiza-
tions.  Since  1997,  I  have  been  a  Board  member  of  the  Summit  County  Machine 
Shop Group, an Akron-area organization of small companies in the precision metal- 
working  sector.  These  firms,  generally  family-held  for  generations,  specialize  in 
quickly turning around constantly changing small orders of highly customized parts 
and  components  of  larger  industrial  products.  From  2001  to  2006,  I  served  as  the 
organization’s president. 

In addition, I sit on the Steering Committee of the Northeast Ohio Campaign for 
American  Manufacturing  or  NEOCAM.  NEOCAM  is  a  regional  coalition  formed  to 
promote awareness of domestic manufacturing’s importance, and to improve its com-
petitiveness. Northeast Ohio has been hit especially hard over the last two decades 
by trade policies that allow our foreign competitors to take advantage of unfair gov-
ernment  programs  designed  to  boost  manufacturing—and  our  government  does 
nothing  in  response.  Anyone  who  makes  the  short  ride  into  downtown  Cleveland 
from  the  airport—and  sees  the  abandoned  factories—knows  something  went  very 
wrong in Northeast Ohio—and the rest of the industrial heartland. 

In recent years I have been pleased to work with the U.S. Business and Industry 
Council.  This  national  business  organization  is  composed  of  1,500  member  compa-
nies  that  are  mainly  smaller,  family-held  domestic  manufacturers.  For  decades,  its 
Washington  advocacy  efforts  have  focused  on  ensuring  that  national-level  domestic 
and  international  policies  preserve  and  strengthen  industry  in  the  United  States. 
They supply the national and international political perspective that is often lacking 
in our local organizations. 

In  sum,  I  have  been  committed  to  strengthening  manufacturing  in  my  home  re-
gion and state, and in the Nation at large, all my adult life. I want to believe strong-
ly in its future. In fact, I’ve got my money on it. But I also want to make very clear 
that  my  commitment—and  those  of  thousands  of  other  manufacturers  like  me— 
alone  is  not  enough.  No  matter  how  hard  we  try,  we  can’t  win  in  a  policy  environ-
ment  stacked  against  us.  Our  efforts  can  still  be  defeated  by  unwise  Federal  poli-
cies—especially unwise trade policies. 

Because  I  have  been  very  deeply  involved  in  sales  and  marketing,  I  have  visited 
companies  throughout  the  Midwest.  I  know  firsthand  that  in  the  globalized  Amer-
ican economy many of these firms have had to continually reinvent themselves with 
new  technologies,  new  management  techniques  and  new  business  models.  Many  of 
these dynamic businesses have been very successful; others have not. 

My hometown and region also understand that local and state government policies 
can  be  crucial  to  the  health  of  their  manufacturing  bases.  Our  recent  economic  dif-
ficulties have sparked a major burst of community development initiatives and coali-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

30 

tion-building  involving  business,  the  public  sector,  and  the  nonprofit  sector.  Manu-
facturers  in  Ohio,  and  particularly  northern  Ohio,  know  that  they  need  to  be 
proactive doers and big-picture thinkers. We are not sitting around idly waiting for 
protection. 

Nevertheless,  our  efforts  must  be  complemented  with  major  changes  at  the  Fed-
eral level, and nothing is more essential than an overhaul of Washington’s approach 
to  a  broad  range  of  international  trade-related  issues.  The  U.S.  role  in  the  global 
economy  is  Washington’s  responsibility—especially  because  we  live  in  a  world  in 
which foreign governments fight hard for the interests of their businesses and have 
no reluctance to use all the resources and influence at their disposal to get this job 
done.  Indeed,  under  the  Constitution,  the  right  to  regulate  foreign  commerce  rests 
with  the  Congress.  Thank  you  for  taking  that  responsibility  seriously  at  this  Com-
mittee. 

The  needed  overhaul  of  U.S.  trade  policy  has  to  reflect  the  interests  of  domestic 
businesses, which are too often absent from policy deliberations in Washington, D.C. 
If  new  U.S.  trade  policies  don’t  actually  change  trade  flows  by  changing  the  condi-
tions  companies  like  mine  face  both  at  home  and  abroad,  they  won’t  bring  us  a 
dime’s worth of new business, they won’t create or preserve a single new American 
job, and they won’t raise the wages or benefits of a single American worker. 

Has  ‘‘free  trade’’  worked  for  Ohio  and  for  Ohio  manufacturing?  It’s  impossible  to 
look  at  my  state’s  economy  and  say  ‘‘Yes.’’  The  latest  Census  data  tell  us  that,  as 
of  2004,  Ohio  was  the  Nation’s  third  largest  producer  of  goods.  But  in  the  7  years 
prior  to  2004,  goods  production  in  our  manufacturing-heavy  state  dropped  nearly  9 
percent  in  real  terms—the  worst  performance  in  the  country  and  the  fourth  worst 
in percentage terms. 

Between 1997 and 2006, Ohio lost more than 22 percent of its total manufacturing 
jobs  and  nearly  25  percent  of  its  jobs  in  durable  goods  industries.  The  latter  still 
account  for  nearly  70  percent  of  the  state’s  manufacturing  employment,  and  they 
pay among the state’s best wages—as they do nationwide. That’s surely why wages 
in the state’s goods-producing sector overall—which paid more than 24 percent bet-
ter  than  the  service  sector  according  to  the  latest  figures—fell  15.7  percent  from 
1997 to 2005—the worst performance in America. 

Why do I blame ineffective U.S. trade policies? Clearly, they’re not the only factor. 
But  I  look  at  the  recent  trade  performance  of  some  of  the  manufacturing  sectors 
that are among Ohio’s biggest, and it’s difficult to ignore the very strong connection. 
For  example,  between  1997  and  last  year,  the  U.S.  trade  deficit  for  durable  goods 
industries increased by nearly 260 percent. In transportation equipment, it grew by 
nearly  155  percent.  In  fabricated  metals—my  sector—it  exploded  by  more  than  a 
factor  of  10.  In  non-electrical  machinery,  America  ran  a  surplus  of  $14.4  billion  in 
1997. By last year, that had turned into a deficit of $11.9 billion. 

The  net  effect  of  these  figures  means  fewer  opportunities  for  sales  abroad  and 
often  reduced  sales  at  home.  An  even  clearer  picture  of  the  damage  comes  from  re-
search  on  import  penetration  in  U.S.  manufacturing  industries  that  has  been  pub-
lished  in  recent  years  by  the  U.S.  Business  and  Industry  Council.  Import  penetra-
tion  is  an  economist’s  way  of  saying  how  much  of  the  U.S.  home  market  is  being 
taken away from domestic manufacturers and captured by foreign imports. 

The Council has looked at how much of the U.S. market has been won by imports 

over the last 10 years in over 100 categories. It’s not a pretty picture. 

An astonishing 96 percent of these sectors—which are all capital- and technology- 
intensive  industries—lost  U.S.  market  share  to  imports  during  this  period.  That’s 
the  market  they’re  supposed  to  know  best.  That’s  the  market  where  they  face  no 
trade  barriers.  In  literally  dozens  of  cases,  import  penetration  at  least  doubled.  In 
dozens  of  cases,  moreover,  imports  now  control  more  than  half  of  the  U.S.  market. 
Among  the  biggest  so-called  ‘‘loser  industries’’  are  sectors  such  as  aircraft  engines 
and parts, machine tools of all kinds, and power generation equipment. 

These  sectors  represent  the  heart  of  the  industrial  economy  of  any  high-income 
country in the 21st century. They generate disproportionately large gains in produc-
tivity,  and  technological  advance.  They  employ  most  of  our  country’s  knowledge 
workers.  And  they,  of  course,  pay  the  best  wages  in  the  entire  economy.  A  country 
that  loses  its  dominance  in  these  industries  is  like  an  athletic  team  that  sits  back 
and  watches  its  star  players  bought  by  rival  teams  willing  to  offer  better  packages 
and conditions. The U.S. is also going to be a country that will face major struggles 
to remain an economic and military superpower. 

These  points  describe  some  of  the  microeconomic  problems  caused  by  our  trade 
policies.  But  we  should  not  forget  the  macroeconomic  threats.  As  a  businessman,  I 
can’t  help  but  be  worried  by  the  American  economy’s  rapid  accumulation  of  titanic 
debts—so much of them resulting from decades of buying from the rest of the world 
much more than we sell. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

31 

I have a hard time believing that the rest of the world is going to continue fund-
ing  our  over-consumption—especially  as  we  become  ever  less  creditworthy,  at  least 
by  normal  financial  standards.  I  would  feel  a  lot  better  about  the  prospects  for  my 
business and my industry—and the Nation at large—if I didn’t know that the dollar 
could  easily  collapse  if  just  a  few  foreign  central  banks  started  hedging  their  bets 
and reducing their dollar holdings. 

I  really  hope  that  we  can  avoid  the  kind  of  worldwide  economic  meltdown  that 
would  result.  Like  most  of  you  I  suspect,  I  am  puzzled  as  to  how  long  the  Nation 
can keep tempting fate. 

I  also  keep  hearing  and  reading  that  I  shouldn’t  be  concerned  about  the  loss  of 
U.S.  manufacturing  jobs  because  it’s  a  sign  of  soaring  productivity.  I  don’t  see  any 
correlation  between  productivity  gains  and  the  loss  of  factories  and  jobs.  Some  of 
our best-run companies are now starting to disappear. 

And as a businessman, I find myself wondering exactly who is going to buy most 
of the products that the world’s factories keep turning out, if not the American con-
sumer?  Unless  we  keep  going  deeper  into  debt,  how  can  we  as  a  nation  keep  up 
the  pace  if  high-paying  manufacturing  jobs  keep  getting  replaced  by  much  lower- 
paying service jobs? 

Are  the  American  customers  for  the  products  I  help  make  really  going  to  be  re-
placed  by  Chinese  or  Indian  customers—on  anything  close  to  a  one-for-one  basis? 
And if so, with trade deficits continually rising at this point, how long is this going 
to take? 

But  how  exactly  has  trade  policy  contributed  to  these  problems?  I’d  like  to  focus 
on two features of this policy. First, as I indicated before, foreign governments inter-
vene  in  trade  flows  all  the  time,  in  countless  ways.  They  erect  tariff  and  non-tariff 
barriers  to  protect  their  own  industries.  They  heavily  subsidize  producers  on  their 
home  soil,  including  with  Value-Added  Tax  rebates  on  exports  that  have  grown  in 
recent decades as tariffs have been cut. They manipulate their exchange rates. They 
steal intellectual property. And they dump products in our market at below the cost 
of production in their home market. 

What’s most important to understand, however, is that our trade problems are not 
limited to one high-profile sector—like steel. And they aren’t limited to one problem 
country—like  China.  Increasingly,  these  practices  represent  the  way  business  is 
done all around the world, throughout the manufacturing sector, with one major ex-
ception—the  United  States.  And  what  our  trade  policy  has  done  for  way  too  long 
has  been  to  open  our  market  wide  to  producers  enjoying  these  advantages—which 
of course include multinational companies that produce overseas—and then tell our 
domestic  firms,  which  manufacture  and  create  economic  benefits  here:  ‘‘You’re  on 
your own. Lots of luck.’’ 

Second, recent Presidents and their trade negotiators keep picking the wrong tar-
get countries to sign trade deals with, at least from the standpoint of strengthening 
manufacturing  at  home.  Just  think  of  the  countries  and  regions  that  have  domi-
nated U.S. trade diplomacy for nearly 20 years—where we’ve signed the most deals: 
Mexico, China, The Caribbean Basin, Central America, Sub-Saharan Africa, Jordan, 
and  more  recently,  Panama,  Colombia,  and  Peru.  Even  the  current  Doha  Round  of 
world  trade  talks  aims  explicitly  at  delivering  most  of  the  benefits  of  expanded, 
freed-up trade to developing countries. 

Signing trade deals with these countries and regions may be justified—if the main 
purpose  of  trade  policy  is  to  create  new  opportunities  for  foreign  workers  and  com-
panies. Or if the main purpose is bolstering U.S. national security and fighting glob-
al  terrorism  by  aiding  populations  that  might  be  receptive  to  the  pitch  of  violent 
extremists.  (Incidentally,  both  of  the  above  assumptions  are  open  to  serious  ques-
tioning.) However, if the central goals of U.S. trade policy are creating more export 
opportunities for domestic companies and raising the standard of living of their em-
ployees, then our aim is completely cockeyed. 

In fact, one of my own Senators, Sherrod Brown, has come up with the most con-
vincing  explanation  for  this  set  of  trade  deal  targets.  As  he  points  out  in  the  case 
of  China,  when  American  multinational  companies  look  at  the  People’s  Republic, 
they don’t mainly see a billion potential new customers. They see a billion potential 
new  workers.  And  by  extension,  the  main  markets  that  the  U.S.  multinationals 
want to export product to are not abroad. They’re at home. 

So  I  agree  with  those  who  argue  that  it’s  completely  misleading  even  to  describe 
most  recent  trade  agreements  as  free  trade  agreements—because  the  aim  can’t  be 
to create sustainable two-way flows of business. Our target countries are either too 
small  or  too  poor  or  too  deeply  in  debt  or  too  protectionist  and  export-oriented  to 
become  big  new  consumers  of  American-made  products  for  the  foreseeable  future. 
But  they  have  tremendous  capability  and  potential  to  supply  the  U.S.  market— 
especially  when  our  multinational  companies  provide  them  with  the  world’s  most 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

32 

advanced production technologies and equally advanced management techniques. As 
a  result,  it’s  best  to  describe  these  deals  as  outsourcing  or  offshoring  agreements. 
Their main purpose is not to expand the worldwide sales of domestic American pro-
ducers.  Instead,  it’s  to  help  multinational  companies  serve  the  U.S.  market  from 
very low-cost, regulation-free production platforms abroad. 

Trade deals such as these—signed with regions with vastly more export than im-
port  potential—can’t  help  but  tremendously  boost  the  U.S.  trade  deficit.  And  they 
can’t  help  but  place  domestic  producers  under  ever  more  pressure—pressure  that 
often has little or nothing to do with free market forces—much less ‘‘free trade.’’ 

What should Congress do about this? I worded this question deliberately—because 
the  ball  is  squarely  in  Congress’  court.  After  more  than  6  years  under  the  current 
administration,  it  is  clear  that  the  White  House  thinks  that  ‘‘more  of  the  same’’ 
trade policies will somehow produce different results. Thus the Administration can’t 
be counted on to be part of the solution. 

As  a  result,  it’s  gratifying  to  see  so  many  Senators  and  Members  of  Congress 
these days vigorously discussing the need to make big changes in U.S. trade policy. 
I am very pleased, Mr. Chairman, that you have introduced legislation to bring our 
imports and exports into line with an auction quota system—an ambitious, sweeping 
plan  that  acknowledges  implicitly  that  piecemeal  solutions  to  these  trade  problems 
will  never  suffice.  I  was  also  very  pleased  by  the  emphasis  that  the  Senate  and 
House  Democratic  freshmen  have  recently  placed  on  new  trade  policies  that  reflect 
the needs of domestic businesses. 

Enhancing worker rights and environmental protections around the globe are wor-
thy  and  appropriate  objectives  for  trade  policy.  Mr.  Chairman,  your  leadership  on 
these  issues  is  greatly  appreciated.  It  is  important  that  the  Congress  hold  firm  in 
current negotiations with the Bush Administration requiring strong and enforceable 
protections for workers and for the environment in new trade agreements. 

Yet from the perspective of domestic companies and industries—the ones that ac-
tually  generate  jobs  and  wealth  and  income  here  at  home—these  issues  cannot  be 
the  main  focus  of  changing  current  trade  policy.  Leveling  the  playing  field  for  com-
panies  such  as  mine  by  changing  the  trade  flows  so  that  we  turn  the  corner  and 
begin to eliminate the trade deficit needs to be the central policy objective. 

What  else  is  needed  to  assist  the  domestic  manufacturers—and  service  providers 
and farmers and ranchers—that make up the vital productive side of our economy? 
It’s  obvious  that  the  first  step  is  to  stop  doing  harm.  The  trade  agreements  that 
the United States negotiates and signs no longer promote more production and em-
ployment  at  home  than  they  send  abroad.  We  as  a  nation  urgently  need  to  figure 
out  how  to  do  trade  policy  right  again.  As  a  result,  I  recommend  that  there  be  a 
moratorium  on  all  new  trade  agreements  until  major,  pro-domestic  producer  and 
worker trade strategies are identified and put in place. Congress might consider ap-
pointing a broad-based national commission to carry out this mission. 

For similar reasons, Congress should reject new Fast Track authority for the Ex-
ecutive—until we have in place trade policies that stop the hemorrhaging of manu-
facturing  plants,  R&D  facilities,  and  the  high-paying/good  benefit  jobs  associated 
with  them.  Nationally,  since  2001,  we  have  lost  more  than  three  million  manufac-
turing  jobs.  Stemming  this  erosion  of  jobs,  skills,  and  our  industrial  base  ought  to 
be the first objective of any new national trade policy. 

In addition, Congress should: 
• Swiftly pass the Ryan-Hunter currency manipulation bill—which already enjoys 
wide,  bipartisan  support.  This  legislation  would  allow  trade  remedy  law  action 
against  foreign  government  manipulation  of  currency  that  is  designed  to  keep 
their values artificially low. 
• Address  the  unfair  advantage  caused  by  the  rebate  of  VAT  taxes  by  over  150 
of our trading partners. To do so, Congress must pass a border equalization tax. 
This tax would apply to foreign goods from VAT countries coming into our mar-
ket. They would be taxed at the same amount as the rebate they received upon 
leaving  the  foreign  country.  We  should  then  use  the  proceeds  to  pay  the  VAT 
tax faced by American exports entering foreign markets. This step would go far 
toward creating a fair and level playing field for U.S. goods and services. 
• Institute  major  legislation  to  begin  to  reduce  the  trade  deficit.  The  approach 
could  be  an  import  quota  and  auction  system  as  recommended  by  Chairman 
Dorgan  or  it  could  be  a  trade-balancing,  temporary  import  surcharge  as  pro-
posed  by  Rep.  Mike  Michaud.  These  approaches,  both  of  which  could  be  de-
signed  to  be  consistent  with  WTO  rules,  would  rapidly  get  the  trade  deficit 
under control. In addition, they would save the world trade system as a whole, 
which is dangerously out of balance today. Countries cannot get rich by export-
ing over-production to the Untied States indefinitely. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

33 

Many  other  things  need  to  be  done,  not  only  in  trade  policy,  but  in  related  tax 
and  regulatory  policies.  These  measures  that  I  have  just  highlighted,  however,  rep-
resent  an  essential  starting  point.  Their  passage  would  put  the  Congress  strongly 
on  record  in  support  of  a  program  that  supports  domestic  manufacturers  and  their 
employees. 

If  these  measurers  were  turned  into  U.S.  policy,  they  would  go  a  long  way  to  al-
lowing  domestic  businesses  the  chance  to  compete  on  a  fair  and  equal  basis  with 
their foreign counterparts. 

Thank  you  for  your  consideration  of  my  views.  I  look  forward  to  answering  any 

questions that you might have. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Johnston, thank you very much. Next we’ll 
hear  from  Christopher  Wenk,  a  Senior  Director  for  International 
Policy at the U.S. Chamber of Commerce. Mr. Wenk, thank you. 

STATEMENT OF CHRISTOPHER WENK, SENIOR DIRECTOR, 
INTERNATIONAL POLICY, U.S. CHAMBER OF COMMERCE 

Mr.  WENK.  Good  morning.  Chairman  Dorgan,  Ranking  Member 
DeMint,  thank  you  for  inviting  the  U.S.  Chamber  of  Commerce  to 
testify today at this hearing on current U.S. trade policy. My name 
is  Christopher  Wenk  and  I  serve  as  the  Senior  Director  for  Inter-
national  Policy  at  the  U.S.  Chamber,  the  world’s  largest  business 
federation. 

Without  question,  free  trade  has  been  one  of  the  cornerstones  of 
our economic successes as a nation. Is free trade working, you ask? 
Absolutely. 

Let’s  consider  the  following  facts.  America’s  international  trade 
in  goods  and  services  accounts  for  roughly  27  percent  of  our  coun-
try’s GDP. Nationwide, our exports directly support 12 million good 
paying  jobs  and  indirectly  support  millions  of  other  jobs.  Imports 
keep inflation low and expand consumer choice and quality. 

More than 57 million Americans are employed by businesses that 
engage in international trade and the benefits reach every state in 
the  Nation,  including  South  Carolina  and  North  Dakota.  The  com-
bined  benefits  of  NAFTA  and  the  Uruguay  Round  Trade  Agree-
ment  that  created  the  WTO  have  increased  U.S.  national  income 
by  $40  to  $60  billion  a  year.  The  combined  effects  of  trade  agree-
ments over the past half-century have raised the annual income of 
the  American  household  by  $10,000.  About  97  percent  of  U.S.  ex-
porters  are  small  or  medium  sized  companies,  which  create  three 
out of four new jobs. 

Having  said  all  of  the  above,  it  is  also  important  to  highlight  a 
fact  that  is  surely  not  well  known  by  members  of  this  Committee 
and  everyday  Americans.  The  U.S.  market  is  already  very  open. 
Seventy percent of our imports face no barriers whatsoever and the 
average  U.S.  tariff  on  remaining  imports  is  very  low,  at  less  than 
2 percent. 

The  Chamber  believes  that  the  time  has  come  for  foreign  coun-
tries  to  cut  their  barriers  down  to  match  our  already  low  level. 
That’s why we support trade liberalization, both multilaterally and 
bilaterally. 

Because our market is so open, free trade agreements negotiated 
by  the  United  States  truly  do  level  the  playing  field  for  farmers, 
ranchers, manufacturers, service providers, and workers. For exam-
ple,  over  the  12  years  since  implementation  of  NAFTA,  U.S.  ex-
ports to Canada and Mexico have surged by well over $200 billion, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

34 

sustaining  literally  millions  of  new  jobs  and  businesses.  Since  the 
U.S.-Chile  FTA  was  implemented  on  January  1,  2004,  it  imme-
diately began to pay dividends. In fact, U.S. exports to Chile nearly 
doubled in its first 2 years. 

The  U.S.  trade  surplus  with  Singapore  nearly  quadrupled  over 
the  first  2  years  of  implementation  of  that  FTA.  In  the  first  year 
of  the  U.S.-Australia  free  trade  agreement,  U.S.  exports  to  Aus-
tralia  grew  by  $1.6  billion,  helping  the  United  States  maintain  an 
$8.4 billion goods trade surplus. 

In  2006,  U.S.  exports  to  Central  America  and  the  Dominion  Re-
public rose by an impressive 16 percent. The U.S. recorded a trade 
surplus  of  $1  billion  with  these  countries  in  2006,  compared  with 
a deficit of $1.6 billion in 2005. 

Today,  just  under  half  of  American  exports  go  to  markets  where 
they  enter  duty  free,  thanks  to  these  FTAs.  In  fact,  our  exports  to 
FTA  partners  are  growing  twice  as  fast  as  our  exports  to  the  rest 
of the world. Further, the Chamber supports prompt Congressional 
action  on  the  FTAs  recently  concluded  with  Peru,  Columbia,  Pan-
ama and Korea, pending a successful conclusion to the ongoing ne-
gotiations between the Hill and the Administration. 

In  a  little  more  than  60  days,  the  President’s  trade  negotiating 
authority will expire. Renewal of this authority is critical to enable 
the United States to continue having a seat at the table negotiating 
world  buy  markets.  Without  this  authority,  the  United  States  will 
be left on the sidelines as other nations negotiate bilateral and re-
gional  trade  deals  without  us,  as  happened  after  TPA  lapsed  in 
1994.  Without  it,  no  foreign  government  will  engage  in  serious 
trade  negotiations  with  the  United  States  and  the  Doha  Develop-
ment Agenda will not be able to unleash its true potential. Failure 
to  renew  the  President’s  trade  negotiating  authority  would  deny 
U.S. trade negotiators a vital tool and risk letting America fall be-
hind in the global economy. 

Regardless  of  who  wins  the  2008  elections,  the  next  President 
should have the authority to negotiate market opening trade deals 
in consultation with Congress. 

The  opportunities  trade  presents  are  clear  but  there  are  chal-
lenges as well. In recent years, Congress has engaged in a dialogue 
about  how  to  ensure  that  U.S.  workers  and  workers  in  developing 
countries could benefit from increased trade investment flows. The 
U.S.  business  community  encourages  these  discussions  as  well  as 
efforts  to  provide  American  workers  with  the  tools  they  need  to 
raise their productivity. 

We welcome new ideas on ways to improve the Trade Adjustment 
Assistance  Program  and  we  hope  that  Congress  will  also  consider 
new programs that will assist American workers. 

If  U.S.  companies,  workers  and  consumers  are  to  thrive  amidst 
rising competition, new trade agreements such as the Doha Round 
and the various FTAs I cited before are absolutely critical. 

I  would  leave  you  with  some  interesting  remarks  that  Treasury 
Secretary Hank Paulson gave to the Economic Club of Washington 
recently  on  the  subject  of  trade—the  case  for  trade  is  clear  and 
compelling  and  if  we  want  more  people  to  support  it,  we  need  to 
ease  anxieties  and  help  more  people  realize  the  benefits  of  trade. 
The  alternative,  raising  protectionist  barriers  and  isolating  our-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

35 

selves  from  the  gains  of  trade  would  hurt  the  economy.  The  long- 
term costs of protectionism, for us and the rest of the world is lost 
jobs and lost opportunity. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Wenk follows.] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHRISTOPHER WENK, SENIOR DIRECTOR, 

INTERNATIONAL POLICY, U.S. CHAMBER OF COMMERCE 

On  behalf  of  the  U.S.  Chamber  of  Commerce,  I  am  pleased  to  appear  before  the 
Senate  Commerce  Subcommittee  on  Interstate  Commerce,  Trade  and  Tourism  to 
provide testimony on how trade is working for the U.S. economy. International trade 
plays a vital part in the expansion of economic opportunities for American workers, 
farmers,  and  businesses.  As  the  world’s  largest  business  federation—representing 
more  than  three  million  businesses  and  organizations  of  every  size,  sector,  and  re-
gion—the  U.S.  Chamber  views  efforts  to  expand  trade  opportunities  as  squarely  in 
the interests of America’s workers, farmers, consumers, and companies. 

As  such,  the  Chamber  has  helped  lead  the  business  community’s  effort  to  make 
the  case  for  initiatives  to  expand  trade,  including  global  trade  negotiating  rounds 
under the purview of the World Trade Organization (WTO) and its predecessor, the 
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, as well as bilateral and regional free trade 
agreements  (FTAs).  The  Chamber  does  so  because  U.S.  businesses  have  the  exper-
tise  and  resources  to  compete  globally—if  they  are  allowed  to  do  so  on  equal  terms 
with our competitors. 
Trade, Growth, and Prosperity 

The  facts  show  that  while  some  are  hurt—and  should  be  helped—the  over-
whelming  majority  of  Americans  derive  great  benefits  from  international  trade  and 
investment. America’s international trade in goods and services accounts for roughly 
27 percent of the country’s GDP. As the Office of the U.S. Trade Representative has 
pointed  out,  the  combined  effects  of  the  North  American  Free  Trade  Agreement 
(NAFTA)  and  the  Uruguay  Round  trade  agreement  that  created  the  WTO  have  in-
creased  U.S.  national  income  by  $40  billion  to  $60  billion  a  year.  In  addition,  the 
lower  prices  for  imported  goods  generated  by  these  two  agreements  mean  that  the 
average American family of four has gained between $1,000 and $1,300 in spending 
power—an impressive tax cut, indeed. 

When  Trade  Promotion  Authority  (TPA)  lapsed  in  1994,  the  international  trade 
agenda  lost  momentum.  The  Uruguay  Round  was  implemented,  but  no  new  round 
of  global  trade  negotiations  was  launched  as  the  1990s  wore  on.  Moreover,  the 
United States was compelled to sit on the sidelines while other countries and trade 
blocs negotiated numerous preferential trade agreements that put American compa-
nies at a competitive disadvantage. 

As  the  Chamber  pointed  out  during  its  2001–2002  advocacy  campaign  for  ap-
proval  of  TPA,  the  United  States  was  party  to  just  three  of  the  roughly  150  FTAs 
in  force  between  nations  at  that  time.  Since  then,  the  United  States  has  approved 
FTAs  with  an  additional  dozen  countries,  and  they  are  bringing  substantial  eco-
nomic  benefits.  Today,  just  under  half  (43  percent)  of  American  exports  go  to  mar-
kets where they enter duty free thanks to these FTAs. Only a third of U.S. exports 
enjoyed  this  advantage  back  in  1994,  the  year  NAFTA  came  into  force.  With  sales 
to our newest FTA partners growing twice as fast as U.S. export growth to the rest 
of the world; it’s no surprise that U.S. exporters are enjoying robust growth. 
Free Trade Agreements 

As  noted  above,  the  United  States  is  an  extraordinarily  open  economy.  Consider 
how  U.S.  tariffs  compare  with  those  of  countries  where  FTA  negotiations  have  re-
cently  been  concluded  or  are  underway.  According  to  the  World  Bank,  the  United 
States  has  a  weighted  average  tariff  rate  of  less  than  2  percent.  By  contrast,  the 
weighted average tariff on U.S. manufactured goods falls in the 10–11 percent range 
in Colombia, Korea, and Peru. 

An academic observer may regard the price disadvantage that falls to U.S. compa-
nies from these lopsided tariffs as insignificant. However, business men and women 
face  narrower  margins  than  these  every  day,  very  often  with  the  success  or  failure 
of their firm on the line, so these tariffs can prove decisive. Best of all, a free trade 
agreement can fix this imbalance once and for all. 

The  way  FTAs  level  the  playing  field  for  U.S.  workers,  farmers,  and  business  is 
borne  out  in  the  results  attained  by  America’s  FTAs.  For  example,  the  U.S.-Chile 
FTA was implemented on January 1, 2004, and immediately began to pay dividends 
for  American  businesses  and  farmers.  U.S.  exports  to  Chile  surged  by  33  percent 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

36 

in 2004, and by a blistering 85 percent in 2005. In fact, U.S. exports to Chile nearly 
doubled in the first 2 years of the agreement’s implementation. 

Other  recent  FTAs  have  borne  similar  fruits.  Trade  with  Jordan  has  risen  four- 
fold  since  the  U.S.-Jordan  FTA  was  signed  in  2000,  fostering  the  creation  of  tens 
of thousands of jobs in a country that is a close ally of the United States. The U.S. 
trade surplus with Singapore nearly quadrupled over the first 2 years of implemen-
tation  of  the  U.S.-Singapore  FTA  (2004–2005).  And  over  the  12  years  since  imple-
mentation  of  the  North  American  Free  Trade  Agreement  (NAFTA),  by  far  the  larg-
est  and  most  important  of  these  agreements,  U.S.  exports  to  Canada  and  Mexico 
have  surged  by  well  over  $200  billion  (to  a  total  of  approximately  $375  billion  in 
2006), sustaining literally millions of new jobs and businesses. 

One  of  the  most  compelling  rationales  for  these  FTAs  is  the  benefit  they  afford 
America’s  smaller  companies.  The  following  table  reveals  how  America’s  small  and 
medium-sized companies are leading the charge into foreign markets, accounting for 
more  than  three-quarters  of  exporting  firms  to  these  three  selected  markets  (one  a 
market  where  an  FTA  was  recently  approved,  the  second  where  FTA  negotiations 
were  recently  concluded,  and  the  third  where  an  FTA  has  just  been  proposed).  As 
a corollary, it suggests how smaller businesses stand to gain disproportionately from 
the market-opening measures of a FTA: 

Market 

DR–CAFTA countries 

Peru 

Korea 

No. of U.S. 
companies 

exporting to the 

market 

No. of U.S. SMEs 
exporting to the 

market 

No. of U.S. SMEs as 

a percentage of 

exporters 

16,640 

5,519 

18,339 

14,693 

4,403 

16,237 

88 

79 

88 

Source:  U.S.  Department  of  Commerce,  2004  data  (latest  available). 
Beyond  the  highly  successful  track  record  of  America’s  FTAs  as  measured  in 
terms  of  new  commerce,  the  Chamber  and  its  members  also  support  FTAs  because 
they promote the rule of law in emerging markets around the globe. This is accom-
plished  through  the  creation  of  a  more  transparent  rules-based  business  environ-
ment.  For  example,  FTAs  include  provisions  to  guarantee  transparency  in  govern-
ment procurement, with competitive bidding for contracts and extensive information 
made available on the Internet—not just to well-connected insiders. 

FTAs  also  create  a  level  playing  field  in  the  regulatory  environment  for  services, 
including  telecoms,  insurance,  and  express  shipments.  In  addition,  recent  FTAs 
have strengthened legal protections for intellectual property rights in the region, as 
well as the actual enforcement of these rights. 

Following are observations on some of the trade agreements that have been in the 

headlines lately: 

Peru,  Colombia,  Panama:  Negotiations  for  the  Peru  Trade  Promotion  Agreement 
were  concluded  in  December  2005,  and  a  similar  agreement  was  reached  with  Co-
lombia  a  few  months  later.  In  December  2006,  the  U.S.  and  Panamanian  govern-
ments announced they had completed negotiations on a Trade Promotion Agreement 
‘‘with  the  understanding  that  it  is  subject  to  further  discussions  regarding  labor,’’ 
according to the Office of the U.S. Trade Representative. 

U.S. trade with Peru, Colombia, and Panama has nearly doubled since 2000, and 
U.S. commerce with the three countries last year totaled $8 billion, $15 billion, and 
$3 billion, respectively. These are ambitious and comprehensive agreements. Eighty 
percent  of  U.S.  consumer  and  industrial  products  and  a  majority  of  the  most  com-
petitive U.S. farm exports will enter these markets duty-free immediately upon im-
plementation of the agreements. 

U.S. investors in these countries also regard the Trade Promotion Agreements as 
a helping hand for close allies. As described above, the agreements will lend support 
for  the  rule  of  law,  investor  protections,  internationally  recognized  workers’  rights, 
and transparency and accountability in business and government. 

The  agreements’  strong  intellectual  property  and  related  enforcement  provisions 
against  trafficking  in  counterfeit  or  pirated  products  will  help  combat  organized 
crime.  The  agreements  will  promote  economic  growth,  lending  strength  to  the  re-
gional economy and providing local citizens with long-term alternatives to narcotics 
trafficking or illegal migration. 

The  Chamber  is  serving  as  Secretariat  of  the  Latin  America  Trade  Coalition,  a 
broad-based  group  of  U.S.  companies,  farmers,  and  business  organizations  advo-
cating for approval of the three Trade Promotion Agreements. 

Korea:  The  Chamber  also  strongly  supports  the  recently  concluded  U.S.-Korea 
FTA, which is the most commercially significant FTA the United States has entered 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

37 

into since NAFTA. In 2006, Korea was the United States’ seventh-largest U.S. trad-
ing partner, seventh-largest export market, and its sixth-largest agricultural market 
overseas.  U.S.  goods  exports  to  Korea  totaled  $32.5  billion  last  year,  an  increase  of 
17 percent over the previous year, and U.S. services exports to Korea reached $10.2 
billion  in  2005.  The  United  States  is  the  largest  investor  in  Korea  and  is  Korea’s 
second-largest market. 

While we look forward to reviewing the text of the U.S.-Korea FTA as it becomes 
available,  we  have  been  briefed  on  its  substance  and  believe  that  the  agreement 
achieves most of the business community’s key objectives. Under the agreement, 95 
percent of trade in consumer and industrial products and more than half of current 
U.S. agricultural exports to Korea will become duty free upon implementation of the 
agreement.  This  agreement  will  eliminate  significant  non-tariff  market  access  bar-
riers in Korea to U.S. goods, services, and investment, and it includes robust provi-
sions on transparency, intellectual property rights, competition, and other rules that 
will  protect  U.S.  interests.  Moreover,  the  agreement  would  also  strengthen  the  im-
portant political relationship and alliance between the United States and Korea, fur-
ther contributing to security and stability in the Asia-Pacific region. 

The Chamber-administered U.S.-Korea Business Council is serving as Secretariat 
of the U.S.-Korea FTA Business Coalition. This coalition already embraces over 200 
leading  U.S.  companies  and  business  associations  that  strongly  support  the  conclu-
sion and passage of a U.S.-Korea FTA to advance the interests of the U.S. business 
community and promote further bilateral trade and investment. 

Malaysia:  When  U.S.  and  Malaysian  officials  announced  in  March  2006  that  the 
two countries would undertake negotiations for a FTA, the initiative won immediate 
broad  support.  Malaysia  is  the  largest  U.S.  trading  partner  in  Southeast  Asia  and 
the  10th  largest  U.S.  trading  partner  in  the  world.  Two-way  trade  between  the 
countries in 2005 surpassed $44 billion. The United States is Malaysia’s largest ex-
port  market,  purchasing  more  than  20  percent  of  Malaysia’s  exports,  and  the  sum 
of U.S. direct investments in Malaysia surpasses that of any other country. Unfortu-
nately, this agreement will not be concluded under the current Trade Promotion Au-
thority (TPA). 
The Doha Development Agenda 

While  the  FTAs  the  United  States  has  negotiated  represent  an  ambitious  and 
comprehensive  way  to  open  markets  one  country  or  region  at  a  time,  the  Doha  De-
velopment  Agenda  (DDA)—the  global  trade  negotiations  currently  being  conducted 
under  the  aegis  of  the  World  Trade  Organization—offers  the  remarkably  broad  op-
portunity  to  lower  barriers  to  trade  globally.  By  leveraging  both  the  breadth  of  the 
DDA and the depth of FTAs, U.S. business can attain important new market oppor-
tunities in the years ahead. 

In  essence,  the  DDA  represents  a  unique  opportunity  to  unlock  the  world’s  eco-
nomic  potential  and  inject  new  vibrancy  in  the  global  trading  system  by  reducing 
barriers to trade and investment throughout the world. The round was launched on 
the premise that both developed and developing nations alike share in the economic 
gains  resulting  from  global  trade  liberalization,  particularly  by  addressing  unfin-
ished business in the agricultural sector. 

Ambition  is  the  key  to  the  DDA’s  success.  As  one  of  the  most  open  economies  in 
the  world,  the  United  States  must  be  ambitious  in  its  approach  to  liberalization  of 
trade  in  manufactured  goods,  services,  and  agricultural  products  if  we  are  to  con-
vince  our  more  reluctant  trading  partners  to  share  our  goals.  Of  course,  we  cannot 
lead  alone.  The  European  Union  and  the  G20,  in  particular,  need  to  demonstrate 
that  they,  too,  are  committed  to  the  success  of  the  DDA  and  willing  to  make  the 
concessions  necessary  for  a  balanced  result  that  can  win  the  support  of  all  WTO 
member countries. 

The  Chamber  and  its  member  companies  are  working  with  the  Administration, 
Congress,  and  their  counterparts  around  the  world  to  ensure  that  the  negotiations 
advance. On October 25, 2005, the Chamber, in partnership with other leading U.S. 
business  organizations  and  a  broad  range  of  companies  and  agricultural  groups, 
launched the American Business Coalition for Doha (ABC Doha) to ensure that the 
U.S. private sector is coordinated, mobilized, and focused on achieving success in the 
DDA.  The  recommendations  that  follow  represent  the  Chamber’s  priorities  for  the 
DDA,  and  we  will  be  working  actively  with  our  trading  partners  around  the  world 
in  the  weeks  and  months  ahead  to  build  support  for  the  objectives  set  out  below. 
Trade  in  Agricultural  Products:  In  2001,  the  WTO  member  countries  committed 
to  making  ‘‘substantial  improvements  in  market  access;  reductions  of,  with  a  view 
to  phasing  out,  all  forms  of  export  subsidies;  and  substantial  reductions  in  trade- 
distorting  domestic  support.’’  We  are  encouraged  that  last  fall’s  proposals  set  forth 
by  the  United  States  and  the  G20  seem  to  have  re-energized  negotiations  with  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

38 

spect  to  agricultural  reforms.  We  hope  these  advances  will  stem  what  we  had  per-
ceived  before  the  6th  WTO  ministerial  conference  in  Hong  Kong  last  December  to 
be an emerging lack of ambition on the part of some key parties to the negotiations. 
In  a  World  Bank  paper,  Kym  Anderson  concludes  that  92  percent  of  developing 
countries’  gains  in  agricultural  trade  will  come  from  reductions  in  market  access 
barriers. The paper finds that such tariff reductions will not only improve the trade 
climate  between  developed  and  developing  nations,  but  more  importantly  will  yield 
significant  gains  in  trade  among  and  between  developing  countries.  This  outcome 
mirrors what we have witnessed in improved market access provisions in the areas 
of manufactured goods and services—the most robust gains are seen in trade among 
and between developing nations. 

The United States is uniquely positioned to press for success based on the highest 
levels  of  ambition.  Bold  positions  can  help  break  what  appears  to  be  a  stalemate 
between  developed  and  developing  countries  over  who  should  make  the  first  move. 
We cannot fail to deliver steep reductions in both trade-distorting domestic supports 
and  tariff  rates.  In  the  end,  success  will  only  be  achieved  through  mutual  recogni-
tion  that  comprehensive  trade  liberalization  is  an  opportunity  that  will  yield  enor-
mous benefits to farmers and consumers worldwide. 

Trade in Manufactured Goods: Manufactured goods represent 75 percent of global 
merchandise trade, and the manufacturing sector is a strong driver of U.S. economic 
growth and employment. In 2001, the WTO member countries made a commitment 
‘‘to reduce or as appropriate eliminate tariffs, including the reduction or elimination 
of  tariff  peaks,  high  tariffs,  and  tariff  escalation,  as  well  as  non-tariff  barriers,  in 
particular  on  products  of  export  interest  to  developing  countries.’’  While  some 
progress has been made toward this goal, much work remains to be done in the non- 
agricultural market access (NAMA) negotiations. 

In  order  to  deliver  on  its  development  promises,  the  DDA  must  provide  genuine 
new  market  access  by  substantially  reducing  or  eliminating  tariffs  among,  at  min-
imum,  the  developed  and  developing  countries  through  a  formula  that  focuses  on 
making  meaningful  reductions  in  tariffs  across  all  product  segments,  particularly 
peak  and  high  tariffs.  A  final  agreement  must  also  allow  for  a  voluntary  sectoral 
approach  to  tariff  elimination.  Above  all,  achieving  a  ‘‘level  playing  field’’  requires 
an  approach  that  recognizes  the  current  differences  among  countries’  tariffs,  and 
mandates  reductions  in  tariffs  that  will  reduce  and  eliminate  those  differences,  so 
as  to  avoid  an  outcome  where  countries  with  high  average  tariffs  are  only  required 
to make relatively small reductions. 

While  tariff  elimination  is  a  critical  component  of  the  round,  non-tariff  barriers 
are  increasingly  becoming  as  important,  if  not  more  important,  as  tariffs  in  con-
straining global trade. The DDA should focus on removing these hindrances to inter-
national trade, using both horizontal and sectoral approaches. In addition, the WTO 
should  strengthen,  or  create  where  necessary,  problem-solving  mechanisms  specifi-
cally focused on addressing and removing non-tariff barriers. 

In order to ensure that the NAMA negotiations lead to substantially increased op-
portunities  for  trade,  growth,  and  development  for  all  countries,  flexibilities  should 
be  built  into  the  process  that  can  provide  some  room  for  less  developed  and  small 
economies  to  take  part  without  shouldering  the  same  burden  as  their  more  devel-
oped counterparts. 

Finally,  the  Chamber  recognizes  that  the  NAMA  negotiations  are  impacted  by 
progress  in  the  broader  negotiating  environment.  It  is  important  that  negotiations 
on agriculture, services, and NAMA move forward on parallel tracks to ensure that 
success in the broader round is achieved. 

Trade in Services: The services sector is the backbone of the economy in developed 
and  developing  countries  alike.  In  total,  it  represents  about  two-thirds  of  world 
GDP,  or  $35  trillion  in  2004.  Further  liberalization  of  this  critical  sector  will  allow 
WTO  member  countries  to  attract  greater  foreign  direct  investment  and  take  full 
advantage of the growth and employment that this vital sector provides. 

In 2001, the services liberalization work that had been conducted under the Gen-
eral  Agreement  on  Trade  in  Services  (GATS)  was  incorporated  into  the  DDA  man-
date. WTO members endorsed the existing negotiating modalities and set a schedule 
for  successive  market  access  requests  and  offers.  Progress  has  been  unsatisfactory 
to  date:  few  offers  and  even  fewer  revised  offers  have  been  tabled,  despite  the  fact 
that  the  May  2005  deadline  is  long  passed.  While  new  methods  that  hold  promise 
are  being  explored  to  revitalize  the  process,  the  objective  of  achieving  substantial 
new  liberalization  commitments  within  the  next  few  months  should  guide  U.S.  ef-
forts. 

In  mode  one  (cross  border  supply  of  services),  the  U.S.  should  seek  full  market 
access and most-favored nation (MFN) treatment for all cross border services trade. 
This  level  of  ambition  should  apply  for  mode  two  (consumption  of  services  abroad) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

39 

as well. In mode three (commercial presence), the U.S. should seek the abolition or, 
at  the  very  least,  substantial  easing  in  equity  limits  for  services  investments  and 
allow for the incorporation of services businesses in whatever legal form makes the 
most business sense. In mode four (temporary movement of professionals), countries 
should commit to screen temporary workers, ensure they will leave when their visas 
expire, and generally commit to containing illegal migration in return for their pro-
fessionals’ access to host countries. 

Trade  Facilitation:  The  Doha  Declaration  recognizes  the  case  for  ‘‘further  expe-
diting the movement, release and clearance of goods, including goods in transit, and 
the  need  for  enhanced  technical  assistance  and  capacity  building  in  this  area.’’ 
Trade  facilitation  initiatives  provide  significant  opportunities  to  achieve  real,  nuts- 
and-bolts  improvements  for  businesses  of  all  sizes.  Progress  in  such  areas  as  port 
efficiency,  customs  procedures  and  requirements,  the  overall  regulatory  environ-
ment, and automation and e-business usage are important for all companies but are 
especially valuable to smaller and medium-sized enterprises. 

Major  world  regions  are  already  embracing  trade  facilitation.  In  2002,  the  21 
member  economies  of  the  Asia-Pacific  Economic  Cooperation  (APEC)  forum 
launched  a  Trade  Facilitation  Action  Plan  that  included  a  commitment  to  reduce 
trade-related  transaction  costs  by  5  percent  within  6  years.  In  November  2004,  the 
APEC  leaders  were  proud  to  announce  that  they  had  reached  their  goal  3  years 
ahead  of  schedule.  And  in  the  Western  Hemisphere,  the  countries  negotiating  the 
Free Trade Area of the Americas committed in 1999 to implement a package of nine 
customs-related  ‘‘business  facilitation’’  measures  that  covered  much  of  the  same 
ground  as  the  APEC  action  plan.  In  November  2005,  a  group  of  over  100  of  the 
Western  Hemisphere’s  leading  business  organizations  released  a  declaration  favor-
ing an ambitious stance in the trade facilitation negotiating group of the DDA. 

These  efforts  have  served  to  raise  the  profile  of  trade  facilitation  as  an  oppor-
tunity  for  the  DDA,  but  much  more  can  be  done.  Trade  facilitation  can  bring  great 
benefits if adopted unilaterally, but a global rules-based approach also offers the ad-
vantages  of  certainty,  stability,  and  enhanced  commonality  to  customs  measures 
and port administration. This is the promise of the DDA’s trade facilitation negotia-
tions. 
Trade, Labor and Workforce Development 

The  opportunities  trade  presents  are  clear,  but  there  are  challenges  as  well.  In 
recent  years,  Congress  has  engaged  in  a  dialogue  about  how  to  ensure  that  U.S. 
workers  and  workers  in  developing  countries  can  benefit  from  increased  trade  and 
investment  flows.  The  U.S.  business  community  encourages  these  discussions  as 
well  as  efforts  to  provide  American  workers  with  the  tools  they  need  to  raise  their 
productivity.  The  Chamber  welcomes  new  ideas  on  ways  to  improve  Trade  Adjust-
ment  Assistance  programs,  and  hopes  that  Congress  will  also  consider  new  pro-
grams  that  will  assist  American  workers  in  remaining  competitive  and  highly  pro-
ductive. 

In  addition  to  the  benefits  for  the  United  States,  there  is  powerful  evidence  that 
deepening economic ties with developing countries promotes their growth, fosters job 
creation, and promotes improvements in worker conditions in markets where Amer-
ican companies are active and engaged. Numerous studies show that American com-
panies operating in foreign markets lead the way in driving improvements in work-
ing  conditions  and  act  as  stellar  examples  of  responsible  corporate  citizens.  U.S. 
companies promote ethical and responsible business behavior, market-oriented busi-
ness  practices,  and  respect  for  the  rule  of  law.  They  also  operate  under  high  envi-
ronmental, health and safety standards in developing country markets, and they en-
courage  local  suppliers  to  adopt  and  adhere  to  similar  practices.  Compared  to  em-
ployees  in  local  companies,  employees  in  U.S.  companies  enjoy  competitive  to  supe-
rior compensation, benefits, and training. 

The  Chamber  is  hopeful  that  Congressional  discussions  with  the  Administration 
on  trade  and  labor  will  reflect  the  goals  we  all  share  for  promoting  working  condi-
tions and creating jobs in developing countries. The Chamber is optimistic that Con-
gress  will  develop  a  way  forward  on  trade  legislation  that  will  enable  the  U.S.  to 
continue  to  pursue  an  active  and  engaged  trade  policy,  opening  markets  to  U.S. 
goods,  services,  and  agricultural  products.  The  U.S.  business  community  stands 
ready  to  support  those  discussions  on  the  way  forward,  and  we  want  to  work  in 
partnership  with  Congress  and  the  Administration  in  developing  substantive,  com-
prehensive strategies that will bolster America’s competitiveness and improve Amer-
ica’s workforce. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

40 

Conclusion 

The Chamber believes that trade expansion is an essential ingredient in any rec-
ipe  for  economic  success  in  the  21st  century.  To  make  the  case  more  clearly,  the 
Chamber  recently  issued  a  landmark  report  entitled  Global  Engagement:  How 
Americans  Can  Win  and  Prosper  in  the  Worldwide  Economy.  It  maps  out  the  bene-
fits  of  trade—as  well  as  challenges  to  America’s  ability  to  compete  that  have  been 
laid bare by globalization. 

The Chamber also recently published Impact of Trade, which lays out in the clear-
est fashion possible the benefits that the 50 states of the union are already deriving 
from  international  commerce.  The  Chamber  is  pleased  to  present  these  documents 
for the record, and they are available on our website (www.uschamber.com) as well. 
If  U.S.  companies,  workers,  and  consumers  are  to  thrive  amidst  rising  competi-
tion, new trade agreements such as the DDA and the various FTAs cited above will 
be  critical.  In  the  end,  U.S.  business  is  quite  capable  of  competing  and  winning 
against  anyone  in  the  world  when  markets  are  open  and  the  playing  field  is  level. 
Mr. Chairman, Mr. Ranking Member, Members of the Committee, we greatly ap-
preciated the opportunity to testify today before Senate Commerce Subcommittee on 
Interstate Commerce, Trade and Tourism to provide testimony on the critical impor-
tance of advancing the U.S. international trade agenda. The Chamber stands ready 
to work with you on these and other challenges in the year ahead. Thank you very 
much. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Wenk, thank you very much and finally we 
will  hear  from  Mr.  Gresser.  Edward  Gresser  is  the  Director  of  the 
Trade  and  Global  Markets  Project  of  the  Progressive  Policy  Insti-
tute. Mr. Gresser, welcome. 

STATEMENT  OF  EDWARD  GRESSER,  DIRECTOR,  TRADE  AND 
GLOBAL  MARKETS  PROJECT,  PROGRESSIVE  POLICY 
INSTITUTE 
Mr.  GRESSER.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator.  Thank  you,  Mr. 
Chairman,  Senator  DeMint.  Your  question  today,  is  free  trade 
working is a timely and very important one. The answer, of course, 
depends on the goals we hope free trade or I would say, freer trade 
because  we  don’t  have  and  the  world  doesn’t  have  an  academic 
ideal of free trade. 

The  goals  we  hope  this  achieve—let  me  start  there,  noting  the 
mere  remarks  of  personal  observations  and  thoughts—not  formal 
positions of the PPI. 

Our modern trade policy in the sense of negotiations with foreign 
countries  to  reduce  trade  barriers  rests  on  the  conclusions  that 
President  Franklin  Roosevelt  drew  from  the  collapse  of  trade  be-
tween  1929  and  1931.  He  believed  disadvantage,  sparked  by  a 
worldwide cycle of retaliations beginning in the U.S. had deepened 
the  Depression,  closed  avenues  of  escape  and  ultimately  helped  to 
open politics to radical nationalism in Europe and in Asia. 

A  1936  speech  given  in  Buenos  Aries  explains—this  is  Roosevelt 
speaking:  ‘‘Every  nation  of  the  world  has  felt  the  evil  effects  of  re-
cent efforts to erect trade barriers of every known kind. Every indi-
vidual citizen has suffered them. It is no accident that the nations 
which  have  carried  this  process  furthest  are  those  which  proclaim 
most  loudly  that  you  require  war  as  an  instrument  of  policy.  It  is 
no accident that because of these suicidal policies and the suffering 
attending them, many of their people have come to believe with de-
spair that the price of war seems less than the price of peace.’’ 

At  the  end  of  the  war  in  1945,  Roosevelt  hoped  that  reopening 
trade  could  do  the  same  thing  in  reverse—could  restore  growth, 
could create safeguards against a second crisis and depression—ul-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

41 

timately, as he suggested in announcing the first multilateral trade 
negotiations, which concluded in 1947, give nations a greater stake 
in one another’s security and prosperity and help to create what he 
called  the  economic  basis  for  the  secure  and  peaceful  world  we  all 
desire. 

Since  then,  the  world  has  opened  up.  Policy  is  a  big  part  of  it. 
We’ve  had  12  major  multilateral  agreements,  a  string  of  more  re-
cent  bilateral  agreements  and  preferences  programs.  Powerful 
structural changes outside policy get less attention but are equally 
important.  These  are  geopolitical  changes,  with  reintestation  of 
Germany and Japan and then Russia and China in the global econ-
omy;  container  shipping  and  air  cargo  cut  the  cost  of  goods  trade; 
fiber  optics,  broadband,  satellite  beams  and  the  Internet  are  doing 
the same to create a global services industry. Trade has accordingly 
grown  fivefold  relative  to  the  U.S.  and  world  economies  since  the 
end of the war. 

Is  it  working?  This  is  the  right  question,  I  think.  Taking  Roo-
sevelt’s  hopes  as  a  guide,  on  the  whole,  the  answer  is  yes.  Open 
markets  abroad  let  us  sell  $1.4  trillion  in  airplanes  and  wine  and 
high value commercial services and more to the world last year. 

Our  own  openness  to  imports,  often  a  cause  for  anxiety  and 
stress, also raises living standards through wider choice and better 
prices.  And  by  keeping  inflation  low,  it  gives  us  lower  unemploy-
ment with higher growth. 

This  is  not  an  academic  theory.  We  can  look  back  and  see  that 
since  the  NAFTA  and  the  creation  of  the  WTO  and  the  launch  of 
the  World  Wide  Web  in  the  early  1990s,  American  unemployment 
has fallen from an average rate of 7.1 percent to 5.2 percent, which 
is  probably  the  longest  stretch  of  sustained  low  unemployment 
we’ve had in many, many years. 

Overseas,  an  opening  world  economy  has  helped  foster  develop-
ment  and  to  reduce  poverty.  Two  recent  cases  that  I  consider  par-
ticularly  important—one  is  the  African  Growth  and  Opportunity 
Act,  which  has  helped  to  create  nearly  200,000  jobs  in  low-income 
African states, like Lesotho, Swaziland, Kenya and others. 

Then there was trade normalization with Cambodia in 1996. This 
has  helped  to  create  an  urban  manufacturing  industry  in  Phnom 
Phen  that  now  employs  300,000  young  women,  has  helped  to  ease 
the  threat  of  rural  hunger  as  they  send  money  back  to  their  fami-
lies,  and  it  has  helped  an  almost  destitute  country  get  back  on  its 
feet  and  play  the  role  it  should  have  in  the  world  economy  today. 
Most  important,  the  crisis  of  the  1930s  has  never  been  repeated 
and  economic  integration  seems  to  be  fulfilling  its  hopes  as  a 
guaranteer  of  peace.  No  two  great  powers  have  come  into  conflict 
since  the  1960s,  which  is  the  longest  such  period  that  I  know  of 
and  a  major  study  last  year  found  wars  rarer  than  at  any  time 
since  the  1820s,  suggesting  that  this  is  in  part  because  the  world 
is more open. To quote, ‘‘an open global trading regime means that 
is always cheaper to buy resources from overseas than to use force 
to acquire them.’’ 

The  work  is  incomplete.  Major  markets  remain  closed  or  partly 
closed  to  our  exports.  Some  imaginative  thinking  could  make  the 
trading  system  far  more  effective  in  promoting  environmental  pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

42 

tection.  Trade  policy  has  largely  missed  the  greater  Middle  East 
and  a  bit  more  controversially,  our  own  policies  have  some  flaws. 
The  tariff  system,  for  example,  is  the  most  regressive  of  all  the 
major  Federal  taxes,  with  tariff  rates  on  clothes  and  shoes  and 
some foods rising to 32 percent for acrylic sweaters and 48 percent 
for cheap sneakers. As a tax and life necessities, the tariff is tough-
est on poor families with children and especially on single mothers. 
Abroad it is the same. 

Last  year,  Cambodia,  which  makes  largely  cheap  clothes,  faced 
the same $370 million tariff penalty on $2.2 billion worth of cheap 
clothes  that  France  faced  on  $37  billion  in  wines,  medicines,  air-
plane parts and other sophisticated goods. 

Trade  liberalization  has  brought  powerful  anxieties  as  well.  In 
some  areas,  though,  these  are  misconceptions,  which  need  a  calm 
rebuttal. The U.S. is not losing jobs overall. Since the early 1990s, 
we’ve added 20 million and since the 1970s, 50 million private sec-
tor jobs. The U.S. is not de-industrializing. Our manufacturing sec-
tor  is  growing  and  has  a  stable  real  dollar  share  of  the  U.S.  and 
global  economies,  nor  are  factories  fleeing  en  masse  for  poor  coun-
tries,  as  U.S.  manufacturers  invested  $56  billion  in  foreign  plants 
and acquisitions last year. Foreign manufacturers invested $67 bil-
lion here. 

The dismal experience of the shoe and clothing industries, where 
job loss has been fastest of all, shows that preserving trade barriers 
is  no  way  to  preserve  jobs.  In  other  areas,  anxieties  can  be  well 
founded.  Our  trade  and  financial  imbalance,  the  balance  since  last 
year—problems need attention. Low savings in the U.S., hyper sav-
ing  and  inflexible  currencies  in  some  Asian  countries,  reliance  on 
imported energy with volatile prices. 

As  we  face  powerful  new  competitors  in  India  and  China,  we 
have  competitive  weaknesses  at  home  in  finance  and  support  for 
science  and  in  some  visa  policies.  And  our  social  contract  in  which 
the  businesses  are  the  main  suppliers  of  health  and  pension  cov-
erage, while government steps in mainly to support the elderly and 
poor, is visible eroding as businesses recede from this role. 

Our  new  social  contract  must  start  fresh,  not  guaranteeing  jobs 
but  using  government  supports,  tax  incentives,  new  rules  for 
unions  and  other  measures  to  ensure  that  for  people  affected  by 
trade competition, domestic competition, technology, change and re-
cessions  alike,  layoffs  and  career  shifts  no  longer  mean  lost  health 
insurance  and  pensions,  threats  to  college  and  mortgage  payments 
and in a broad sense, family catastrophe. 

In  summary,  Mr.  Chairman,  the  world  is  moving  quickly.  Some 
American policies are no longer adequate and we need some careful 
and ambitious thought in our finances, our competitiveness and our 
safety  net.  But  these  problems  are  not  unsolvable  and  we  can  ap-
proach  them  with  some  confidence.  And  I  believe  the  basic  goals 
Mr.  Roosevelt  set  for  trade  policy—open  markets,  growth,  safe-
guard  against  global  crisis,  support  for  peace,  remain  the  right 
ones today. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Gresser follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

43 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF EDWARD GRESSER, DIRECTOR, TRADE AND GLOBAL 

MARKETS PROJECT, PROGRESSIVE POLICY INSTITUTE 

Chairman Dorgan, Senator DeMint, Members of the Subcommittee, thank you for 
inviting me to testify before you today. By way of introduction, I am Director of the 
Project  on  Trade  and  Global  Markets  at  the  Progressive  Policy  Institute.  PPI  is  a 
nonprofit think-tank based in Washington, D.C., which conducts research and policy 
development in areas ranging from trade and the global economy to defense, foreign 
policy, health, energy and environment, social policy and other issues. My testimony 
will  reflect  personal  views  and  opinions  rather  than  any  official  views  of  the  Insti-
tute. 
Introduction 

Today’s  hearing  poses  an  interesting  and  important  question:  ‘‘Is  ‘Free  Trade’ 
Working?’’  In  fact,  neither  the  U.S.  nor  the  world  has  achieved  an  academic  ideal 
of  ‘free  trade.’  Sixty  years  of  trade  liberalization,  combined  with  technological 
change and logistical innovation, has created a far more open and integrated world. 
Flows  of  goods,  services  and  ideas—into  our  country,  out  of  it,  and  around  it—are 
larger than ever before, certainly in absolute terms and almost certainly relative to 
the  U.S.  and  global  economies.  But  trade  policy  has  also  exempted  some  industries 
and  missed  some  important  parts  of  the  world.  A  look  at  both  the  changes  liberal-
ization  has  brought,  and  the  experience  of  the  industries  and  regions  where  trade 
has  not  been  liberalized,  helps  to  shed  some  light  on  the  Subcommittee’s  question. 
Overall,  as  economic  theory  and  foreign  policy  principles  suggest,  the  opening  of 
the world economy has brought us many benefits. The policies and technological ad-
vances  that  ease  exchange  of  goods  and  services  have  helped  to  raise  living  stand-
ards, allow American businesses and farmers to serve larger markets, keep inflation 
and  unemployment  low,  and  promote  global  growth  and  political  stability.  In  each 
of  these  areas  more  can  be  done.  But  the  same  policies  and  technical  changes  can 
bring stress and anxiety, as new competitors arise and workers and businesses feel 
sometimes  intense  pressure.  Some  fears  rest  upon  misconceptions  that  need  calm 
and factual response. But others are real and justified, reflecting problems that are 
not insoluble but require us to reshape domestic policies related to national competi-
tiveness,  improve  adjustment  programs  and  international  financial  policy,  and 
strengthen  the  national  safety  net  through  a  new  ‘‘social  contract’’  to  replace  one 
now visibly outdated. 

My  testimony  today  will  cover  each  of  these  topics,  examining  first  the  original 
purposes  of  American  trade  policy;  then  the  results  it  has  brought  and  the  gaps  it 
has  left;  and  finally  the  stresses  many  Americans  now  feel  and  policy  options  that 
might help. 
Franklin Roosevelt and the Purposes of Trade Policy 

An appropriate place to begin an evaluation of U.S. trade policy is with its goals. 
Trade policy has many facets, from trade remedy laws to export and investment pro-
motion,  intellectual  property  enforcement  and  more.  But  its  center,  since  approval 
of the Reciprocal Trade Agreements Act in 1934, has been negotiations with foreign 
governments to reduce trade barriers. 

This  is  by  now  a  very  familiar  approach  to  trade.  In  the  1930s  it  was  something 
of  a  radical  innovation.  Trade  policy  in  the  19th  and  early  20th  century  had  re-
volved  instead  around  legislative  increases  or  reductions  of  tariffs  and  other  trade 
policy  instruments,  and  the  approval  of  the  RTA  thus  reflected  the  judgment  of 
Franklin Roosevelt and the 73rd Congress that this approach had gone badly wrong. 
The  impetus  for  their  change  of  strategy  was  the  collapse  of  trade  in  the  early 
years of the Depression. Convinced that America, as a high-wage country, could not 
compete  with  lower-wage  rivals  in  Europe,  China  and  Japan,  the  Hoover  Adminis-
tration  had  overseen  a  sharp  increase  in  tariffs  in  1930,  coinciding  with  the  onset 
of  the  Depression.  Most  foreign  countries  quickly  retaliated.  The  worldwide  tariff 
hikes  and  retaliations,  augmented  by  falling  demand,  cut  U.S.  trade  from  $9.6  bil-
lion  in  1929  to  $2.9  billion  by  1932,  and  total  world  trade  from  $68  to  $24  billion. 
Roosevelt  and  his  contemporaries  believed  the  event  had  deepened  the  Depression 
and made it harder to escape. As years passed, he concluded that it had helped dis-
credit liberal politics and encourage radical nationalism in Europe and Asia. His ad-
dress to the 1936 ‘‘Inter-American Conference for the Maintenance of Peace’’ in Bue-
nos Aires explains: 

The  welfare  and  prosperity  of  each  of  our  Nations  depend  in  large  part  on  the 
benefits  derived  from  commerce  among  ourselves  and  with  other  Nations,  for 
our  present  civilization  rests  on  the  basis  of  an  international  exchange  of  com-
modities.  Every  Nation  of  the  world  has  felt  the  evil  effects  of  recent  efforts  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

44 

erect  trade  barriers  of  every  known  kind.  Every  individual  citizen  has  suffered 
from  them.  It  is  no  accident  that  the  Nations  which  have  carried  this  process 
farthest  are  those  which  proclaim  most  loudly  that  they  require  war  as  an  in-
strument of their policy. It is no accident that attempts to be self-sufficient have 
led to falling standards for their people and to ever-increasing loss of the demo-
cratic  ideals  . . .  It  is  no  accident  that,  because  of  these  suicidal  policies  and 
the  suffering  attending  them,  many  of  their  people  have  come  to  believe  with 
despair that the price of war seems less than the price of peace. 

Since then—especially since the end of the Second World War—the principal focus 
of  U.S.  trade  policy  has  been  to  reduce  trade  barriers.  Again  one  can  quote  from 
Roosevelt  in  a  message  sent  to  Congress  in  March  1945.  Announcing  the  opening 
of  the  first  multilateral  trade  negotiations,  this  defines  the  purposes  of  modern 
trade  policy:  to  encourage  growth  and  rising  living  standards,  create  a  set  of  rules 
and  binding  agreements  that  would  prevent  a  repetition  of  the  1929–1932  experi-
ence,  and  ultimately  ‘‘lay  the  economic  basis  for  the  secure  and  peaceful  world  we 
all desire.’’ 
Trade Liberalization 1945–2006 

Each of the eleven succeeding Presidents has built trade policy on this foundation. 
Over  sixty  years,  their  policies  have  joined  structural  changes  arising  from  geo-
politics, technological change and logistics to create a far more open world. 
1. Trade Negotiations Since 1945 

Trade  negotiations  have  proceeded,  with  only  a  few  gaps,  since  Roosevelt’s  letter 

to Congress in 1945. A brief review of the record is as follows: 

• GATT/WTO agreements: Since 1945, the U.S. has participated in twelve multi-
lateral  agreements,  including  eight  through  the  General  Agreement  on  Tariffs 
and  Trade  between  1947  and  1994  and  then  four  at  its  successor,  the  modern 
WTO,  in  the  late  1990s.1 Cumulatively,  they  have  cut  average  tariffs  by  well 
over  90  percent  in  rich  countries—for  the  U.S.,  trade-weighted  tariffs  have 
dropped from an average of 40 percent during the Depression-era peak to about 
2.0  percent,  or  to  1.4  percent  including  the  effects  of  free  trade  agreements  ne-
gotiated  over  the  last  20  years—and  abolished  them  altogether  in  industries 
such  as  information  technology,  toys,  scientific  instruments,  and  others.  These 
agreements  have  also  eliminated  most  quotas  and  import  licenses  outside  agri-
culture,  eliminated  most  industrial  subsidies  and  limited  subsidies  in  agri-
culture,  developed  an  international  agreement  on  intellectual  property;  created 
agreements on technical standards and government procurement, begun liberal-
izing  some  services  industries;  and  invented  a  dispute-settlement  system  that 
has considered 361 complaints since the creation of the WTO in 1994. 
• GATT/WTO  membership  expansion:  Simultaneously,  the  trading  system  has 
broadened  as  ‘‘accession’’  agreements  added  127  new  members  to  the  original 
23 GATT founders. These have included first Japan and Germany, then dozens 
of new countries emerging from colonial rule, then the new democracies in cen-
tral  and  Eastern  Europe,  and  most  recently  some  least-developed  nations  and 
large trading economies such as China, Taiwan, Vietnam and Saudi Arabia. At 
present, 30 more countries, ranging from Bosnia and Afghanistan to Russia, are 
negotiating on their terms of membership. 
• FTAs  and  Preferences:  Finally,  the  U.S.  has  developed  a  set  of  tariff  ‘‘pref-
erence’’ programs which exempt poor countries from tariffs, and a series of free 
trade agreements with individual countries. Most significant is the North Amer-
ican  Free  Trade  Agreement  with  Canada  and  Mexico,  which  in  2006  covered 
about  $900  of  America’s  $2800  billion  in  two-way  goods  trade,  and  $100  billion 
out  of  $750  billion  in  services  trade.  The  preference  programs  for  Africa,  Latin 
America,  Haiti  and  the  Caribbean  apply  to  about  5  percent  of  goods  imports, 
and the FTAs apart from NAFTA to about 4 percent of two-way trade. 

2. Structural Change: Geopolitics, Logistics and Telecommunications 

Meanwhile,  powerful  structural  forces  independent  of  government  policies—in 
particular  geopolitical  change,  logistical  innovation,  and  new  telecommunications 

1 The  eight  GATT  agreements  are  the  Geneva  I  Round  in  1947,  the  Annecy  Round  in  1949, 
the  Torquay  Round  in  1951,  the  Geneva  II  Round  in  1956,  the  Dillon  Round  in  1961,  the  Ken-
nedy Round in 1967, the Tokyo Round in 1979 and the Uruguay Round in 1994. The four WTO 
agreements  are  the  WTO’s  Information  Technology  Agreement  in  1997,  the  Financial  Services 
Agreement  in  1998,  the  Basic  Telecommunications  Agreement  in  1998,  and  a  ‘‘duty-free  cyber-
space’’ principle in 1999. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

45 

technologies—have been accelerating the opening and integration of the global econ-
omy  by  opening  major  economies  and  making  trade  in  goods  and  services  cheaper 
and  more  efficient.  Their  effects  are  probably  harder  to  measure  than  those  of  gov-
ernment-to-government  negotiations,  but  some  estimates  suggest  that  they  have 
been as important to trade growth and ‘‘globalization’’ as trade negotiations and tar-
iff  cuts.  Since  no  major  multilateral  trade  agreement  has  been  concluded  since  the 
late  1990s,  they  have  probably  been  the  most  powerful  forces  for  integrating  the 
global economy in this decade. 

• Geopolitics  and  internal  reform:  Shifts  of  political  orientation  and  changes  in 
the  domestic  policies  of  big  economies  have  self-evidently  powerful  effects.  The 
end of the Second World War returned Japan and Germany to the global econ-
omy in the late 1940s; more recently, the end of the Cold War and the discred-
iting of economic planning has accelerated the integration of China, central and 
eastern Europe, Russia, Cambodia, Laos and Vietnam. A similar shift may now 
be  underway  in  parts  of  the  Muslim  world,  in  particular  through  reform  in 
Pakistan and Egypt. 
• Logistics:  The  invention  of  container  shipping  in  1956  and  the  development  of 
large-scale  airborne  express  delivery  services  in  the  1990s,  have  drastically  cut 
the  time  and  cost  of  moving  manufactured  goods  among  continents.  Both  con-
tinue to progress rapidly. For example, the average capacity of a container ship 
has risen from 1,500 TEU’s a in 1996 to 2,500 TEUs in 2006, and the large new 
container  ships  now  under  construction  or  newly  launched  carry  12,000  con-
tainers and sometimes more. 
• Telecommunications:  The  global  telecommunications  network  and  the  Internet, 
in  particular  the  launch  of  the  World  Wide  Web  in  1993,  the  replacement  of 
most  of  the  world’s  copper  submarine  cables  with  fiber-optics,  and  the  contin-
uous  deployment  of  new  and  more  powerful  communications  satellites  are  now 
speeding  the  integration  of  many  services  industries.  One  indication  is  the  fact 
that the average price of an international phone call from the United States has 
fallen from $1.00 per minute in 1990 to fifty-three cents per minute in 2000 and 
fourteen cents as of 2004. 

Results 

Altogether,  sixty  years  of  trade  negotiations,  logistical  innovation  and  improving 
telecommunications  have  created  a  vastly  more  integrated  world  economy  than  the 
one in which Roosevelt and his administration launched today’s trade policy—or, for 
that matter, than those in which Presidents Kennedy and Clinton formed trade pol-
icy. 
1. Integration to Date 

The  WTO’s  release  last  week  found  world  goods  and  services  exports  rising  to 
$14.4 trillion in 2006, in a global economy of $66.2 trillion. This means exports are 
the equivalent of 22 percent of global GDP, as compared to roughly 5 percent in the 
late 1940s, and records for the United States are much the same, with trade rising 
continuously and roughly quintupling relative to GDP. Table 1 illustrates the trend, 
using  a  few  watershed  years  for  trade  negotiations  and  technical  change  as  mark-
ers. 

Table 1.—Trade vs. GDP, 1947–2006 2 

Year 

Trade Event 

Real GDP in 
2000 Dollars 

Import/GDP 

Ratio 

U.S. Private-sector 

Employment 

1947 
1956 
1968 
1974 
1980 
1994 

2006 

1st GATT Agreement 
Container shipping invented 
Kennedy Round implemented 
1974 Trade Act 
Trade with China re-opened 
NAFTA implemented, WTO created, 
World-Wide Web launched 
Today 

1.57 trillion 
2.23 trillion 
3.65 trillion 
4.32 trillion 
5.16 trillion 
7.84 trillion 

11.05 trillion* 

3.3% 
4.5% 
5.0% 
8.3% 
10.4% 
11.3% 

16.6% 

39.0 million 
45.3 million 
57.1 million 
63.1 million 
74.6 million 
96.7 million 

115.1 million 

* Actual  GDP  in  2006  dollars  was  $13.246  trillion. 

2. Exemptions and Exclusions 

Nonetheless, trade liberalization is partial, not complete. A look at the U.S. tariff 
system  shows  that  some  industries  remain  little  touched  by  trade  negotiations.  As 
Table 2 shows, while average tariffs are low, consumer goods and some types of food 

a Twenty-foot equivalent units, the size of a 20′x8′x8.5′ container. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

46 

remain  covered  by  tariffs  roughly  twenty  times  higher  than  those  on  most  other 
goods, and occasionally other forms of trade restrictions. 

Table 2.—The U.S. Tariff System Today 

2006 Tariff Receipts 

Imports 

Rate 

Total Tariff Collection: 
Light consumer goods/assorted foods 

Clothes 
Shoes 
Luggage/Handbags 
Household linens, silverware 
Plates, glasses, watches 
Cheese/orange juice/tuna 

Cars 
All other goods 

$25.2 billion 
$13 billion 
$8.9 billion 
$1.9 billion 
$0.9 billion 
$1.0 billion 

$0.2 billion 
$2.1 billion 
$10.2 billion 

$1.845 trillion* 
$122 billion 
$79 billion 
$19 billion 
$6.8 billion 
$15.4 billion 

$2.0 billion 
$138 billion 
$1.586 trillion 

1.4% 
10.7% 
11.3% 
10.0% 
12.9% 
6.5% 

10.5% 
1.6% 
0.6% 

* Includes  all  products  imported  duty-free  under  FTAs  and  preferences. 
In  addition,  trade  liberalization  has  missed  much  of  the  Muslim  world,  with  the 
states of the greater Middle East participating less in the WTO and retaining higher 
trade  barriers  than  Europe,  the  Americas,  Sub-Saharan  Africa  or  East  and  South-
east Asia. 

Both  exceptions  have  important  and  unpleasant  effects,  which  I  will  come  to  in 
a  moment.  But  the  modern  American  economy  is  certainly  closer  to  ‘‘free  trade’’ 
than  was  the  America  of  the  1940s,  1960s,  or  1980s.  As  Roosevelt  intended,  we  ex-
port more, we have a broader choice of the world’s goods and services, and we com-
pete more against foreign producers. We can assess the consequences in three ways: 
the  positive  results,  the  areas  in  which  too  little  has  been  done,  and  stresses  suc-
cessful policy has brought. 
Assessment 1: Positive Results 

First,  we  can  judge  the  results  against  Roosevelt’s  original  goals—a  stronger 
peace,  long-term  growth  and  rising  living  standards,  a  defense  against  a  repeat  of 
the Depression. Here, the record looks very good. 

Politically, despite the high tension in the Middle East, the world is more peaceful 
than  at  any  time  in  the  20th  century.  None  of  the  world’s  great  powers—the  U.S., 
Japan, Germany, U.K., France, Russia, China, India—have come into direct conflict 
with one another since the 1960s. This long peace has no parallel in modern history, 
or for that matter, apparently, in medieval history. On a broader scale, a study last 
year  at  the  University  of  British  Columbia  found  a  ‘‘radical’’  decline  in  warfare  al-
most  everywhere  in  recent  decades,  with  the  1990s  ‘‘the  least  violent  decade  since 
the  end  of  World  War  II.’’  The  authors  suggest  a  mix  of  causes—ideological  conflict 
has waned since the Cold War, decolonization has removed a grievance, U.N. peace-
keeping missions are often effective in preserving calm in tense regions—but credit 
the global economy as well: 

The most effective path to prosperity in modern economies is through increasing 
productivity  and  international  trade,  not  through  seizing  land  and  raw  mate-
rials.  In  addition,  the  existence  of  an  open  global  trading  regime  means  it  is 
nearly  always  cheaper  to  buy  resources  from  overseas  than  to  use  force  to  ac-
quire them.3 

Economically,  no  crisis  like  that  of  the  1930s  has  recurred.  Even  during  the  mo-
ments  of  greatest  stress—the  oil  shock  of  the  1970s  and  the  Asian  financial  crisis 
of the late 1990s—respect for agreements and rules proved strong enough to prevent 
a  tariff  war  and  a  second  Depression.  Instead  there  has  been  a  long  period  of 
growth,  during  which  in  real  terms  the  U.S.  has  tripled  private-sector  employment 
and raised GDP in real terms about eight-fold. 

This  reflects  in  part  the  fact  that  with  more  open  markets,  American  exporters 
can  serve  larger  markets  and  take  advantage  of  economies  of  scale.  Last  year’s  ex-
ports  totaled  $1.2  trillion  worth  of  goods  and  services  abroad  in  2006,  the  largest 
figure in the world and $200 billion above second-place Germany. American aircraft 
plants  sold  418  big  civil  aircraft  abroad  last  year,  with  China  the  largest  buyer; 
vineyards exported about 376 million quarts of wine last year, in particular to Brit-
ain, Canada and Japan. American medical equipment, high-performance computers, 

2 Bureau of Economic Analysis for GDP, Census Bureau and Almanac of Statistical Abstracts 

for goods and services imports; Bureau of Labor Statistics for private-sector employment. 

3 Human Security Report 2005, http://www.humansecurityreport.info/HSR2005/Part1.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

oranges, and grains all do well in foreign markets. It is especially heartening to note 
last year’s $100 billion in manufacturing export growth. 

47 

Imports  also  have  an  important  place  in  the  U.S.  economy.  Import  competition, 
especially  when—as  it  is  today—accompanied  by  structural  change  in  the  global 
economy, can create stress and anxiety which require well-designed safety nets and 
adjustment  programs.  But  overall,  openness  to  imports  not  only  helps  raise  living 
standards by giving consumers broader choice and better prices, but can keep infla-
tion  down  and  thus  facilitate  faster  rates  of  growth  with  lower  unemployment.  A 
striking example is very recent: since the early 1990s and the conclusion of the Uru-
guay Round, passage of the North American Free Trade Agreement and the launch 
of the World Wide Web, the U.S. has added over 20 million private-sector jobs, and 
reduced unemployment rates from an average of 7.1 percent between 1980 and 1993 
to 5.2 percent in the years since. 

Abroad,  trade  policy  can  be  remarkably  effective  in  helping  to  promote  develop-
ment  and  reduce  deep  poverty.  Overall,  economic  growth  spurred  by  trade  liberal-
ization  has  combined  with  science,  medical  advances,  and  public  health  and  edu-
cation to reduce poverty. Since the 1950s, for example, global infant mortality rates 
have  dropped  by  more  than  two-thirds;  and  the  ILO’s  recent  report  ‘‘The  End  of 
Child  Labour:  Within  Reach’’ 4 suggests  that  child  labor  rates  are  falling  rapidly  as 
well. 

U.S. policy has made important contributions to this. The African Growth and Op-
portunity  Act,  passed  during  the  Clinton  Administration  and  extended  last  year,  is 
an  excellent  example,  helping  create  nearly  two  hundred  thousand  urban  jobs  in 
low-income African states like Lesotho and Swaziland since 2000. Another is the re-
opening  of  trade  with  Cambodia  in  1996,  which  has  created  a  national  export-gar-
ment industry that now provides jobs for 300,000 young women—a fifth of the cap-
ital’s  population—and  through  them,  cash  income  for  hundreds  of  thousands  of 
nearly destitute rural families. 

ASSESSMENT 2: WORK UNDONE 

Second, these achievements have gaps. Trade policy can be bolder and more ambi-
tious  in  opening  closed  markets  abroad,  reforming  outdated  and  regressive  Amer-
ican policies, and addressing the deep economic crisis of the Muslim world. 
1. Opening Foreign Markets 

To  begin  with,  many  significant  barriers  to  U.S.  exports  remain  in  place.  Some 
are matters already covered by agreements and require vigorous enforcement, to en-
sure  that  Americans  receive  the  full  benefit  of  market-opening  agreements  and  to 
defend  the  rule  of  law  in  the  global  economy.  Examples  now  subject  to  dispute  set-
tlement are the European Union’s Airbus subsidies and some aspects of Chinese in-
tellectual property piracy. Others require negotiation; representative but hardly ex-
clusive  examples  include  high  agricultural  trade  barriers  in  the  European  Union, 
Chinese  and  Indian  tariffs  and  limits  on  services  trade  and  tariffs  on  semiconduc-
tors and other information technology manufactures in Brazil. 

I might note that a trade policy focused on bilateral free trade agreements is un-
likely  to  address  these  effectively.  Two-thirds  of  U.S.  trade  is  with  the  EU,  Japan, 
China,  Canada  and  Mexico.  The  only  present  forum  in  which  to  reduce  trade  bar-
riers  in  these  countries  (and  large  developing  economies  like  Brazil,  Egypt,  India 
and  Indonesia)  is  the  WTO,  most  immediately  the  Doha  Round.  WTO  negotiations 
also  offer  the  most  important  opportunities  to  use  trade  to  promote  environmental 
goals.  The  fishery  subsidy  reduction  proposal  in  Doha  is  a  path-breaking  example 
of  use  of  the  WTO  to  reduce  subsidies  that  threaten  the  environment,  and  there 
may be options for multilateral ways to reduce mining, timber and similar subsidies. 
APEC  also  has  a  ten-year-old  list  of  tariffs  on  environmentally  beneficial  goods, 
where liberalization can reduce the cost of environmental protection; environmental 
services are also an important opportunity. 
2. U.S. Tariffs and the Poor 

At  home  as  well,  American  trade  policy  needs  reform,  with  the  tariff  system  in 

particular tilted sharply against poorer Americans and also many poor countries. 

4 ILO,  ‘‘The  End  of  Child  Labour:  Within  Reach,’’  April  2006,  Part  I,  page  8.  This  suggests 
that  the  total  number  of  child  workers  in  the  world  fell  by  28  million  between  2000  and  2004, 
with the most rapid drops among the youngest workers and among child workers in hazardous 
jobs;  especially  rapid  drop  in  Latin  America,  where  Brazil,  Mexico,  Chile  and  other  countries 
have  implemented  innovative  plans  based  upon  stipends  for  low-income  families  trying  to  keep 
children  in  school.  The  report  is  available  on-line  at  http://www.ilo.org/public/english/stand-
ards/ipec/about/globalreport/2006/download/2006lglobalreportlen.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

48 

Since  the  early  1940s,  the  tariff  system  has  been  the  smallest  of  the  major  Fed-
eral taxes, raising about 1 percent of national revenue. As such, it has received little 
attention from Congress or the Treasury Department since the 1960s or 1970s. But 
it continues to raise $25 billion per year—about as much as the estate tax and half 
the gasoline tax—and does so in an extraordinarily regressive way. 

America’s highest tariffs, as Table 1 above showed, are on shoes, clothes and some 
kinds  of  food.  Shoes  and  clothes  alone,  which  account  for  about  6  percent  of  Amer-
ican imports, raised nearly 40 percent of all tariff money last year. Given the rough-
ly three-fold markup between border and store-shelf, shoe and clothing tariffs prob-
ably  cost  the  public  $35  billion  a  year,  and—like  any  life-necessity  tax—hit  poor 
families  with  children  much  harder  than  wealthy  or  middle-class  families.5 Even 
this  understates  the  system’s  tilt  against  the  poor,  as  tariffs  on  cheap  and  simple 
goods are far higher than tariffs on luxury goods. For example, sterling silver forks 
have no tariff while cheap stainless steel forks get 20 percent. A long-sleeved men’s 
silk  shirt  has  a  1.1  percent  tariff  and  its  polyester  equivalent  25.9  percent.  A  cash-
mere  sweater  has  a  4  percent  tariff  and  an  acrylic  sweater  32  percent;  a  cheap 
drinking  glass  valued  at  30  cents  or  less  gets  28.5  percent,  and  a  luxury  drinking 
glass valued at $5 or more only 3 percent; and the tariff schedule is filled with simi-
lar inequities. 

The  effect  abroad  is  much  the  same.  U.S.  tariffs  are  now  minimal  for  wealthy 
countries and energy producers, but very high for low-income countries in Asia and 
the Muslim world. As Table 3 shows, the high tariffs on cheap clothes sewn in Cam-
bodia  and  Bangladesh  mean  goods  from  these  countries  face  higher  tariff  penalties 
than the much larger volume of imports from their old colonial powers, France and 
Britain. 

Country 

Cambodia 
Bangladesh 
Pakistan 
WORLD 
France 
U.K. 
Saudi Arabia 

Table 3.—U.S. Tariff Collection from Selected Countries, 2006 

U.S. Imports 2006 

U.S. Tariffs 2006 

$2.2 billion 
$3.3 billion 
$3.7 billion 
[$1.84 trillion] 
$36.8 billion 
$53.5 billion 
$31.1 billion 

$367 million 
$496 million 
$368 million 
[$25.3 billion] 
$367 million 
$430 million 
$48 million 

Average 

Rate 

16.9% 
15.2% 
10.0% 
1.4% 
1.0% 
0.8% 
0.2% 

[International  Trade  Commission  dataweb] 
Despite  their  regressive  effects,  most  U.S.  tariffs  seem  to  have  little  relevance  to 
employment. Between 1974 and 2005, clothes were protected not only by tariffs but 
by a unique ‘‘quota’’ system capping imports by country. When this system went into 
effect  in  1974,  about  1.2  million  Americans  worked  at  clothing  jobs.  By  the  time  it 
was  abolished  in  2005,  only  270,000  were  left.6 Shoes  are  even  more  striking,  with 
$2  billion  in  tariffs  raised  on  products—like  cheap  sneakers,  where  tariffs  range 
from  37.5  percent  to  60  percent  and  are  higher  than  tariffs  on  any  other  manufac-
tured good—not made in the U.S. for decades. 
3. The Greater Middle East 

Finally,  trade  policy  has  largely  missed  the  greater  Middle  East—the  region 
stretching from Morocco to Central Asia, with about 600 million people across about 
25 majority-Muslim states. China’s widely debated boom in trade has been matched 
by an almost invisible collapse in Muslim-world trade. Between 1980 and 2000, the 
region’s  share  of  world  trade  and  investment  fell  by  fully  75  percent,  from  13  per-
cent  to  4  percent  of  world  exports,  and  from  4.8  percent  to  1.6  percent  of  foreign 
direct  investment.  Meanwhile,  the  region’s  population  is  booming,  with  the  total 
population of Middle East and Muslim South Asia rising by 250 million. The Inter-
national Labor Organization regularly now finds this region with the highest unem-
ployment rate in the world. 

Here  we  have,  on  a  smaller  scale,  a  replication  of  the  economic  patterns—closed 
markets, natural resource dependence—of the world of the 1930s. It may be a coin-
cidence  that  wars  and  political  extremism  have  faded  from  Central  America  and 
Southeast  Asia,  but  have  persisted  and  spread  in  the  greater  Middle  East.  But  it 

5 According to the Bureau of Labor Statistics’ most recent Consumer Expenditure Survey, sin-
gle-parent  families  spend  about  three  times  as  much  of  their  income  on  life  necessities  as 
wealthy  families.  See  BLS,  ‘‘Consumer  Expenditures  in  2005,’’  at  http://stats.bls.gov/cex/ 
csxann05.pdf. 

6 See  Bureau  of  Labor  Statistics,  Employment  Hours  and  Earnings  surveys,  at  http:// 

stats.bls.gov/ces/home.htm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

49 

is likely that economic stress and falling living standards contribute to a climate of 
anger, frustration, and openness to radicalism. 

The explanation for this is complex, as is any cure. The economic crisis principally 
reflects conditions and choices in the greater Middle East region as opposed to poli-
cies in other regions. Until quite recently, few of the region’s major economies were 
WTO  members—in  2004,  11  of  the  22  Arab  League  members  remained  outside  the 
group—and its major economies were variously walled off by high tariffs and import 
bans, or isolated from one another by sanctions and boycotts. 

The cause of the Muslim world’s economic decline rests largely in policies pursued 
within  the  region.  These  must  accordingly  change  if  the  region  is  to  recover,  and 
it  is  encouraging  that  the  underlying  structure  is  beginning  to  change.  Three  Arab 
states  have  joined  the  WTO  since  2000,  and  three  more  along  with  Afghanistan, 
Azerbaijan  and  three  Central  Asian  republics  are  applying  for  membership.  Both 
Pakistan  and  Egypt  have  been  revising  economic  policy  to  encourage  investment 
and  integration  with  the  world  economy.  An  imaginative  U.S.  and  European  trade 
policy  can  help  by  removing  tariffs  on  light-industry  goods  and  farm  products  from 
these countries, as has been done for Africa and much of Latin America. 
Assessment 3: U.S. Competitiveness and the Social Contract 

Third,  an  ambitious  and  energetic  trade  policy  needs  to  be  matched  by  policies 
in  international  finance,  domestic  competitiveness,  adjustment  and  safety  nets  that 
allow  Americans  to  remain  confident  about  their  ability  to  succeed  in  a  rapidly 
changing  world.  In  all  these  areas  the  U.S.  is  falling  badly  short.  Let  me  focus,  in 
my  conclusion,  on  two  areas:  national  competitiveness  and  the  eroding  social  con-
tract. 
U.S. Competitiveness 

The  opening  of  the  world  economy  has  brought  Americans  export  opportunities 
and wider choice of the world’s goods and services. It has also encouraged the emer-
gence  of  new  competitors.  This  is  not  a  novelty  of  the  21st  century:  John  F.  Ken-
nedy’s  trade  program  and  domestic  economic  policy  in  the  early  1960s  was  in  part 
a  response  to  the  formation  of  the  European  Community,  and  Clinton’s  to  the 
strength of Japan thirty years later. But the size and rapid emergence of China and 
India  is  understandably  a  reason  for  concern  to  many  Americans.  Anxieties,  about 
the  ability  of  the  U.S.  to  remain  the  world’s  leading  economy  and  the  ability  of 
workers to succeed in a more demanding world, are not only easy to understand but 
often well-founded. 

We should, of course, start from an accurate diagnosis of the problem. As we have 
noted, the U.S. is not losing jobs in the aggregate. Nor is American factory industry 
contracting  or  fleeing  to  poorer  countries.  The  Bureau  of  Economic  Analysis  finds 
U.S.  manufacturing’s  real-dollar  share  of  the  U.S.  economy  roughly  constant  over 
the  past  twenty  years.7 The  U.S.’  share  of  global  manufacturing  industry  remains 
stable  as  well.  Direct  investment  patterns  are  roughly  balanced,  with  American 
manufacturers  investing  less  in  foreign  plants  and  acquisitions  than  foreign  manu-
facturers  invested  here  in  both  2005  and  2006.8 Foreign  direct  investment  in  U.S.- 
based scientific, technical and professional services and information industries like-
wise outpaced the foreign investments of American companies in these fields. 

But  anxiety  about  American  prospects  in  the  new  century  are  justified  nonethe-
less.  We  do  enter  a  period  of  transition  and  structural  change  with  considerable 
strengths. America’s open society, world-class university system, high quality of life, 
strong intellectual property laws and other national assets are powerful advantages 
in global competition. But our new competitors have great strengths as well, in low 
costs,  financial  resources,  and  wealthy  and  well-educated  diasporas  around  the 
world—and  the  U.S.  has  weaknesses  that  are  widely  recognized  but  still  unsolved. 
One example is the return of structural fiscal deficits, which has joined with high 
energy  costs  and  inflexible  currency  rates  in  China  and  other  developing  countries 
to  create  a  trade  and  current-account  imbalance  with  little  historic  precedent.  An-
other are shortcomings in the human-resource and science policies important to our 
leadership  in  technology  and  innovation.  These  include  low  graduation  rates  in 
science  and  engineering,  restrictions  on  the  ability  of  innovative  companies  to  re-
cruit  the  best  international  talent,  and  long-term  declines  in  Federal  commitment 

7 See  Bureau  of  Economic  Analysis,  tables  for  ‘‘Real  Value-Added  By  Industry,’’  at  http:// 

www.bea.gov/industry/gpotables/gpollist.cfm?anon=807&registered=0. 

8 The  figures  for  2006  are  $67  billion  in  foreign  manufacturing  investment  in  the  U.S.,  and 
$56 billion in U.S. investment abroad. Data are available at http://www.bea.gov/international/ 
index.htm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

50 

to basic research in chemistry, physics, computers and other hard sciences. None of 
these problems are insoluble, but none are likely to solve themselves. 
New Social Contract 

A  still  larger  issue—probably  the  fundamental  question  in  sustaining  public  sup-
port for open-market policies—is the need to reshape America’s ‘‘social contract’’ for 
a 21st century economy. The very success of American businesses in meeting a chal-
lenge  from  low-income  countries  illustrates  how  important  this  is.  Between  2001 
and mid-2003, with the U.S. in recession, American factories shed 3 million workers. 
Since then, despite their steady growth, they have hired none back. A shift of 3 mil-
lion  men  and  women  from  factory  work  to  other  jobs  would  be  traumatic  at  any 
time.  It  is  even  more  so  with  the  Internet  creating  a  global  services  industry  as  it 
drives down the price of international telephone calls and data transfers. 

This  experience,  of  course,  is  not  unique  to  America.  All  countries  must  grapple 
with  the  rise  of  new  economic  powers  and  the  intrusions  of  the  Internet.  But  the 
stress may be more acute here than in it is in other wealthy economies. This is be-
cause the postwar American safety net was unusual among big countries: in Europe 
and  Japan  government  is  the  principal  guarantor  of  health  benefits  and  pensions, 
while  in  the  U.S.  large  businesses  served  as  the  principal  providers,  with  govern-
ment stepping in principally to support the poor, the elderly and the disabled. 

The  consequence  today  is  that  as  businesses  adapt  to  low-cost  competition,  most 
workers in Japan and Europe need not fear that loss of health insurance or pension 
guarantees  will  come  with  a  layoff.  By  contrast,  Americans  have  no  national 
healthcare  system  and  no  pension  guarantees  beyond  Social  Security,  and  busi-
nesses are visibly retreating from their postwar roles as providers of health coverage 
and pensions. Threats to the ability to pay high mortgage payments and college tui-
tion during periods of job dislocation add further dimensions of insecurity. 

Thus,  even  with  unemployment  rates  low  by  historical  standards,  and  several 
years of economic growth, the American public is not wrong to be anxious. A ration-
al individual may well believe that open-market policies are good for the Nation, but 
also that the personal cost of job loss is unacceptably high. These concerns are rea-
sonable and need to be met through a comprehensive rethinking of adjustment and 
safety  nets  that  goes  well  beyond  earlier  upgrades  to  the  Trade  Adjustment  Assist-
ance  program.  Ultimately  this  should  mix  government  programs,  tax  incentives  for 
businesses, tax credits and vouchers for individuals, direct spending, and new roles 
for unions to ensure that layoffs no longer mean lost health insurance and pensions, 
threats  to  college  tuition  and  mortgage  payments,  and  in  the  broad  sense  financial 
catastrophe. 
Conclusion 

This  leaves  us  a  bit  removed  from  ‘‘free  trade’’  or  ‘‘U.S.  trade  policy’’  per  se.  To 

return to the Subcommittee’s original question, one might make three points. 

First, trade policy has brought the United States and the world a long way toward 
the  realization  of  Roosevelt’s  hope  of  a  strong  ‘‘economic  basis  for  the  secure  and 
peaceful world we all desire.’’ 

Second, it can do more—to create export opportunities by reducing trade barriers; 
to  help  the  poor  by  reforming  outdated  and  regressive  policies  at  home,  and  to 
strengthen  hopes  for  peace  by  supporting  reform  and  growth  in  the  Muslim  world. 
And third, to yield its full benefits, it must be accompanied by new and ambitious 
reforms at home, which blend open markets with the domestic and financial policies 
that  promote  growth  and  give  workers  the  tools  they  need  to  succeed  in  an  ever- 
more demanding world. 

Once again, I am grateful to the Subcommittee for inviting me to testify, and look 

forward to your questions. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Gresser,  thank  you  very  much.  Well,  this 
has been most interesting to hear different views of the same issue. 
It’s like eyewitness accounts of the same activity and seeing some-
thing very, very different. 

I  want  to  start  with  something  that  Senator  DeMint,  I  think, 
said  and  I  want  him  to  correct  me  if  I  have  it  wrong  because  I 
think it also goes to the center of some of this discussion. I happen 
to  think  that  big  trade  deficits,  by  and  large,  are  detrimental  and 
also relate to the number of jobs that are lost and I believe Senator 
DeMint,  in  his  opening  statement,  said  that  the  trade  deficit  is 
really not a deficit—do I have that correctly? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

51 

Senator DEMINT. Can I clarify? 
Senator DORGAN. Yes, please. 
Senator DEMINT. It’s not a debt that we have to pay back. 
Senator DORGAN. Not a debt. 
Senator DEMINT. But if I could—the point is, again using the ex-
ample  before—wealthy  people  are  always  going  to  buy  more  than 
poor  people,  just  as  wealthy  nations  will.  It’s  probably  something 
America  will  deal  with  for  a  long  time  but  if  you  send  $100  over-
seas  to  buy  something  and  you  get  something  that  is  worth  $110 
in  American  dollars.  You  end  up  with  more  wealth.  So  we  didn’t 
lose anything and there is no effective deficit. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Well,  I  want  to  focus  on  that.  That’s  what  I 
thought you said: that there is no effective debt. That’s going to be 
really  bad  news  to  the  Chinese  and  the  Japanese  who  hold  close 
to  a  trillion  dollars  of  our  currency  as  a  result  of  the  trade  deficit. 
But  it  seems  to  me  and  I’ll  ask  this  question  generally,  it  seems 
to  me  that  if  you  are  consuming  6  percent  more  than  you  are  pro-
ducing and you are purchasing from abroad those products and giv-
ing  them  American  IOUs,  which  means  that  we  owe  them  money, 
it  seems  to  me,  ultimately,  you’re  going  to  pay  them  back  with  a 
lower standard of living in this country. 

Mr. Hindery, what’s your reaction to that? Is there no trade debt 

here at all? 

Mr.  HINDERY.  Senator,  I  think  the  question  comes  to  the  core  of 
these hearings today. Some of my colleagues on the panel speak of 
past periods and even conditions today that would suggest we’re in 
surplus as opposed to deficit. We are the only nation acutely in def-
icit on trade, and to hark back to President Roosevelt 60 years ago 
and the conditions of that time makes no sense to me when the def-
icit is being caused by illegal and inappropriate trade behaviors by 
our largest trading partners. 

We  cannot  sustain  a  deficit  in  trade  of  this  magnitude  into  the 
foreseeable  future.  All  trade  theory,  as  Ms.  Wallach  can  comment, 
all  trade  theory  is  predicated  on  trade  balance.  That  is  the  whole 
theory  of  trade,  and  we  are  the  only  nation  in  imbalance.  She  can 
speak  more  capably  than  I  that  we  have,  in  fact,  had  the  tipping 
point  when  the  benefits,  Senator  DeMint,  in  my  opinion,  from 
lower  cost  products  coming  into  the  United  States  have  now  been 
dwarfed  by  the  costs  to  the  women  and  men  who  have  lost  their 
employment or seen their employment downgraded. 

None of the statistics dating back over the six past years give me 
any  comfort  that  our  employment  quality  and  our  employment 
numbers  are  improving—in  fact,  quite  the  opposite.  If  we  were  to 
calculate  unemployment,  Senator  Dorgan,  as  the  Europeans  do, 
which talk about under-employed individuals, people who have left 
the  labor  force,  and  people  who  are  part-time  of  necessity,  our 
numbers are deeply at risk here. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  ask  Mr.  Wenk—you  and  Mr.  Gresser 
largely  ignored  the  question  of  the  trade  balance  or  the  trade  def-
icit  and  described  areas  where  we  have  actually  increased  our  ex-
ports, one of which would be China, for example. We have, in fact, 
increased exports to China but we have dramatically increased im-
ports, sufficient so that now with China, we have a $232 billion im-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

52 

balance in a year. Does the U.S. Chamber find that troubling from 
an economic perspective? 

Mr.  WENK.  Well,  Senator,  thank  you  for  your  question.  There  is 
no  question  that  there  is  a  lot  of  hype  about  the  trade  deficit  and 
I think that some of the concerns that are raised are valid concerns 
but, first, a couple things. 

First of all, trade deficits tend to be pro-cyclical. If you look over 
the last 25 years, when the economy is expanding, the deficit seems 
to  go  up.  So  I  mean,  right  now,  we  have  unprecedented  growth  in 
this  country  and  the  deficit  is  high.  There  is  no  question  about  it. 
But  there  are  some  good  things  that  are  happening  because  of  the 
deficit  in  terms  of  some  of  the  products  that  we’re  importing  are 
keeping costs low. 

I  think  the  other  important  point  to  raise  is  that  if  you  look  at 
our  free  trade  agreements  and  the  deficit,  there  is  an  important 
point  to  make  there.  If  you  look  at  the  manufactured  goods  trade 
deficit,  for  example,  it  is  $530  billion,  which  is  obviously  very  sub-
stantial but of that amount, only $30 billion is with our FTA coun-
tries, including NAFTA and further, our deficit with our FTA coun-
tries  has  not  risen  in  the  last  5  years.  So  I  mean,  certainly  there 
are concerns about the debt, Senator, but that—— 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  want  to  get  the  facts  on  the  table  here  and 
I  think  your  facts  are  wrong,  Mr.  Wenk.  I  mean,  the  trade  deficit 
has  increased  generally  across  the  board.  Ms.  Wallach,  why  don’t 
you respond to that? But I think the facts need to be the facts. We 
all  have  our  own  opinions  but  we  can’t  have  our  own  facts.  Ms. 
Wallach? 

Ms. WALLACH. Well, first the trade deficits aren’t cyclic. They are 
the  result  of  particular  policies.  We  had  a  total  balanced  trade  in 
the  huge  boom  period  after  World  War  II,  one  of  our  greatest  ex-
pansionary periods. So that’s just not held up by the facts, actually. 
Our trade deficit increased during the recession, during the Reagan 
Administration.  I  mean,  it’s  unrelated.  The  fact  is,  we  have  a  set 
of rules that are causing particular results, which gets to the actual 
outcomes,  which  is  what  Mr.  Wenk  has  described  as  increased  ex-
ports  but  he  hasn’t  described  the  imports.  So  the  net  for  our  free 
trade agreement partners has been a catastrophe. 

I  mean,  with  NAFTA,  we  went  from  a  surplus  with  Mexico  to  a 
huge  deficit.  We  went  from  a  small  deficit  with  Canada  to  a  huge 
deficit  and  systematically,  with  our  free  trade  partners,  our  trade 
balance  has  gone  negative  or  is  going  negative  unless  you  sort  of 
play  with  the  numbers.  Like  for  instance,  he  mentioned  CAFTA. 
Well,  for  the  first—it’s  only  partially  implemented  but  for  the  first 
year  data,  which  was  only  actually  nine  months  of  the  agreement, 
there  was  a  sort  of  false  inhibition  on  U.S.  imports,  imports  into 
the U.S. because we’d messed up the rules of origin for textiles and 
apparel and everything was stuck at the docks. 

But when you now look at the data, once that problem has been 
cleared,  we  have—our  free  trade  agreements  are  the  source  of  a 
major part of our deficit. The data is with the government, not me. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Johnston,  some  would  say  you  just  can’t 
seem  to  compete.  Tough  luck.  It’s  a  global  economy,  my  friend.  If 
you  can’t  compete  in  a  global  economy,  what’s  wrong  with  you?  I 
mean, as you know, that’s some of the discussion here and around 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

53 

the country. I don’t share that but those are nonetheless the allega-
tions. So why as American businessmen, can’t you compete, accord-
ing to those who allege that? 

Mr.  JOHNSTON.  Well,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  think—if  you  look  at  it 
from  a  scale  of,  from  a  business  standpoint,  a  small  company.  I 
deal  with  small  companies.  I  deal  with  large  companies.  What  is 
happening  in  this  economy,  as  we  see  it,  large  multinational  cor-
porations  are  outsourcing  everything—basically  when  you  say 
pieces  and  parts  that  are  being  made,  they  are  being  outsourced. 
The  large  multinational  corporations—their  idea,  in  today’s  econ-
omy, is to design, to engineer and to assemble. They don’t want to 
manufacture,  all  right?  And  the  question  becomes,  who  can  do  it 
competitively?  Can  it  be  done  here  locally  in  this  country?  Or  is  it 
going  to  be  outsourced  to  China  or  other  countries?  The  question 
is,  it  becomes  strictly  a  price  issue  of  who  can  do  it  for  the  least 
amount of money. 

What happens there, from a small business standpoint, trying to 
compete,  you  lower  your  margins.  You  try  to  be  competitive,  how-
ever as your margins shrink, it’s very tough to remain competitive, 
to be able to cover all your costs of doing business. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Hindery,  do  you  want  to  respond  to  that? 
Mr.  HINDERY.  Mr.  Johnston’s  difficulties  are  not  because  of  the 
manner in which he or his counterparts run their companies. There 
clearly  are  some  things,  Senator,  that  I  believe  this  Congress 
should do to make his task easier around his income tax and work-
er  advantages  that  might  flow  to  his  company.  But  Mr.  Johnston 
is losing his business because our trading partners are cheating. 

I  think  attention  has  to  be  paid  not  to  the  time-worn  debate 
about  labor  costs,  which  is  tragic,  and  we  need  to  have  ILO  labor 
standards.  The  Chinese,  the  Indians  and  the  Japanese,  however, 
are  using  currency  manipulation  and  subsidies  that  by  anybody’s 
measure  dwarf  by  several  factors  the  advantages  they  continue  to 
have from low cost labor and poor environmental practices, both of 
which are inexcusable. But the subsidies and the currency manipu-
lation now, tax or capital or whatever you want to call them, in the 
aggregate  are  factors  more  than  the  predicament  that  he  faces  in 
Akron with his labor force and his productivity. 

Senator  DORGAN.  It  seems  to  me  if  you  can’t  learn  from  experi-
ence,  you’re  destined  to  repeat  whatever  that  experience  was.  I 
want to ask about Canada and Mexico. Mr. Gresser, I’ll ask you the 
question.  We  went  through  a  free  trade  agreement  with  Canada 
and  then  one  with  Canada  and  Mexico  called  NAFTA.  With  Can-
ada,  we  had  a  small  deficit  that  has  turned  into  a  very  large  def-
icit. With Mexico, we had a relatively small trade surplus that has 
turned  into  a  very  large  trade  deficit.  Would  you  agree  that  that 
has been the case with both? 

Mr. GRESSER. That’s certainly true. 
Senator  DORGAN.  And  if  that  is  the  case,  would  you  agree  that 
at  least  that  trade  agreement  or  those  two  trade  agreements 
haven’t worked out very well? 

Mr. GRESSER. No. 
Senator  DORGAN.  So  explain  to  me  how  it  is  successful  if  you 
turn a surplus into a big deficit or a small deficit into a much larg-
er trade deficit. How is that beneficial? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

54 

Mr.  GRESSER.  The  trade  deficit  the  U.S.  has  in  general,  I  think 
reflects three basic factors. One is the very low savings rate of the 
U.S. We are the world’s shoppers. We buy things. 

Senator  DORGAN.  You’re  describing  the  cause  of  the  deficit.  I’m 

asking whether the deficit is a success or a failure. 

Mr.  GRESSER.  I  don’t  think  the  deficit  is  a  success  or  a  failure 
of  trade  policy.  It  is  a  macroeconomic  phenomenon  aggravated  by 
the  very  sharp  increase  in  oil  and  energy  prices.  So  I  don’t  at-
tribute the increase in surplus with Australia and Singapore to the 
FTA  with  Australia  and  Singapore,  nor  do  I  treat  the  increase  in 
deficit with Mexico or Canada or Chile as the result of those FTAs. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Do  you  believe  the  trade  deficit  is  a  debt  that 

will have to repaid? 

Mr. GRESSER. We’ve been running a trade deficit since 1974 so— 
we’ve  built  up  liabilities.  Up  to  now,  we’ve  been  able  to  handle 
them quite well. 

Senator  DORGAN.  What  you  do  mean,  handle  them?  What’s  that 

mean? 

forfeiting? 

Mr.  GRESSER.  We’ve  been  able  to  grow  and  create  new  jobs  and 
manage  the  deficit  without  any  noticeable  stress  on  our  economy. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Does  handle  mean  paying  your  bills  without 

Mr. GRESSER. Yes. I suppose that’s what it means. 
Senator  DORGAN.  So  that’s  a  debt  that  has  to  be  repaid.  Mr. 

Wenk, do you agree with that? 

Mr. GRESSER. It is a build up of liabilities that requires us to pay 
back in the future. So far, it has not been unsustainable or unman-
ageable one. 

Senator DORGAN. I understand that. Mr. Wenk? 
Mr. WENK. I would agree with Mr. Gresser. Just to expand a lit-
tle  bit  more  on  NAFTA  because  I  know  this  is  an  issue  of  strong 
interest  to  you,  Senator  Dorgan.  Forty-six  out  of  the  50  states  in 
this  country—Mexico  or  Canada,  is  their  top  export  market.  There 
are a lot of companies that export to Canada and Mexico and U.S. 
manufacturing  exports  to  Mexico  and  Canada  have  been  growing 
50  percent  faster  than  they  have  to  any  other  parts  of  the  world. 
So NAFTA has been a success story for a lot of companies and fur-
ther, I would like to raise the fact that if you look at our trade def-
icit with NAFTA, Mexico and Canada, 70 percent of that is oil im-
ports  and  you  never  hear  about  that,  Senator.  Seventy  percent  of 
our  deficit  with  NAFTA  is  oil  imports  and  I  know  there  is  a  lot  of 
talk about what we want to—in terms of energy independence from 
the  Middle  East—we  have  our  oil  from  Mexico  and  Canada  and  I 
don’t think that’s such a bad thing. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Wenk,  just  quickly,  the  U.S.  Chamber  of 
Commerce,  when  we  passed  NAFTA,  said  the  following  and  paid 
some pretty expensive economists to say it for them as well: the re-
sult  of  a  trade  agreement  with  Mexico  will  mean  that  high  wage, 
high skill jobs will remain in this country and we will be importing 
the  product  of  low  wage,  low  skill  jobs  from  Mexico.  Do  you  have 
any  idea  of  what  type  of  products  are  coming  from  those  types  of 
jobs in Mexico that rank in the top three imports from Mexico? 

Mr. WENK. I know if you look at our trade relationship with Mex-

ico, most of our imports are in autos and auto parts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

55 

Senator DORGAN. Auto parts and electronics. 
Mr.  WENK.  And  I  know  that  was  one  of  the  main  purposes  for 
NAFTA was to integrate the auto market in North America—if you 
take  out  autos  and  auto  parts,  we  actually  have  a  trade  surplus 
with Mexico. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Automobiles,  automobile  parts  and  electronics 
are  the  top  three  and  the  fact  is,  it  is  exactly  the  opposite  of  what 
the  U.S.  Chamber  and  its  consultants  said  would  happen  with 
Mexico, exactly the opposite. The reason I ask that question is that 
if we can’t learn after 10 years of failure, we’re going to repeat the 
same mistakes. That’s the dilemma here. 

I’m  going  to  allow  Senator  DeMint  to  ask  some  questions  and 

then I have some additional questions. Senator DeMint? 

Senator  DEMINT.  Well,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  again,  I 
think this is a great exercise. We’ve got to figure out what the real 
facts  are  here.  I  appreciate  all  the  panelists.  I  do  think  we  need 
to  make  some  distinctions.  The  trade  deficit,  as  you  refer  to  it,  is 
basically a private sector phenomenon and I don’t think my friends 
here on the right have stated this correctly. 

When  we  import,  consumers  are  buying  things,  companies  are 
buying  things.  The  Federal  Government  is  not  buying  things  gen-
erally  although  that’s  a  small  piece  of  it.  But  the  trade  deficit  is 
not  something  that  is  paid  back.  We  have  to  pay  for  what  we  buy. 
But the money you talk about that China is holding is government 
debt  and  that  comes  from  the  government  spending  more  money 
here  than  we’re  taking  in,  in  revenue.  It’s  not  related  to  the  trade 
deficit. 

Now, I would ask Mr. Gresser and maybe Mr. Wenk, just quick-
ly, do you think that the trade deficit is a debt that we have to pay 
back?  I’m  not  talking  about  do  we  have  to  pay  for  the  stuff  that 
we buy but there is no accumulated debt and certainly the govern-
ment  debt  is  not  related  to  the  private  sector  trading  and  the  im-
ports.  So  would  you  wish  to  clarify  or  are  you  holding  to  this  that 
a trade deficit is a legal liability that hasn’t been paid? 

Mr.  GRESSER.  Overall,  a  trade  deficit,  as  I  understand  these 
things,  reflects  an  excess  of  consumption  or  production,  where 
you’re buying more than we make and grow. 

Senator DEMINT. Right. 
Mr. GRESSER. Over time, we have to pay for what you buy. If you 

have high growth—— 

Senator DEMINT. You pay for it when you buy it, don’t you? Like 
I  go  to  the  grocery  store,  I  pay  for  something,  take  my  groceries 
home.  I  have  a  trade  imbalance  with  them  because  they  never 
bought anything from me but I don’t owe them anything. 

Senator DORGAN. Maybe, Senator, if you might yield, if you take 
$80  to  the  grocery  store  and  buy  $100  worth  of  groceries,  you’re 
going to owe somebody $20. That’s the issue. 

Senator DEMINT. But that’s not what’s happening. 
Senator DORGAN. That’s exactly what’s happening. That’s exactly 
what’s happening. We’re buying six percent more than we produce. 
Senator  DEMINT.  Well,  the  government  debt  that  you  talk  about 
as being held by China—is the government spending too much and 
can’t  pay  its  bills.  The  trade  deficit  issue  is  a  separate  issue  and 
if companies are buying on credit, you’re right. We owe something. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

56 

If  the  trade  imbalance  is  partially  bought  on  credit  then  we  need 
to  look  into  how  much  of  it  is  being  paid  for  with  credit  and  how 
much is being paid for with cash. 

But  generally,  the  companies  that  I’ve  done  a  whole  lot  of  work 
with that trade all around the world, they buy something, they pay 
for it. And maybe there are some that are leaving huge debts over-
seas but that’s something we need to look at. 

But let me just make a couple of other points because I think all 
of  you  made  good  points  on  both  sides  of  this.  I  have  to  say, 
though,  I  have  a  degree  of  disappointment  with  all  of  the  testi-
mony.  It  seems  that  we  all  put  on  our  glasses—either  we’re  for 
trade  and  we  try  to  find  everything  good  with  it  and  nothing  bad, 
or  we  put  on  our  glasses  and  we’re  against  trade  and  we  just  try 
to find everything wrong with it that we can. Like Ms. Wallach has 
built  her  whole  baseline  on  right  after  the  World  War  II  economy 
where we had a war economy and we bombed out our trading com-
petitors and so we had a surplus. 

You would expect that after what we went through in World War 
II, but I think what we’re not talking about is just the reality that 
we are trading. We are going to trade. We have to trade. We must 
compete  with  our  trading  partners.  We’re  not  going  to  be  able  to 
dictate  the  rules  of  other  nations.  Certainly  we  can  write  better 
agreements, hopefully getting a more level playing field but we can 
never expect it to be the same. The cost of business in South Caro-
lina  is  different  than  the  cost  of  business  in  North  Carolina  or 
North Dakota. We’re not going to be able to get agreements where 
everything is the same. So we have to be competitive. 

I’m  disappointed  in  my  Chamber  and  business  friends  over  here 
that  they  didn’t  talk  about  more  of  the  competitiveness  issues  and 
the employment issues. I think on this side, if what you are saying 
is  true,  half  of  the  Americans  would  be  out  of  jobs.  The  fact  is,  we 
do have one of the best economies and the lowest rate of unemploy-
ment.  Wages  haven’t  grown  as  much  as  we’d  like  but  consumer 
savings,  if  you  add  in  that,  the  American  dollars  are  buying  more. 
We do have growing exports and manufacturing output is going up. 
Certainly we don’t employ as many in the manufacturing sector as 
we have because of productivity, but manufacturing output is going 
up across the country. 

What  I  hear  and  I  wonder  who  is  really  actually  talking  to  em-
ployers, because I talk to a lot of them. I don’t hear that they don’t 
have  jobs  for  people.  I  hear  that  they  can’t  find  the  workers  they 
need  at  every  skill  level.  They  can’t  find  low  wage  workers  in  the 
hospitality business in South Carolina. 

The high tech industry—when they come in my office and say we 
need  to  expand  visas  so  we  can  get  more  qualified  workers  from 
overseas. What we need to be talking about is why aren’t we bring-
ing more people into math and science and training them to be en-
gineers;  so  that  we  can  do  research  and  development  in  this  coun-
try and talk about the failure of our education system where China 
and India are out-pacing us. 

We  do  know  that  a  large  part  of  our  trade  deficit  is  energy  re-
lated  yet  as  a  Congress,  we  won’t  open  up  our  own  oil  supplies  or 
even  for  low  emissions  natural  gas.  I’ve  had  company  after  com-
pany  in  South  Carolina  say  I  can’t  produce  here.  I  can’t  produce 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

57 

plastics.  I  can’t  produce  fertilizers  when  I  can  go  right  across  the 
border  and  get  natural  gas  for  less  than  half  of  what  we  have  to 
pay here. I can’t compete with the world. 

Yet  here  in  Congress,  we  still  refuse  to  open  up  known  natural 
gas  reserves.  We  know  our  tax  rates  are  the  second  highest  in  the 
world.  When  you’ve  got  countries  with  half  our  corporate  tax  rate, 
how in the world are we going to compete? And we talk about, let’s 
put up barriers because other people are cheating. And we’re cheat-
ing  on  ourselves  with  a  regulatory  and  legal  environment  that 
makes it hard for us to compete. 

So  I  agree  that  we  need  better  trade  agreements.  We  need  more 
enforcement  of  trade  agreements.  I  think  we  have  been  too  quick 
to  sign  agreements  and  not  quick  enough  to  enforce  them  and  to 
get  after  them.  But  we  can’t  take  the  strategy  that  hey,  let’s  don’t 
have  any  more  agreements  because  for  the  most  part,  as  it’s  al-
ready been stated, our markets are open. 

Every  time  we  go  to  do  a  trade  agreement,  generally  we’re  com-
ing out better than we were before. It may not be where you want 
but  we’re  opening  up  their  markets  more  to  our  products.  I  don’t 
think  we’ve  done  enough,  but  I  think  we  need  to  work  both  sides 
of  this.  We  need  better  agreements  but  we  need  to  be  competitive 
as a nation and recognize those obstacles to competition that we’re 
not hearing enough of on the Chamber side and we’re certainly not 
hearing enough on this side. We’ve got a skill level problem in this 
country  where  businesses  are  demanding  workers  that  we  don’t 
have  in  this  country  and  we  can’t  keep  saying  we’re  losing  jobs. 
Jobs  are  going  away.  We’re  losing  jobs  in  different  sectors.  We’re 
gaining them in others but the fact is, we’re not producing a work-
force that can compete in a global economy and certainly not at the 
volume levels. 

I’ll  tell  you,  Mr.  Hindery,  I  can  tell  you  want  to  say  something 
and  then  I’d  like  to  get  some  on  the  other  side  to  say  something 
here. 

Mr.  HINDERY.  Senator,  I  find  your  comments  about  education 
and  energy  policy  comforting  and  very  appropriate.  None  of  us,  I 
believe, would take any exception to any effort by this Congress to 
improve  education  in  this  country,  to  make  it  more  responsive  to 
the  needs  of  the  employers,  worker  skills,  a  more  informed  energy 
policy.  You  and  I  and  Mr.  Johnston  do  share  some  backgrounds. 
We’ve  drawn  paychecks  from  our  corporate  lives.  We’ve  had  the 
privilege of running companies. 

The  concern  that  I  have  and  I  would  ask  you  to  think  about  is, 
you and I know how to compete. Mr. Johnston certainly knows how 
to  compete.  But  competition  has  to  be  fair  and  the  point  I  would 
make  to  you  to  reflect  on  perhaps,  is  that  I  believe  passionately 
that we are losing in this trade deficit and jobs issue because of un-
fair  and  illegal  behaviors.  I  know  all  the  issues  about  productivity 
and  under-educated  and  poorly  educated  workers.  I’ll  stand  with 
you as I know this entire Congress will, to address those. 

The  issue  that  has  to  draw  attention  quickly  is  that  certain  of 
our  major  trading  partners  are  using  illegal  practices.  When  you 
commented  in  your  statement  that  the  trade  deficit  is  a  private 
phenomenon, a corporate phenomenon, it is not. Mr. Johnston does 
not  compete  against  a  Chinese  manufacturing  company.  He  com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

58 

petes  against  the  Chinese  government  and  a  Chinese  manufac-
turing company. 

Most  of  the  burden  he  has  to  confront  competitively  is  unfair 
subsidy, illegal subsidy under the WTO—very verifiable. It’s capital 
grants. It’s loans. It’s tax policies and it goes on to currency manip-
ulation. There has been much testimony—— 

Senator  DEMINT.  I  don’t  argue  with  the  government  competition 
but  that  does  not  create  a  long  term  liability  that  has  to  be  paid 
back.  I  mean,  we  were  just  talking  about  the  deficit  then.  I  don’t 
disagree  with  you  that  China  is  cheating  and  particularly  in  a 
manufacturing type of metalworking environment. We have a very 
difficult  time  competing  with  their  subsidies.  We  do  need  to  ad-
dress subsidies. 

At  the  same  time,  we  can’t  say  our  corporate,  our  tax  rates  are 
going to be 39 or 40 percent and that China is cheating by not hav-
ing  a  tax  rate  at  all,  or  Europe  is  cheating  because  they  have  a 
value-added  tax  that  they  rebate  at  the  border.  The  fact  is,  we’re 
doing  some  of  it  to  ourselves  and  we  need  to  talk  about  both  sides 
of it. 

Mr. HINDERY. Well said, Senator. We are doing a lot of it to our-
selves  and  that  is  the  point  we’re  trying  to  make.  There  are  very 
positive,  remedial  actions  around  corporate  income  taxes  and 
around the way we address our own employer force in this country. 
I’m just hoping that attention will be drawn quickly to the fact that 
the loss of jobs is greatly exacerbated by illegal behaviors. 

Senator DEMINT. Yes, good. Anyone? Mr. Wenk? 
Mr.  WENK.  Senator,  I  just  want  to  say  that  you  did  hit  the  nail 
on  the  head  about  competitiveness  and  I’m  sorry  I  didn’t  mention 
it  more  in  my  testimony,  but  this  is  absolutely  critical  and  all  the 
issues  that  you  raised  are  issues  that  the  Chamber  is  working  on, 
on  a  daily  basis.  There  is  no  question.  You  mentioned  the  skilled 
workforce  issue.  When  Tom  Donahue  is  out  talking  to  our  compa-
nies,  there  is  no  doubt  that  this  is  a  critical  issue.  So  I  just  want 
to  reiterate  that  we  are  right  with  you.  This  is  a  competitiveness 
issue. 

Senator  DEMINT.  What  I  hope  I  can  hear  from  you  guys  is  not 
just  pushing  Fast  Track  or  more  trade  agreements.  We’ve  go  to 
push  these  other  things.  We’ve  got  Sarbanes-Oxley  but  it’s  about 
to run us out of business as a nation and we’re not doing anything 
about  it.  But  when  the  Chamber  and  other  business  groups  and 
pro-trade  groups  come  up  and  say,  we  want  Fast  Track,  we  want 
more  trade  agreements,  you’ve  got  to  have  in  that  package—we’ve 
got to have things that are going to make us more competitive and 
get the government off of our back and I’m not suggesting that we 
are talking about things that reduce fairness to workers. 

But it’s going to be hard to compete with gold-plated health plans 
and  things  like  that,  that  we  have  on  some  of  our  companies.  But 
we  need  a  balanced  approach  here.  It  doesn’t  help  at  all  to  have 
a completely anti-trade position when most of our economy is inter-
twined  with  trade.  Even  in  South  Carolina  where  we  were  a  huge 
textile  state  that  now  the  textile  companies  that  remain  are  com-
pletely  dependent  on  exporting  the  fabric  they  make  so  it  can  be 
cut and sewn in another country and sent back here without tariffs 
so that they can stay in the loop. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

59 

And  if  we  start  getting  protectionism  on  the  border,  first  of  all, 
the  other  countries  aren’t  going  to  take  ours  without  a  tariff  and 
when  it  comes  back  in,  it’s  going  to  have  tariff  and  our  fabric  peo-
ple are going to be out of business. Ms. Wallach, I can tell you want 
to say something. 

Ms. WALLACH. Well, I want to challenge the notion that one has 
to  be  either  for  trade  or  anti-trade.  The  discussion  is  about  under 
what rules. I’m for trade. The thing that concerns me is the actual 
performance of the current rules. So under the current rules, there 
is a labor arbitrage. The question of where you’re going to invest— 
you  could  whack  every  tax,  Social  Security  cost,  healthcare  cost 
and  it  still  is  a  dollar  a  day  for  a  manufacturing  worker  in  China 
and  there  isn’t  anyone  in  America  who  is  going  to  work  for  that. 
So investment, going to the cheapest dollar to get the highest re-
turn  under  these  rules,  which  allows  that,  no  matter  what  you  do 
for what you describe as competitiveness, is not going to fix the sit-
uation unless you change the way the trade rules work. 

Senator  DEMINT.  But  you  would  agree  that  increasingly,  fewer 
and  fewer  manufacturing  companies  are  actually  relying  on  a  dol-
lar  a  day  worker.  The  fact—the  more  technically  advanced  that 
manufacturing  gets,  the  higher  the  skills  level  that  are  required. 
And  it  makes  it  harder  and  harder  for  our  trade  partners  to  com-
pete with cheap labor. It’s technology and it’s a lower cost of doing 
business. 

We  see  that  all  over  my  state.  It’s  not  so  much  a  matter  of  the 
cost of labor anymore. It’s other factors. There are very few manu-
facturing companies now that the cost of labor is nearly as high as 
it was 20 years ago so what we’re trying to do is look at those fac-
tors  that  make  us  less  competitive  and  a  lot  of  them  are  outside 
the companies’ control here in this country. 

Ms.  WALLACH.  Well,  the  kinds  of  costs,  though,  that  you’re  talk-
ing  about  are  those  no  one  wants  to  live  with  the  results  of.  I 
mean, in China, it’s not just the higher paid worker gets $10 a day. 
You still can’t compete with that as a U.S. company or a U.S. work-
er,  but  it  is  also  being  able  to  dump  your  toxics  into  the  air  or  on 
the  ground—no  health  or  safety  costs  that  obviously  are  the  bar-
gain you make to live in a comfortable and healthy country. 

Senator  DEMINT.  That’s  not  what  I’m  talking  about,  though. 
What  I’m  talking  about  is  the  cost  of  energy.  There  is  no  reason 
our  cost  of  energy  should  be  two  or  three  times  as  much  as  they 
pay in China. There is no reason our corporate tax rates should ba-
sically  keep  us  out  of  the  market—not  just  with  China  and  India 
but  with  our  European  allies  as  well.  We’re  not  ready  to  change 
and  there  is  no  reason  that  as  much  as  we  spend  on  education, 
which  is  more  than  any  other  country  in  the  world—that  we  lose 
ground every year with skill levels of our workforce. 

These are the things—but less and less, it’s labor costs. More and 

more, it’s these other things. 

Ms.  WALLACH.  The  energy  costs,  for  instance,  are  exactly  what 
Mr.  Hindery  is  talking  about.  The  government  subsidizes  it.  The 
government  provides  the  cheap  energy  so  relative  to  competition, 
we’re talking about different rules. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Yes,  we  do  exactly  the  opposite.  We  say  we’re 
not going to produce our own even though it’s here. We’re going to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

60 

buy it from countries that are gouging us and we’re going to be less 
competitive.  And  unless  we’re  willing  to  bring  all  of  this  to  the 
table and say, OK. We can keep ANWR off the table. We can keep 
the  Gulf  natural  gas  off  the  table  but  the  fact  is,  that’s  more  of  a 
cost to most manufacturers than labor. 

Ms. WALLACH. I just want to—— 
Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  just—let  me  make  a  couple  of  points 
and then ask some questions as well. First of all, being competitive 
with  what?  Should  we  compete  with  someone  in  Shenzhen,  China, 
who  is  working  for  20  cents  an  hour?  Should  we  compete  with 
someone  who  is  working  in  an  unsafe  plant?  Should  we  compete 
with a 12-year-old working for a dime an hour? Should we compete 
with a country that says to the employer, if your people are trying 
to  organize,  you’re  welcome  to  throw  them  in  prison?  Should  we 
compete  with  a  company  in  China  that  dumps  its  chemicals  into 
the water and its effluents into the air? Compete with what? 

I’m talking now about regulations, the dreaded word, regulation. 
We  have  expanded  the  middle  class.  We  have  created  regulations 
that have given us a better country over a century. Now some say, 
well  you  can’t  compete.  Go  compete  with  Shenzhen,  China,  some 
plant  in  Shenzhen  that  is  hiring  kids  and  dumping  the  effluents 
into the air and water and by the way, shipping off some folks that 
want  to  organize  workers  because  they  didn’t  get  paid,  shipping 
them off to prison for a couple of years. 

I  mean,  that’s  competition  I  don’t  understand  and  don’t  want  to 
be  involved  in  because  I  think  they  ought  to  be  competing  with  us 
by raising their standards. 

The  second  point  is  this—I  think  it  is  very  important  for  us  to 
try to decide what kind of a country we want. Is this a race to the 
bottom? Or after a century of lifting our country and creating some-
thing  no  one  else  created,  an  expanded  middle  class  where  people 
had  good  jobs  that  paid  well  with  benefits  is  that  what  we  aspire 
to have happen in the future? 

I  mentioned  in  the  opening  statement  the  3,400  people  laid  off 
by  Circuit  City.  And  it  was  interesting  to  notice  that  this  was  in 
the  name  of  efficiency.  They  were  apparently  good  workers  but  to 
be more efficient, you had to hire lower paid workers and someone 
said,  well,  this  is  breaking  the  social  safety  net  that  corporations 
have  and  they  said,  you  get  rid  of  healthcare  costs  and  retirement 
benefits in the name of efficiency. 

Well, I always thought that we created a country in which people 
negotiated  for  wages  with  employers  and  part  of  their  compensa-
tion was a wage and benefits. And I think to decide somehow that 
the road to efficiency that has dumped the benefits of the American 
workers is exactly the wrong approach. 

Having  said  all  that,  we’re  going  to  have  a  very  interesting  dis-
cussion in this Congress about these issues and should. But I want 
to go back to one of the central points at the start. I think our ex-
perience  has  been  largely  a  failure  in  free  trade  because  what’s 
happened is that we ratcheted up very high deficits. Last year, we 
exported  $55  billion  worth  of  goods  to  China.  We  bought  $288  bil-
lion  from  China,  in  goods  from  China.  We  sent  them  $55  billion. 
We  bought  $288  billion.  The  difference  was  $233  billion.  That’s  a 
debt. We owe that to somebody. And what happened was—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

61 

Senator DEMINT. Are you saying we didn’t pay for that? 
Senator  DORGAN.  Oh,  no.  We  sent  them  bonds  and  so  they  hold 
American  bonds  or  American  currency  with  which  they  can  pur-
chase—— 

Senator DEMINT. Is there a motive to send them bonds? 
Senator DORGAN. With which they can purchase your business or 

perhaps part of your state, part of your real estate. 

Senator DEMINT. That’s a fact we need to figure out because that 

was not all done with bonds. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Well,  they  are  not  holding  fictitious  pieces  of 
paper,  I  guarantee  you.  If  they  shipped  us  $288  billion  worth  of 
goods,  I  guarantee  you  that  they  wanted  something  for  it,  either 
cold  cash  or  instruments  of  debt.  So  that’s  where  the  debt  is,  Sen-
ator  DeMint  and  the  debt  is  real  and  I  know  of  no  economist  that 
would  suggest  that  all  of  that  which  is  now  held  by  China  and 
Japan is somehow worthless. That is simply not the case. 

Now I want to ask a couple of questions. Mr. Wenk said that the 
average  household  has  been  increased  by  $10,000—I  forget  the 
timeframe,  which  is  an  interesting  statistic.  Ms.  Wallach,  respond 
to that. 

Ms.  WALLACH.  Well,  my  first  response  would  be  to  propose  that 
the  American  public  bill  the  Chamber  of  Commerce  for  their 
$10,000  because  most  households  certainly  have  not  increased 
$10,000  of  income  under  these  trade  agreements.  In  fact,  the 
data—that  number,  just  to  understand  it,  that’s  the  growth  in  our 
national income divided by the population. So that doesn’t take into 
account distribution and the fact that our income inequality has in-
creased to levels not seen since the Robber Baron era, with all the 
gains  going  to  a  very  few  on  the  top  and  the  bottom  falling  out, 
shows  that  in  fact,  for  the  majority  of  Americans,  not  only  have 
they not gotten the gain, but as I demonstrated and there is a long 
paper  by  the  Center  for  Economic  and  Policy  Research  that  shows 
the math. For most Americans who don’t have a college degree, 70 
percent  of  us,  they’ve  suffered  net  losses  in  income.  That  $10,000 
has accumulated in corporate profits. 

Senator DORGAN. Just a couple of other questions. You’re all very 
patient  and  you’re  nice  to  come  and  make  a  presentation.  Mr. 
Wenk,  the  U.S.  Chamber—I  want  to  put  up  a  chart  here.  One  of 
the  problems  that  I  see  is  businesses  that  wish  to  go  access  cheap 
labor  are  searching  for,  for  example,  the  people  that  used  to  make 
Huffy  bicycles,  they  all  got  fired  and  now  Huffy  is  actually  a  Chi-
nese  company  in  Shenzhen,  China;  and  so  they  wanted  to  make 
Huffy  bicycles  in  China  because  they  can  pay  20  or  30  cents  an 
hour  and  work  them  7  days  a  week,  12  to  14  hours  a  day  in  that 
particular factory. 

When there is an effort in China to increase and improve stand-
ards, here’s what the result is, generally. This is a New York Times 
piece.  ‘‘China  drafts  law  to  empower  unions  and  labor  abuse.’’  It 
was  probably  more  window  dressing  than  it  was  substance,  but 
that’s  what  the  Chinese  government  said  because  of  very  substan-
tial complaints and pressure from us. 

The  move  which  underscores  the  government’s  growing  concern 
about  the  widening  income  gap  and  threats  of  social  unrest  is  set-
ting off a battle with American and other foreign corporations that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

62 

have  lobbied  against  it  by  hinting  they  may  build  fewer  factories 
there. Hoping to head off some of the rules, representatives of some 
American  companies  are  waging  an  intense  lobbying  campaign  to 
persuade  the  Chinese  government  to  revise  or  abandon  the  pro-
posed  law.  The  American  Chamber  of  Commerce  sent  in  a  lengthy 
response with objections to the proposals. 

Mr.  Wenk,  isn’t  this  a  case  where  the  American  Chamber  of 
Commerce, on behalf of businesses in this country who want to ac-
cess cheap labor and conditions we would not allow in this country, 
conditions by the way, that if they existed a block down the street, 
you  and  I,  I  assume  together,  with  every  member  of  the  panel, 
would  call  law  enforcement  and  go  down  and  shut  it  down.  Isn’t 
this a case of trying to see if you can continue to keep down stand-
ards abroad. I mean, why would the Chamber be involved in that? 
Mr. WENK. Thank you, Senator. This whole issue raises the ques-
tion  of  the  race  to  the  bottom  argument,  which  we’ve  heard  a  cou-
ple  of  times  today.  If  you  look  at  2005  Department  of  Commerce 
data,  80  percent  of  U.S.  manufacturing  investment  happens  right 
here in the United States of America. If you look at—— 

Senator DORGAN. Eighty percent of what? I’m sorry. 
Mr.  WENK.  Eighty  percent  of  U.S.  manufacturing  investment 
takes  place  right  here  in  the  United  States  of  America  and  if  you 
look at the other part of that piece, 90 percent of that goes to high 
wage  countries,  namely  Europe.  So  this  whole  issue  of  race  to  the 
bottom,  we  think  that  companies  are  lifting  up  and  going  to  all 
these  low  wage  countries.  If  you  look  at  the  data,  it  just  doesn’t 
show  that.  It  shows  that  mostly  the  investment  does  happen  here 
and  the  investment  that  goes  abroad  goes  to  high  wage  countries, 
not to low wage countries like China. 

And with regards to China, there are certainly a lot of challenges 
with  regards  to  the  U.S.-China  economic  relationship.  Clearly,  the 
Administration  has  been  heeding  some  of  these  concerns.  As  you 
probably  are  well  aware,  they  have  filed  two  or  three  WTO  cases 
against China on subsidies and intellectual property and others re-
cently. 

There  is  no  question  that  China  has  a  long  way  to  go  in  terms 
of  meeting  their  obligations  under  the  WTO,  and  we  strongly  sup-
port  the  process  that  is  in  place  right  now  between  the  U.S.  Gov-
ernment  and  the  Chinese  government,  the  strategic  economic  dia-
logue,  the  JCCT,  to  make  sure  that  we  get  China  to  abide  by  all 
their WTO commitments and that’s something that we are strongly 
committed to doing, Senator. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But  that  didn’t  respond  to  my  question.  My 
question  was,  why  would  the  U.S.  Chamber  weigh  in—in  opposi-
tion to the government of China’s apparent determination to try to 
improve things for Chinese workers? 

Mr. WENK. I have to say, Senator, that was the American Cham-
ber of Commerce in China, which is a member of ours but I am not 
unfortunately  familiar  with  this  issue.  I  could  get  back  to  you  in 
writing  in  terms  of  what  the  AmCham’s  position  was  on  this  but 
as  the  U.S.  Chamber  of  Commerce  here,  I  was  not  aware  of  this. 
Senator  DORGAN.  If  you  will  send  me  a  note  on  that,  I’d  appre-

ciate it. 

Mr. WENK. I’d be happy to, Senator. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

63 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Hindery, I want to ask you a question but 
I  want  to  preface  it  with  a  piece  of  information.  When  our  govern-
ment—this was under the previous Administration, by the way. 

When  our  government  negotiated  a  bilateral  trade  agreement 
with China, a country which is now ramping up an automobile ex-
port market because they wish to send a lot of Chinese automobiles 
into this country, we said to the Chinese, with whom we had a very 
large  trade  deficit,  the  following—when  you  ship  a  Chinese  car  to 
the  United  States,  we  will  impose  a  21⁄2 percent  tariff  on  it  and 
when  we  ship  a  U.S.  car  to  be  sold  in  China,  you  may  impose  a 
25  percent  tariff.  To  a  country  with  whom  we  had  a  very  large 
trade  deficit,  we  said,  it’s  okay  for  you  to  impose  a  tariff  10  times 
the size of the one we would impose on bilateral automobile trade. 
Now,  I  mentioned  that  fact,  which  I  think  is  part  of  the  igno-
rance  with  respect  to  the  construction  of  trade  agreements  that 
causes many of these problems and I could go through chapter and 
verse of these types of things, giving away the store and not stand-
ing up for our country’s economic interests. 

My colleague, Senator DeMint, said that the trade deficit is a pri-
vate  sector  phenomenon.  It  is  not  at  all—in  fact,  when  an  Amer-
ican  company  is  trying  to  compete  in  a  circumstance  on  bilateral 
automobile  trade  and  our  government  has  said,  you  know  what, 
we’ll tilt the balance so that the Chinese can have a 10-time advan-
tage  with  respect  to  this  bilateral  trade  with  respect  to  the  tariff, 
that’s a government issue. That’s not a private sector issue and the 
resulting trade deficit that comes from it, it seems to me, is a direct 
result of government policy. 

But  respond  to  this  general  question  that  the  trade  deficit  is  a 

private sector phenomenon. 

Mr.  HINDERY.  The  trade  deficit  has  almost  never  in  the  history 
of  the  world  been  a  company-to-company  phenomenon.  All  of  the 
abuses, Senator, arise around the intervention of governments into 
what should be free trade and they make it unfair trade. And that 
unfairness can be as disappointing as the wage and environmental 
practices  that  Ms.  Wallach  spoke  about  or  it  can  be  the  subsidies, 
the tariffs, the loans, the currency manipulation that you are refer-
ring to. 

The  point  that  I  would  continue  to  make  to  Senator  DeMint  is 
it’s  not  fair  trade  any  longer.  It  hasn’t  been  for  a  very  long  time. 
The  reason  why  TPA  should  not  be  approved  in  its  present  form 
is simply to not have a repeat of the horrible example you just por-
trayed.  Congress  needs  to  weigh  in  on  these  issues  in  some  form 
or in some fashion. Congress should not be negotiating agreements 
per  se.  That  can’t  be  done  in  a  body  of  this  magnitude  but  the 
standards,  the  principles  that  Congress  believes  in  has  to  be  part 
of our trading practices. 

The  concern  that  I  have  about  Senator  DeMint’s  sense  of  this 
deficit is, it is in fact, a debt. If you want to put it into the context 
of  one  country  versus  another,  the  U.S.  versus  China,  we  produce 
much,  much  less  than  we  consume  of  their  goods.  That  has  to  be 
paid  for.  It’s  being  paid  for  every  day  by  our  children  and  our 
grandchildren  into  the  future  and  nobody  believes,  Senator  no 
economists—none  of  that  61⁄2 percent  of  GDP,  year  after  year,  7 
percent of GDP is a sustainable deficit that this economy can han-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

64 

dle. It’s left us—it’s left China with $1.2 trillion of foreign reserves, 
$1.2  trillion.  It’s  using  them  against  our  national  interests  in  Afri-
ca.  It’s  using  them  to  buy  our  companies.  That’s  the  next  threat 
that  we  should  confront  is  those  dollars  are  going  to  start  coming 
back into the United States and buying up our companies. And we 
have  to  get  our  hands  around  these  subsidies  and  these  outcomes 
now before it gets even worse. 

I  really  would  call  everyone’s  attention  on  this  Subcommittee, 
Senator,  to  the  reality  that  the  job  loss  is  only  going  to  get  worse 
from  here.  It’s  inevitably  going  to  get  worse.  We’re  not  crying  over 
spilled milk, as horrible as those five million jobs are. We will lose 
15 to 40 million more jobs with the policies in place that Ms. Wal-
lach spoke to, those rules. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Other  than  Mr.  Johnston,  will  anyone  else  at 
the panel have their jobs threatened? Mr. Johnston’s firm, he says, 
is suffering from a significant disadvantage but I assume—— 

Mr.  HINDERY.  I  would  have  answered  less  likely  and  then  I 
watched  Citigroup  move  9,500  jobs  that  were  of  the  sort  that  I 
thought this next generation could take more comfort in. Tech jobs, 
service  jobs  of  every  magnitude  and  manufacturing  jobs  are  now 
equally at risk by anybody’s measure. 

Senator DORGAN.—it used to be just the people who took a show-
er in the evening after they came home from work whose jobs were 
of  concern.  These  were  the  people  who  went  out  and  worked  hard 
on a manufacturing line or an assembly line. So they are the folks 
that  came  home  to  find  out  that—or  went  to  work  to  find  out 
that—their jobs left and they came home and said, honey, I lost my 
job.  It  wasn’t  because  I  did  a  bad  job,  it  was  because  somebody 
would do the work for 20 cents an hour and I couldn’t. 

But  now,  it  is  more  than  that.  The  threat,  of  course,  is  for  engi-

neering and design and a whole series of things I’ve described. 

Mr.  HINDERY.  You  know,  Senator  Cantwell  was  here  from  the 
State  of  Washington—you  were  here  during  the  NAFTA  discus-
sions  and  expressed  your  concern  rightly  today.  The  Boeing  Com-
pany  was  advertised  in  the  NAFTA  debate  as  one  of  the  great 
beneficiaries  of  NAFTA  and  the  Boeing  worker.  Today,  10  years 
later,  Boeing  has  half  of  the  American  workers  that  it  did  at  the 
onset of the WTO–NAFTA—half. 

Manufacturing  of  aircraft  by  the  Boeing  Aircraft  Company,  Air-
line  Company  and  aircraft  company  today—final  assembly,  which 
is  what  we  do  here,  is  about  six  percent  of  the  value  of  that  air-
plane. We have half the labor force in the Boeing Company in Sen-
ator Cantwell’s home state. 

Senator  DORGAN.  My  point  was  that  people  from  think  tanks 
won’t  lose  their  jobs.  The  U.S.  Chamber  will  be  fine.  Members  of 
Congress,  we  all  wear  blue  suits  and  wheeze  all  day.  Nobody  from 
Congress  will  lose  their  jobs.  That  might  explain  the  lack  of  ur-
gency here in the Congress to try to deal with some of these issues. 
But another explanation is that there are people who believe this 
has  been  a  resounding  success.  I  happen  to  believe  that  the  cir-
cumstances of our trade represent a failure, number one, and num-
ber  two,  a  failure  to  stand  up  for  our  own  economic  interests,  our 
own  producers,  our  own  workers  and  number  three  and  more  im-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

65 

portant, I think this causes some very significant future danger for 
our country, for our country’s economic opportunities. 

I  have  not  been  Alan  Greenspan’s  biggest  fan  over  many  years 
because  he  usually  sounds  the  alarm  too  late  or  takes  action  too 
quickly,  one  of  the  two  and  depending  on  the  circumstances,  with 
either interest rates or manufacturing health. 

But  Alan  Greenspan  has  been  warning  about  the  long  term  con-
sequences  of  this.  Warren  Buffet,  of  course—it  would  be  hard  to 
find  someone  at  the  table  that  has  a  much  better  trends  seer  or 
spotter than Warren Buffet. He feels like—the question isn’t when. 
The question is what will happen and how much of it will happen. 
If  we  were  meeting  here  2  years  ago,  people  like  Warren  Buffet 
and others would have told us as well. The question isn’t when the 
housing bubble bursts—all bubbles burst at some point and he will 
make  the  point,  and  has  many  times,  that  the  question  isn’t  when 
we  have  to  come  to  grips  with  the  danger  and  also  the  con-
sequences of a trade deficit that is galloping along and is the high-
est in human history. 

The  question  isn’t  when.  The  question  is  what  will  the  con-
sequences be for this country and will we take action soon enough? 
All five of you have offered interesting observations. 

I have to leave for another engagement but if you want to make 
any additional pithy, immediate short points, I’d be happy to allow 
you to do that. Mr. Johnston, thank you for coming here from Ohio. 
Mr.  JOHNSTON.  Thank  you,  Senator.  I  would  like  to  add  to  Mr. 
DeMint’s  comments  earlier  in  regards  to  trade.  I  am  not  against 
trade. I am for trade. It’s just if you see it from a level of manufac-
turing  and  you  see  small  businesses  that  are  slowly  going  out  of 
business  because  they  can’t  compete  and  watching  this  over  the 
last 16 years, I’ve seen good times and I’ve seen very bad times and 
I have to admit, the last couple of years have been fairly good. 

However,  what’s  down  the  road,  I  guess,  is  the  question  and  I 
think  we  need  to  come  to  some  kind  of  understanding  from  both 
sides  to  where  we  can  bring  this  together  so  that  we  can  compete 
fairly in the globalized economy. Thank you. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  want  to  make  one  final  point  that  has  to  be 
addressed  before  I  adjourn  this  and  that  is  the  issue  of  tax  rates. 
We  are  not  creating  tax  rates  in  this  country  that  put  American 
businesses  at  a  disadvantage.  First  of  all,  the  issue  isn’t  the  rate. 
The  issue  is  what  tax  is  paid.  And  frankly,  The  Washington  Post 
the  other  day  talked  about  the  10,000  offshore  subsidiaries  in  the 
Cayman Islands alone. 

My  notion  is  this—the  biggest  problem  with  corporate  tax  is  not 
that  they  are  over-taxed.  It’s  that  they  are  not  paying  their  fair 
share  and  that’s  because  of  dramatic  increases  in  foreign  subsidi-
aries. I’ve used the example on the floor of the Senate many times, 
of  the  Ugland  House,  which  is  in  the  Grand  Cayman  Islands  on  a 
little quiet street called Church Street. It’s a five-story, white build-
ing  and  it  is  home  to  12,748  corporations.  Of  course,  they  are  not 
there.  That’s  an  illegal  fiction  created  by  high-priced  lawyers  to 
allow  the  corporation  to  say,  here’s  where  we  exist  so  that  I  can 
ship my jobs to China, buy the products in this country, sell them, 
make  an  income  and  run  my  income  to  the  Cayman  Islands  and 
avoid paying taxes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

66 

Not  every  company  does  that,  but  far  more  do  than  should,  and 
we  need  to  shut  down  those  sorts  of  things  and  we  need  to  expect 
those chartered American corporations to behave just like real peo-
ple,  those  artificial  people  given  life  by  charter,  to  be  an  American 
means  responsibility  and  part  of  that  responsibility  is  to  help  pay 
for  our  schools  and  our  roads  and  our  defense  system  and  all  the 
things we do together as Americans. 

I do not buy for a moment the issue that there is some over-tax-
ation.  That  is  not  the  case.  The  effective  tax  burden  of  American 
corporations  doing  business  around  the  world  is  not  exceeding 
other  countries  at  all.  That  is  not  a  source  of  anti-competitive  dif-
ficulty  for  American  corporations.  We  will  likely  have  robust  dis-
cussions about that in the future. 

My colleague, Senator DeMint is someone for whom I have great 
respect and obviously, we have disagreements on this issue and we 
agree  on  some  others  but  it  is  my  hope  through  hearings  like  this 
that we can begin to have a broader discussion about what is hap-
pening.  What  really  is  happening  and  what  are  the  consequences 
of  this  for  the  American  people,  for  America’s  economic  future,  for 
America’s businesses? What are the consequences and what can we 
do about it? 

So  I  appreciate  very  much  all  five  of  you  traveling  today  to 
Washington,  D.C.  to  be  a  part  of  this  hearing.  The  hearing  is  ad-
journed. 

[Whereupon, at 12:15 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

LEO HINDERY, JR. 

Question  1.  My  home  state  is  one  of  the  most  trade  dependent  states  in  the 
United  States.  Both  my  state  and  the  entire  country  need  aggressive  enforcement 
of  trade  laws  to  make  sure  our  companies  and  workers  have  a  more  level  playing 
field. Therefore, we must identify and carefully consider options to improve enforce-
ment.  Mr.  Hindery,  could  you  please  tell  us  more  about  your  proposal  to  create  a 
new  Trade  Enforcement  Division  at  the  U.S.  Department  of  Justice  headed  by  an 
Assistant Attorney General? How would it help ensure that our enforcement efforts 
are better coordinated and more effective? 

Answer.  International  trade  needs  to  be  rules-based  if  it  is  to  be  valuable  to  the 
all members of the international trading community. Accordingly, it is not good pub-
lic  policy  or  practice  for  the  United  States  to  conclude  agreements  governing  inter-
national trade and then fail to ensure that the rules embodied in these agreements 
are  strictly  enforced.  Based  on  recent  experience,  it  is  impossible  to  be  confident 
that  those  officials  in  the  Office  of  the  United  States  Special  Trade  Representative 
who  negotiate  trade  agreements  for  this  country  are  and  will  be  appropriately  dili-
gent in seeing that the agreements are then strictly enforced. That is why I strongly 
favor  creating  a  new  Division  within  the  Department  of  Justice,  headed  by  an  As-
sistant  Attorney  General  who  would  be  charged  with  enforcing  trade  agreements. 
The  sole  function  of  this  new  Division  would  be  to  make  certain  that  international 
trade agreements concluded by the United States are strictly enforced, and the Divi-
sion  would  be  managed  by  legal  professionals  whose  training,  experience  and  inde-
pendence are consistent with this responsibility. America’s economic interests would 
be  advanced  by  this  construct,  as  would  the  foundation  of  the  entire  international 
trading system, given the relative importance of the United States as a global trad-
ing partner. 

Question  2.  We  should  also  welcome  private  sector  input  into  the  development  of 
our  trade  policies.  Both  NGOs  and  CEOs  have  lessons  to  teach  our  government 
about  the  impact  of  trade  policies  and  they  have  unique  perspectives.  Mr.  Hindery, 
I know you participated in the Horizon Project. Can you tell us more about that ef-
fort and who was involved in it? 

Answer.  I  chaired  and  organized  the  Horizon  Project,  which  was  initiated  in  Au-
gust  2006  to  develop  legislative  recommendations  which  the  Project  members  be-
lieve  would,  if  enacted,  advance  America’s  prosperity  and  global  competitiveness, 
while  maintaining  the  country’s  long-standing  commitment  to  economic  and  social 
justice.  The  Project’s  eleven  members  are  corporate  CEOs  and  policy  specialists 
drawn  from  a  variety  of  economic  sectors.  The  Horizon  Project’s  legislative  rec-
ommendations, accessible at www.horizonproject@us.com, cover four policy areas: (1) 
Trade  and  Economic  Growth;  (2)  Education;  (3)  Healthcare;  and  (4)  Public  Infra-
structure.  The  Horizon  Project  Report  and  recommendations  were  presented  to  the 
Senate Democratic and Republican Policy Committees in February 2007. 

Æ 

(67) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:31 Mar 04, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\79549.TXT JACKIE

